- id: 1A.3.1
  chapter: 1A
  type: null
  title: A The material in CASS 1A.3.1BG about how CASS 1A.3 fits into the FCA senior
    managers and
  summary: null
  risk_ids: []
  default_control_ids: []
  applicability_conditions: null
  text: 'G certification regime for SMCR firms also applies to a CASS small firm that
    is an SMCR firm and

    the function in CASS 1A.3.1R.

    CASS 1A.3.1A R The senior managers regime and the certification regime

    A CASS medium firm and a CASS large firm must allocate to a single director or
    senior

    manager of sufficient skill and authority the function of:

    (1) oversight of the operational effectiveness of that firm’s systems and controls
    that are

    designed to achieve compliance with CASS;

    (2) reporting to the firm’s governing body in respect of that oversight; and

    (3) completing and submitting a CMAR to the FCA in accordance with SUP 16.14.

    [Note: article 7, first paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 1A.3.1B G (1)

    (a) This paragraph CASS 1A.3.1BG describes how CASS 1A.3.1AR applies to SMCR

    firms.

    (b) The function in CASS 1A.3.1AR is not a separate controlled function and performing

    that function does not require approval as an approved person.

    (c) However, nothing in paragraphs (1A) to (4) affects the requirement for the
    function in

    CASS 1A.3.1AR to be allocated to a single director or senior manager of sufficient
    skill

    and authority in accordance with CASS 1A.3.1AR and CASS 1A.3.2AR.

    (1A) There are three elements of the regime for SMCR firms that are particularly
    relevant to

    CASS 1A, although they do not all apply to all SMCR firms:

    (a) a firm’s obligation to allocate certain responsibilities to its SMF managers
    (see SYSC

    24 (Senior managers and certification regime: Allocation of prescribed responsibilities));

    (b) a firm’s obligation to ensure that one or more of its SMF managers have overall

    responsibility for each of its activities, business areas and management functions
    (see

    SYSC 26 (Senior managers and certification regime: Overall and local responsibility));

    and

    (c) the certification regime (the certification regime is explained in SYSC 27
    (Senior

    managers and certification regime: Certification regime) and SYSC TP 7 (Bank of

    England and Financial Services Act 2016: Certification and regulatory references)

    CASS 1A CASS firm classification and operational

    oversight

    CASS

    explains that the certification regime comes into force sometime after other parts
    of the

    senior managers and certification regime).

    (2)

    (a) This paragraph (2) explains how CASS 1A.3.1AR applies to an SMCR firm to which

    SYSC 24 and SYSC 26 both apply.

    (b) The firm must allocate responsibility for the firm’s compliance with CASS
    to one of its

    SMF managers (see SYSC 24.2.1R). That responsibility is an “FCA-prescribed senior

    management responsibility”. The full list of FCA-prescribed senior management

    responsibilities is in the table in SYSC 24.2.6R.

    (c) Although the CASS function in SYSC 24.2.1R is different from the function
    in CASS

    1A.3.1AR, the firm may allocate the function in CASS 1A.3.1AR to the SMF manager
    in

    (b).

    (d) The firm may allocate the CASS FCA-prescribed senior management responsibility

    described in (b) to an SMF manager who does not perform any other function coming

    within the FCA regime for SMF managers in SMCR firms. See SUP 10C.7 (Other overall

    responsibility function (SMF18)) and SUP 10C.8.1R (Other local responsibility
    function

    (SMF22)) for details. Where this is the case, the manager will be performing the
    other

    overall responsibility function or the other local responsibility function.

    (e) The firm may choose to allocate the function in CASS 1A.3.1AR to someone who
    is

    not an approved person and SMF manager. If so:

    (i) that person will be subject to the employee certification regime described
    in SYSC

    27 (Senior managers and certification regime: (Certification Regime);

    (ii) that person will be subject to supervision by the SMF manager in (b); and

    (iii) the function in CASS 1A.3.1AR will be the CASS oversight FCA certification

    function in SYSC 27.8.1R.

    (3) In relation to an SMCR firm to which SYSC 24 applies but SYSC 26 does not
    apply, the

    guidance in sub-paragraphs (2)(b), (2)(c), and 2(e) applies, but the guidance
    in subparagraph (2)(d) does not apply.

    (4)

    (a) The position of an SMCR firm to which neither SYSC 24 nor SYSC 26 apply is

    slightly different.

    (b) The firm may choose to allocate the function in CASS 1A.3.1AR to an SMF manager.

    (c) The firm may instead choose to allocate the function in CASS 1A.3.1AR to someone

    who is not an SMF manager.

    (d) Where (c) applies, the person performing the function in CASS 1A.3.1AR will
    fall into

    the certification regime. The function in CASS 1A.3.1AR will be the CASS oversight
    FCA

    certification function in SYSC 27.8.1R.

    CASS 1A.3.2A R Where a firm allocates the responsibilities in CASS 1A.3.1R or
    CASS 1A.3.1AR (“the CASS

    oversight responsibilities”) to a director or senior manager (“P”), the firm must
    not allocate any

    other responsibilities to P in addition to the CASS oversight responsibilities,
    unless the firm is

    satisfied on reasonable grounds that:

    CASS 1A CASS firm classification and operational

    oversight

    CASS

    (1) P will still be able to discharge the CASS oversight responsibilities effectively;
    and

    (2) the firm’s full compliance with CASS will not be compromised.

    [Note: article 7, second paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 1A.3.2B R A firm may allow the CASS oversight responsibilities to be shared
    amongst one or more

    directors or senior managers where this is done as part of a job share between
    those persons.

    CASS 1A.3.3 R (1) Subject to (2), a firm must make and retain an appropriate record
    of the person to whom

    responsibility is allocated in accordance with CASS 1A.3.1 R or CASS 1A.3.1A R.

    (2) A CASS small firm must make and retain such a record only where it allocates

    responsibility to a person other than the person in that firm who performs the
    compliance

    oversight function.

    (3) A firm must ensure that the record made under this rule is retained for a
    period of five

    years after it is made.

    CASS 1A CASS firm classification and operational

    oversight


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 3 Collateral

    CASS 3.1 Application and Purpose

    CASS 3.2 Requirements

    CASS 3 Collateral www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 3 Collateral

    CASS 3 Collateral www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 3.1 Application and Purpose

    CASS 3.1.1 R Application

    This chapter applies to a firm when it receives or holds assets in connection
    with an

    arrangement to secure the obligation of a client in the course of, or in connection
    with, its

    designated investment business, including MiFID business.

    CASS 3.1.2 G Firms are reminded that the application of this chapter is also dependent
    on the location from

    which the activity is undertaken (see CASS 1.3.2R).

    CASS 3.1.3 R This chapter does not apply to a firm that has only a bare security
    interest (without rights to

    hypothecate) in the client''s asset. In such circumstances, the firm must comply
    with the custody

    rules or client money rules as appropriate.

    CASS 3.1.4 G For the purpose of this chapter only, a bare security interest in
    the client''s asset gives a firm the

    right to realise the assets only on a client''s default and without the right
    to use other than in

    default.

    CASS 3.1.5 G Purpose

    The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that an appropriate level of protection
    is provided for

    those assets over which a client gives a firm certain rights. The arrangements
    covered by this

    chapter are those under which the firm is given a right to use the asset, and
    the firm treats the

    asset as if legal title and associated rights to that asset had been transferred
    to the firm subject

    only to an obligation to return equivalent assets to the client upon satisfaction
    of the client''s

    obligation to the firm. The rights covered in this chapter do not include those
    arrangements by

    which the firm has only a bare security interest in the client''s asset (in which
    case the custody

    rules or client money rules apply).

    CASS 3.1.6 G Examples of the arrangements covered by this chapter include the
    taking of collateral by a firm,

    under the ISDA English Law (transfer of title) and the New York Law Credit Support
    Annexes

    (assuming the right to rehypothecate has not been disapplied).

    CASS 3.1.7 G This chapter recognises the need to apply a differing level of regulatory
    protection to the assets

    which form the basis of the two different types of arrangement described in CASS
    3.1.5 G.

    Under the bare security interest arrangement, the asset continues to belong to
    the client until

    the firm''s right to realise that asset crystallises (that is, on the client''s
    default). But under a "right

    to use arrangement", the client has transferred to the firm the legal title and
    associated rights to

    the asset, so that when the firm exercises its right to treat the asset as its
    own, the asset

    ceases to belong to the client and in effect becomes the firm''s asset and is
    no longer in need of

    the full range of client asset protection. The firm may exercise its right to
    treat the asset as its

    own by, for example, clearly so identifying the asset in its own books and records.

    CASS 3 Collateral www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 3.1.7A G Firms are reminded of the client''s best interests rule which requires
    a firm to act honestly, fairly

    and professionally, in accordance with the best interests of its clients, when
    agreeing to,

    entering into, exercising its rights under and fulfilling its obligations under
    an arrangement

    covered by this chapter, and when structuring its business to include such arrangements.

    CASS 3.1.8 G A prime brokerage firm is reminded of the additional obligations
    in CASS 9.3.1R which apply to

    prime brokerage agreements.

    CASS 3 Collateral www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 3.2 Requirements

    CASS 3.2.2 R Application

    A firm that receives or holds a client''s assets under an arrangement to which
    this chapter

    applies and which exercises its right to treat the assets as its own must ensure
    that it maintains

    adequate records to enable it to meet any future obligations including the return
    of equivalent

    assets to the client.

    CASS 3.2.3 G If the firm has the right to use the client''s asset under a "right
    to use arrangement" but has not

    yet exercised its right to treat the asset as its own, the client money rules
    or the custody rules

    will continue to apply as appropriate until such time as the firm exercises its
    right, at which time

    CASS 3.2.2 R will apply.

    CASS 3.2.4 G When appropriate, firms that enter into the arrangements with retail
    clients covered in this

    chapter will be expected to identify in the statement of custody assets sent to
    the client in

    accordance with COBS 16.4 (Statements of client designated investments or client
    money),

    article 63 of the MiFID Org Regulation (see COBS 16A.5) or CASS 9.5 (Reporting
    to clients on

    request) details of the assets which form the basis of the arrangements. Where
    the firm utilises

    global netting arrangements, a statement of the assets held on this basis will
    suffice.

    CASS 3 Collateral www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity

    CASS 5.1 Application

    CASS 5.2 Holding money as agent of an insurance undertaking

    CASS 5.3 Statutory trust

    CASS 5.4 Non-statutory client money trust

    CASS 5.5 Segregation and the operation of client money accounts

    CASS 5.6 Client money distribution

    CASS 5.7 Mandates

    CASS 5.8 Safe keeping of client''s documents and other assets

    CASS 5 Annex 1 Segregation of designated investments: permitted investments, general

    principles and conditions (This Annex belongs to CASS 5.5.14 R)

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance

    distribution activity

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.1 Application

    CASS 5.1.1 R (1) CASS 5.1 to CASS 5.6 apply, subject to (2), (3) and CASS 5.1.3
    R to CASS 5.1.6 R, to a

    firm that receives or holds money in the course of or in connection with its insurance

    distribution activity.

    (2) CASS 5.1 to CASS 5.6 do not, subject to (3), apply:

    (a) to a firm to the extent that it acts in accordance with the client money chapter;
    or

    (b) [deleted]

    (c) to an insurance undertaking in respect of its permitted activities; or

    (d) to a managing agent when acting as such; or

    (e) with respect to money held by a firm which:

    (i) is an approved bank; and

    (ii) has requisite capital under article 10(6)(b) of the IDD;

    but only when held by the firm in an account with itself, in which case the firm
    must notify

    the client (whether through a client agreement, terms of business, or otherwise
    in writing)

    that:

    (iii) money held for that client in an account with the approved bank will be
    held by

    the firm as banker and not as trustee (or in Scotland as agent); and

    (iv) as a result, the money will not be held in accordance with CASS 5.1 to CASS
    5.6.

    (3) A firm may elect to comply with:

    (a) [deleted]

    (b) CASS 5.1, CASS 5.2 and CASS 5.4 to CASS 5.6 in respect of money which it

    receives in the course of carrying on an activity which would be insurance distribution

    activity, and which money would be client money, but for article 72D of the Regulated

    Activities Order (Large risks contracts where risk situated outside the EEA);

    but the election must be in respect of all the firm''s business which consists
    of that activity.

    (4) A firm must keep a record of any election in (3).

    CASS 5.1.2 G A firm that is an approved bank, and relies on the exemption under
    CASS 5.1.1 R (2)(e), should

    be able to account to all of its clients for amounts held on their behalf at all
    times. A bank

    account opened with the firm that is in the name of the client would generally
    be sufficient.

    When money from clients deposited with the firm is held in a pooled account, this
    account

    should be clearly identified as an account for clients. The firm should also be
    able to

    demonstrate that an amount owed to a specific client that is held within the pool
    can be

    reconciled with a record showing that individual''s client balance and is, therefore,
    identifiable at

    any time.

    CASS 5.1.3 R An authorised professional firm regulated by The Law Society (of
    England and Wales), The

    Law Society of Scotland or The Law Society of Northern Ireland that, with respect
    to its

    regulated activities, is subject to the rules of its designated professional body
    as specified in

    CASS 5.1.4 R, in force on 14 January 2005, must comply with those rules and if
    it does so, it

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    will be deemed to comply with CASS 5.2 to CASS 5.6.

    CASS 5.1.4 R For the purposes of CASS 5.1.3 R the relevant rules are:

    (1) If regulated by the Law Society (of England and Wales);

    (a) the Solicitors'' Accounts Rules 1998; or

    (b) where applicable, the Solicitors Overseas Practice Rules 1990;

    (2) if regulated by the Law Society of Scotland, the Solicitors'' (Scotland) Accounts,
    Accounts

    Certificate, Professional Practice and Guarantee Fund Rules 2001;

    (3) if regulated by the Law Society of Northern Ireland, the Solicitors'' Accounts
    Regulations

    1998.

    CASS 5.1.4A R (1) A firm will, subject to (3), be deemed to comply with CASS 5.3
    to CASS 5.6 if it receives

    or holds client money and it either:

    (a) in relation to a service charge, complies with the requirement to segregate
    such

    money in accordance with section 42 of the Landlord and Tenant Act 1987 ("the
    1987

    Act"); or

    (b) in relation to money which is clients'' money for the purpose of the Royal
    Institution of

    Chartered Surveyors'' Rules of Conduct ("RICS rules") in force as at 14 January
    2005, it

    complies with the requirement to segregate and account for such money in accordance

    with the RICS Members'' Accounts rules.

    (2) Paragraph (1)(a) also applies to a firm in Scotland or in Northern Ireland
    if in acting as a

    property manager the firm receives or holds a service charge and complies (so
    far as

    practicable) with section 42 of the 1987 Act as if the requirements of that provision
    applied

    to it.

    (3) In addition to complying with (1), a firm must ensure that an account in which
    money

    held pursuant to the trust fund mentioned in section 42(3) of the 1987 Act or
    an account

    maintained in accordance with the RICS rules satisfies the requirements in CASS
    5.5.49 R

    to the extent that the firm will hold money as trustee or otherwise on behalf
    of its clients.

    CASS 5.1.5 R Subject to CASS 5.1.5A R money is not client money when:

    (1) it becomes properly due and payable to the firm:

    (a) for its own account; or

    (b) in its capacity as agent of an insurance undertaking where the firm acts in

    accordance with CASS 5.2; or

    (2) it is otherwise received by the firm pursuant to an arrangement made between
    an

    insurance undertaking and another person (other than a firm) by which that other
    person

    has authority to underwrite risks, settle claims or handle refunds of premiums
    on behalf of

    that insurance undertaking outside the United Kingdom and where the money relates
    to that

    business.

    CASS 5.1.5A R CASS 5.1.5 R (1)(b) and CASS 5.1.5 R (2) do not apply, and hence
    money is client money, in

    any case where:

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (1) in relation to an activity specified in CASS 5.2.3 R (1) (a) to CASS 5.2.3
    R (1) (c), the

    insurance undertaking has agreed that the firm may treat money which it receives
    and holds

    as agent of the undertaking, as client money and in accordance with the provisions
    of CASS

    5.3 to CASS 5.6; and

    (2) the agreement in (1) is in writing and adequate to show that the insurance
    undertaking

    consents to its interests under the trusts (or in Scotland agency) in CASS 5.3.2
    R or CASS

    5.4.7 R being subordinated to the interests of the firm''s other clients.

    CASS 5.1.6 R Except where a firm and an insurance undertaking have (in accordance
    with CASS 5.1.5A R)

    agreed otherwise, for the purposes of CASS 5.1 to CASS 5.6 an insurance undertaking
    (when

    acting as such) with whom a firm conducts insurance distribution activity is not
    to be treated as

    a client of the firm.

    CASS 5.1.7 G Purpose

    (1) Principle 10 (Clients'' assets) requires a firm to arrange adequate protection
    for clients''

    assets when the firm is responsible for them. An essential part of that protection
    is the

    proper accounting and handling of client money. The rules in CASS 5.1 to CASS
    5.6 also

    give effect to the requirement in article 10.6 of the IDD that all necessary measures
    should

    be taken to protect clients against the inability of an insurance intermediary
    to transfer

    premiums to an insurance undertaking or to transfer the proceeds of a claim or
    premium

    refund to the insured.

    (2) There are two particular approaches which firms can adopt which reflect options
    given in

    article 10.6. The first is to provide by law or contract for a transfer of risk
    from the insurance

    intermediary to the insurance undertaking (CASS 5.2). The second is that client
    money is

    strictly segregated by being transferred to client accounts that cannot be used
    to reimburse

    other creditors in the event of the firm''s insolvency (CASS 5.3 and CASS 5.4
    provide

    different means of achieving such segregation). CASS 5.1.5A R permits a firm subject
    to

    certain conditions to treat money which it collects as agent of an insurance undertaking
    as

    client money; the principle of strict segregation is, however, satisfied because
    such

    undertakings must agree to their interests being subordinated to the interests
    of the firm''s

    other clients.

    CASS 5.1.8 G A firm which carries on MiFID business or designated investment business
    in relation to life

    assurance business may, in accordance with CASS 7.10.3R and in relation to that
    business

    only, either comply with CASS 7 or elect to comply with the insurance client money
    chapter.

    CASS 5.1.9 G Firms are reminded that SUP 3 contains provisions which are relevant
    to the preparation and

    delivery of reports by auditors.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.2 Holding money as agent of an insurance undertaking

    CASS 5.2.1 G Introduction

    If a firm holds money as agent of an insurance undertaking then the firm''s clients
    (who are not

    insurance undertakings) will be adequately protected to the extent that the premiums
    which it

    receives are treated as being received by the insurance undertaking when they
    are received by

    the agent and claims money and premium refunds will only be treated as received
    by the client

    when they are actually paid over. The rules in CASS 5.2 make provision for agency
    agreements

    between firms and insurance undertakings to contain terms which make clear when
    money

    should be held by a firm as agent of an undertaking. Firms should refer to CASS
    5.1.5 R to

    determine the circumstances in which they may treat money held on behalf of insurance

    undertakings as client money.

    CASS 5.2.2 G (1) Agency agreements between insurance intermediaries and insurance
    undertakings may

    be of a general kind and facilitate the introduction of business to the insurance
    undertaking.

    Alternatively, an agency agreement may confer on the intermediary contractual
    authority to

    commit the insurance undertaking to risk or authority to settle claims or handle
    premium

    refunds (often referred to as "binding authorities"). CASS 5.2.3 R requires that
    binding

    authorities of this kind must provide that the intermediary is to act as the agent
    of the

    insurance undertaking for the purpose of receiving and holding premiums (if the

    intermediary has authority to commit the insurance undertaking to risk), claims
    monies (if

    the intermediary has authority to settle claims on behalf of the insurance undertaking)
    and

    premium refunds (if the intermediary has authority to make refunds of premium
    on behalf of

    the insurance undertaking). Accordingly such money is not, except where a firm
    and an

    insurance undertaking have in compliance with CASS 5.1.5A R agreed otherwise,
    client

    money for the purposes of CASS 5.

    (2) Other introductory agency agreements may also, depending on their precise
    terms,

    satisfy some or all of the requirements of the type of written agreement described
    in CASS

    5.2.3 R. It is desirable that an intermediary should, before informing its clients
    (in

    accordance with CASS 5.2.3 R (3)) that it will receive money as agent of an insurance

    undertaking, agree the terms of that notification with the relevant insurance
    undertakings.

    CASS 5.2.3 R Requirement for written agreement before acting as agent of an

    insurance undertaking

    (1) A firm must not agree to:

    (a) deal in investments as agent for an insurance undertaking in connection with
    an

    insurance distribution activity; or

    (b) act as agent for an insurance undertaking for the purpose of settling claims
    or

    handling premium refunds; or

    (c) otherwise receive money as agent of an insurance undertaking;

    unless:

    (d) it has entered into a written agreement with the insurance undertaking to
    that effect;

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    and

    (e) it is satisfied on reasonable grounds that the terms of the policies issued
    by the

    insurance undertaking to the firm''s clients are likely to be compatible with
    such an

    agreement; and

    (f)

    (i) (in the case of (a)) the agreement required by (d) expressly provides for
    the firm to

    act as agent of the insurance undertaking for the purpose of receiving premiums
    from

    the firm''s clients; and

    (ii) (in the case of (b)) the agreement required by (d) expressly provides for
    the firm to

    act as agent of the insurance undertaking for the purpose of receiving and holding

    claims money (or, as the case may be, premium refunds) prior to transmission to
    the

    client making the claim (or, as the case may be, entitled to the premium refund)
    in

    question.

    (2) A firm must retain a copy of any agreement it enters pursuant to (1) for a
    period of at

    least six years from the date on which it is terminated.

    (3) Where a firm holds, or is to hold, money as agent for an insurance undertaking
    it must

    ensure that it informs those of its clients which are not insurance undertakings
    and whose

    transactions may be affected by the arrangement (whether in its terms of business,
    client

    agreements or otherwise in writing) that it will hold their money as agent of
    the insurance

    undertaking and if necessary the extent of such agency and whether it includes
    all items of

    client money or is restricted, for example, to the receipt of premiums.

    (4) A firm may (subject to the consent of the insurance undertaking concerned)
    include in an

    agreement in (1) provision for client money received by its appointed representative,
    field

    representatives and other agents to be held as agent for the insurance undertaking
    (in

    which event it must ensure that the representative or agent provides the information
    to

    clients required by (3)).

    CASS 5.2.4 G Firms are reminded that CASS 5.1.5A R provides that, if the insurance
    undertaking has agreed

    in writing, money held in accordance with an agreement made under CASS 5.2.3 R
    may be

    treated as client money and may (but not otherwise) be kept in a client bank account.

    CASS 5.2.5 G A firm which provides for the protection of a client(which is not
    an insurance undertaking) under

    CASS 5.2 is relieved of the obligation to provide protection for that client under
    CASS 5.3 or

    CASS 5.4 to the extent of the items of client money protected by the agency agreement.

    CASS 5.2.6 G A firm may, in accordance with CASS 5.2.3 R (4), arrange for an insurance
    undertaking to

    accept responsibility for the money held by its appointed representatives, field
    representatives,

    and other agents, in which event CASS 5.5.18 R to CASS 5.5.25 G will not apply.

    CASS 5.2.7 G A firm may operate on the basis of an agency agreement as provided
    for by CASS 5.2.3 R for

    some of its clients and with protection provided by a client money trust in accordance
    with

    CASS 5.3 or CASS 5.4 for other clients. A firm may also operate on either basis
    for the same

    client but in relation to different transactions. A firm which does so should
    be satisfied that its

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    administrative systems and controls are adequate and, in accordance with CASS
    5.2.4 G,

    should ensure that money held for both types of client and business is kept separate.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.3 Statutory trust

    CASS 5.3.1 G Section 137B(1) of the Act (Miscellaneous ancillary matters) provides
    that rules may make

    provision which results in client money being held by a firm on trust (England
    and Wales and

    Northern Ireland) or as agent (Scotland only). CASS 5.3.2 R creates a fiduciary
    relationship

    between the firm and its client under which client money is in the legal ownership
    of the firm but

    remains in the beneficial ownership of the client. In the event of failure of
    the firm, costs relating

    to the distribution of client money may have to be borne by the trust.

    CASS 5.3.2 R A firm (other than a firm acting in accordance with CASS 5.4) receives
    and holds client money

    as trustee (or in Scotland as agent) on the following terms:

    (1) for the purposes of and on the terms of CASS 5.3, CASS 5.5 and the client
    money

    (insurance) distribution rules;

    (2) subject to (4), for the clients (other than clients which are insurance undertakings
    when

    acting as such) for whom that money is held, according to their respective interests
    in it;

    (3) after all valid claims in (2) have been met, for clients which are insurance
    undertakings

    according to their respective interests in it;

    (4) on the failure of the firm, for the payment of the costs properly attributable
    to the

    distribution of the client money in accordance with (2) and (3); and

    (5) after all valid claims and costs under (2) to (4) have been met, for the firm
    itself.

    CASS 5.3.3 G (1) A firm which holds client money can discharge its obligation
    to ensure adequate

    protection for its clients in respect of such money by complying with CASS 5.3
    which

    provides for such money to be held by the firm on the terms of a trust imposed
    by the rules.

    (2) The trust imposed by CASS 5.3 is limited to a trust in respect of client money
    which a

    firm receives and holds. The consequential and supplementary requirements in CASS
    5.5

    are designed to secure the proper segregation and maintenance of adequate client
    money

    balances. In particular, CASS 5.5 does not permit a firm to use client money balances
    to

    provide credit for clients (or potential clients) such that, for example, their
    premium

    obligations may be met in advance of the premium being remitted to the firm. A
    firm wishing

    to provide credit for clients may however do so out of its own funds.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.4 Non-statutory client money trust

    CASS 5.4.1 G Introduction

    (1) CASS 5.4 permits a firm, which has adequate resources, systems and controls,
    to

    declare a trust on terms which expressly authorise it, in its capacity as trustee,
    to make

    advances of credit to the firm''s clients. The client money trust required by
    CASS 5.4 extends

    to such debt obligations which will arise if the firm, as trustee, makes credit
    advances, to

    enable a client''s premium obligations to be met before the premium is remitted
    to the firm

    and similarly if it allows claims and premium refunds to be paid to the client
    before receiving

    remittance of those monies from the insurance undertaking.

    (2) CASS 5.4 does not permit a firm to make advances of credit to itself out of
    the client

    money trust. Accordingly, CASS 5.4 does not permit a firm to withdraw commission
    from the

    client money trust before it has received the premium from the client in relation
    to the noninvestment insurance contract which generated the commission.

    CASS 5.4.2 R Voluntary nature of this section

    A firm may elect to comply with the requirements in this section, and may do so
    for some of its

    business whilst complying with CASS 5.3 for other parts.

    CASS 5.4.3 R A firm is not subject to CASS 5.3 when and to the extent that it
    acts in accordance with this

    section.

    CASS 5.4.4 R Conditions for using the non-statutory client money trust

    A firm may not handle client money in accordance with the rules in this section
    unless each of

    the following conditions is satisfied:

    (1) the firm must have and maintain systems and controls which are adequate to
    ensure that

    the firm is able to monitor and manage its client money transactions and any credit
    risk

    arising from the operation of the trust arrangement and, if in accordance with
    CASS 5.4.2 R

    a firm complies with both the rules in CASS 5.3 and CASS 5.4, such systems and
    controls

    must extend to both arrangements;

    (2) the firm must obtain, and keep current, written confirmation from its auditor
    that it has in

    place systems and controls which are adequate to meet the requirements in (1);

    (3) the firm must designate a manager with responsibility for overseeing the firm''s
    day to

    day compliance with the systems and controls in (1) and the rules in this section;

    (4) the firm (if, under the terms of the non-statutory trust, it is to handle
    client money for

    retail customers) must have and at all times maintain capital resources of not
    less than

    £50,000 calculated in accordance with MIPRU 4.4.1 R; and

    (5) in relation to each of the clients for whom the firm holds money in accordance
    with CASS

    5.4, the firm must take reasonable steps to ensure that its terms of business
    or other client

    agreements adequately explain, and obtain the client''s informed consent to, the
    firm holding

    the client''s money in accordance with CASS 5.4 (and in the case of a client which
    is an

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    insurance undertaking (when acting as such) there must be an agreement which satisfies

    CASS 5.1.5A R).

    CASS 5.4.5 G The amount of a firm''s capital resources maintained for the purposes
    of MIPRU 4.2.11 R will

    also satisfy (in whole or in part) the requirement in CASS 5.4.4 R (4).

    CASS 5.4.6 R Client money to be received under the non-statutory client money
    trust

    Except to the extent that a firm acts in accordance with CASS 5.3, a firm must
    not receive or

    hold any client money unless it does so as trustee (or, in Scotland, as agent)
    and has properly

    executed a deed (or equivalent formal document) to that effect.

    CASS 5.4.7 R Contents of trust deed

    The deed referred to in CASS 5.4.6 R must provide that the money (and, if appropriate,

    designated investments) are held:

    (1) for the purposes of and on the terms of:

    (a) CASS 5.4;

    (b) the applicable provisions of CASS 5.5; and

    (c) the client money (insurance) distribution rules

    (2) subject to (4), for the clients (other than clients which are insurance undertakings
    when

    acting as such) for whom that money is held, according to their respective interests
    in it;

    (3) after all valid claims in (2) have been met for clients which are insurance
    undertakings

    according to their respective interests in it;

    (4) on failure of the firm, for the payment of the costs properly attributable
    to the distribution

    of the client money in accordance with (2) and (3); and

    (5) after all valid claims and costs under (2) to (4) have been met, for the firm
    itself.

    CASS 5.4.8 R The deed (or equivalent formal document) referred to in CASS 5.4.6
    R may provide that:

    (1) the firm, acting as trustee (or, in Scotland, as agent), has power to make
    advances or

    give credit to clients or insurance undertakings from client money, provided that
    it also

    provides that any debt or other obligation of a client or resulting obligation
    of an insurance

    undertaking, in relation to an advance or credit, is held on the same terms as
    CASS 5.4.7 R;

    (2) the benefit of a letter of credit or unconditional guarantee provided by an
    approved bank

    on behalf of a firm to satisfy any shortfall in the firm''s client money resource
    (as calculated

    under CASS 5.5.65 R) when compared with the firm''s client money requirement (as

    calculated under CASS 5.5.66 R or as appropriate CASS 5.5.68 R), is held on the
    same

    terms as CASS 5.4.7 R.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.5 Segregation and the operation of client money accounts

    CASS 5.5.1 R Application

    Unless otherwise stated each of the provisions in CASS 5.5 applies to firms which
    are acting in

    accordance with CASS 5.3 (Statutory trust) or CASS 5.4 (Non-statutory trust).

    CASS 5.5.2 G One purpose of CASS 5.5 is to ensure that, unless otherwise permitted,
    client money is kept

    separate from the firm''s own money. Segregation, in the event of a firm''s failure,
    is important for

    the effective operation of the trust that is created to protect client money.
    The aim is to clarify

    the difference between client money and general creditors'' entitlements in the
    event of the

    failure of the firm.

    CASS 5.5.3 R Requirement to segregate

    A firm must, except to the extent permitted by CASS 5.5, hold client money separate
    from the

    firm''s money.

    CASS 5.5.4 R Money due to a client from a firm

    If a firm is liable to pay money to a client, it must as soon as possible, and
    no later than one

    business day after the money is due and payable:

    (1) pay it into a client bank account, in accordance with CASS 5.5.5 R; or

    (2) pay it to, or to the order of, the client.

    CASS 5.5.5 R Segregation

    A firm must segregate client money by either:

    (1) paying it as soon as is practicable into a client bank account; or

    (2) paying it out in accordance with CASS 5.5.80 R.

    CASS 5.5.6 G The FCA expects that in most circumstances it will be practicable
    for a firm to pay client money

    into a client bank account by not later than the next business day after receipt.

    CASS 5.5.7 G Where an insurance transaction involves more than one firm acting
    in a chain such that for

    example money is transferred from a "producing" broker who has received client
    money from a

    consumer to an intermediate broker and thereafter to an insurance undertaking,
    each broker

    firm will owe obligations to its immediate client to segregate client money which
    it receives (in

    this example the producing broker in relation to the consumer and the intermediate
    broker in

    relation to the producing broker). A firm which allows a third party broker to
    hold or control client

    money will not thereby be relieved of its fiduciary obligations (see CASS 5.5.34
    R).

    CASS 5.5.8 R A firm may segregate client money in a different currency from that
    of receipt. If it does so, the

    firm must ensure that the amount held is adjusted at intervals of not more than
    twenty five

    business days to an amount at least equal to the original currency amount (or
    the currency in

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    which the firm has its liability to its clients, if different), translated at
    the previous day''s closing

    spot exchange rate.

    CASS 5.5.9 R A firm must not hold money other than client money in a client bank
    account unless it is:

    (1) a minimum sum required to open the account, or to keep it open; or

    (2) money temporarily in the account in accordance with CASS 5.5.16 R (Withdrawal
    of

    commission and mixed remittance); or

    (3) interest credited to the account which exceeds the amount due to clients as
    interest and

    has not yet been withdrawn by the firm.

    CASS 5.5.10 R If it is prudent to do so to ensure that client money is protected
    (and provided that doing so

    would otherwise be in accordance with CASS 5.5.63 R (1)(b)(ii)), a firm may pay
    into, or

    maintain in, a client bank account money of its own, and that money will then
    become client

    money for the purposes of CASS 5 and the client money (insurance) distribution
    rules.

    CASS 5.5.11 R A firm, when acting in accordance with CASS 5.3 (statutory trust),
    must ensure that the total

    amount of client money held for each client in any of the firm''s client money
    bank accounts is

    positive and that no payment is made from any such account for the benefit of
    a client unless

    the client has provided the firm with cleared funds to enable the payment to be
    made.

    CASS 5.5.11A G When a firm acts in accordance with CASS 5.3 (Statutory trust)
    it should not make a payment

    from the client bank account unless it is satisfied on reasonable grounds that
    the client has

    provided it with cleared funds. Accordingly, a firm should normally allow a reasonable
    period of

    time for cheques to clear. If a withdrawal is made and the client''s cheque is
    subsequently

    dishonoured it will be the firm''s responsibility to make good the shortfall in
    the account as

    quickly as possible (and without delay whilst a cheque is re-presented).

    CASS 5.5.12 R If client money is received by the firm in the form of an automated
    transfer, the firm must take

    reasonable steps to ensure that:

    (1) the money is received directly into a client bank account; and

    (2) if money is received directly into the firm''s own account, the money is transferred
    into a

    client bank account no later than the next business day after receipt.

    CASS 5.5.13 G A firm can hold client money in either a general client bank account
    (CASS 5.5.38 R) or a

    designated client bank account (CASS 5.5.39 R). A firm holds all client money
    in general client

    bank accounts for its clients as part of a common pool of money so those particular
    clients do

    not have a claim against a specific sum in a specific account; they only have
    a claim to the

    client money in general. A firm holds client money in designated client bank accounts
    for those

    clients who requested that their client money be part of a specific pool of money,
    so those

    particular clients do have a claim against a specific sum in a specific account;
    they do not have

    a claim to the client money in general unless a primary pooling event occurs.
    If the firm

    becomes insolvent, and there is (for whatever reason) a shortfall in money held
    for a client

    compared with that client''s entitlements, the available funds will be distributed
    in accordance

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    with the client money (insurance) distribution rules.

    CASS 5.5.14 R Non-statutory trust - segregation of designated investments

    (1) A firm which handles client money in accordance with the rules for a non-statutory
    trust

    in CASS 5.4 may, to the extent it considers appropriate, but subject to (2), satisfy
    the

    requirement to segregate client money by segregating or arranging for the segregation
    of

    designated investments with a value at least equivalent to such money as would
    otherwise

    have been segregated into a client bank account.

    (2) A firm may not segregate designated investments unless it:

    (a) takes reasonable steps to ensure that any consumers whose client money interests

    may be protected by such segregation are aware that the firm may operate such
    an

    arrangement and have (whether through its terms of business, client agreements,
    or

    otherwise in writing) an adequate opportunity to give their informed consent;

    (b) ensures that the terms on which it will segregate designated investments include

    provision for it to take responsibility for meeting any shortfall in its client
    money resource

    which is attributable to falls in the market value of a segregated investment;

    (c) provides in the deed referred to in CASS 5.4.6 R for designated investments
    which it

    segregates to be held by it on the terms of the non-statutory trust; and

    (d) takes reasonable steps to ensure that the segregation is at all times in conformity

    with the range of permitted investments, general principles and conditions in
    CASS 5

    Annex 1 R.

    CASS 5.5.15 G A firm which takes advantage of CASS 5.5.14 R will need to consider
    whether its permission

    should include the permitted activity of managing investments. If the firm is
    granted a power to

    manage with discretion the funds over which it is appointed as trustee under the
    trust deed

    required by CASS 5.4 then it will be likely to need a permission to manage investments.
    It is

    unlikely to need such a permission, however, if it is merely granted a power to
    invest but the

    deed stipulates that the funds may only be managed with discretion by another
    firm (which has

    the necessary permission). Such an arrangement would not preclude the firm holding
    client

    money as trustee from appointing another firm (or firms) as manager and setting
    an appropriate

    strategy and overall asset allocation, subject to the limits set out in CASS 5
    Ann 1 R. A firm

    may also need to consider whether it needs a permission to operate a collective
    investment

    scheme if any of its clients are to participate in the income or gains arising
    from the acquisition

    or disposal of designated investments.

    CASS 5.5.16 R Withdrawal of commission and mixed remittance

    (1) A firm may draw down commission from the client bank account if:

    (a) it has received the premium from the client (or from a third party premium
    finance

    provider on the client''s behalf); and

    (b) this is consistent with the firm''s terms of business which it maintains with
    the relevant

    client and the insurance undertaking to whom the premium will become payable;

    and the firm may draw down commission before payment of the premium to the insurance

    undertaking, provided that the conditions in (a) and (b) are satisfied.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (2) If a firm receives a mixed remittance (that is part client money and part
    other money), it

    must:

    (a) pay the full sum into a client bank account in accordance with CASS 5.5.5
    R; and

    (b) pay the money that is not client money out of the client bank account as soon
    as

    reasonably practicable and in any event by not later than twenty-five business
    days after

    the day on which the remittance is cleared (or, if earlier, when the firm performs
    the

    client money calculation in accordance with CASS 5.5.63 R (1)).

    CASS 5.5.17 G (1) As soon as commission becomes due to the firm (in accordance
    with CASS 5.5.16 R (1))

    it must be treated as a remittance which must be withdrawn in accordance with
    CASS

    5.5.16 R (2). The procedure required by CASS 5.5.16 R will also apply where moneyis
    due

    and payable to the firm in respect of fees due from clients (whether to the firm
    or other

    professionals).

    (2) Firms are reminded that money received in accordance with CASS 5.2 must not,
    except

    where a firm and an insurance undertaking have (in accordance with CASS 5.1.5A
    R)

    agreed otherwise, be kept in a client bank account. Client money received from
    a third-party

    premium finance provider should, however, be segregated into a client bank account.

    (3) Where a client makes payments of premium to a firm in instalments, CASS 5.5.16
    R (1)

    applies in relation to each instalment.

    (4) If a firm is unable to match a remittance with a transaction it may be unable
    to

    immediately determine whether the payment comprises a mixed remittance or is client

    money. In such cases the remittance should be treated as client money while the
    firm takes

    steps to match the remittance to a transaction as soon as possible.

    CASS 5.5.18 R Appointed representatives, field representatives and other agents

    (1) Subject to (4), a firm must in relation to each of its appointed representatives,
    field

    representatives and other agents comply with CASS 5.5.19 R to CASS 5.5.21 R (Immediate

    segregation) or with CASS 5.5.23 R (Periodic segregation and reconciliation).

    (2) A firm must in relation to each representative or other agent keep a record
    of whether it

    is complying with CASS 5.5.19 R to CASS 5.5.21 R or with CASS 5.5.23 R.

    (3) A firm is, but without affecting the application of CASS 5.5.19 R to CASS
    5.5.23 R, to be

    treated as the recipient of client money which is received by any of its appointed

    representatives, field representatives or other agents.

    (4) Paragraphs (1) to (3) do not apply in relation to an appointed representative,
    field

    representative or other agent to which (if it were a firm) CASS 5.1.4AR (1) or
    CASS 5.1.4AR

    (2) would apply, but subject to the representative or agent maintaining an account
    which

    satisfies the requirements of CASS 5.5.49 R to the extent that the representative
    or agent

    will hold client money on trust or otherwise on behalf of its clients.

    CASS 5.5.19 R Immediate segregation

    A firm must establish and maintain procedures to ensure that client money received
    by its

    appointed representatives, field representatives, or other agents of the firm
    is:

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (1) paid into a client bank account of the firm in accordance with CASS 5.5.5
    R; or

    (2) forwarded to the firm, or in the case of a field representative forwarded
    to a specified

    business address of the firm, so as to ensure that the money arrives at the specified

    business address by the close of the third business day.

    CASS 5.5.20 G For the purposes of CASS 5.5.19 R, the client money received on
    business day one should be

    forwarded to the firm or specified business address of the firm no later than
    the next business

    day after receipt (business day two) in order for it to reach that firm or specified
    business

    address by the close of the third business day. Procedures requiring the client
    money to be

    sent to the firm or the specified business address of the firm by first class
    post no later than the

    next business day after receipt would meet the requirements of CASS 5.5.19 R.

    CASS 5.5.21 R If client money is received in accordance with CASS 5.5.19 R, the
    firm must ensure that its

    appointed representatives, field representatives or other agents keep client money
    (whether in

    the form of premiums, claims money or premium refunds) separately identifiable
    from any other

    money (including that of the firm) until the client money is paid into a client
    bank account or sent

    to the firm.

    CASS 5.5.22 G A firm which acts in accordance with CASS 5.5.19 R to CASS 5.5.21
    R need not comply with

    CASS 5.5.23 R.

    CASS 5.5.23 R Periodic segregation and reconciliation

    (1) A firm must, on a regular basis, and at reasonable intervals, ensure that
    it holds in its

    client bank account an amount which (in addition to any other amount which it
    is required by

    these rules to hold) is not less than the amount which it reasonably estimates
    to be the

    aggregate of the amounts held at any time by its appointed representatives, field

    representatives, and other agents.

    (2) A firm must, not later than ten business days following the expiry of each
    period in (1):

    (a) carry out, in relation to each such representative or agent, a reconciliation
    of the

    amount paid by the firm into its client bank account with the amount of client
    money

    actually received and held by the representative or other agent; and

    (b) make a corresponding payment into, or withdrawal from, the account.

    CASS 5.5.24 G (1) CASS 5.5.23 R allows a firm with appointed representatives,
    field representatives and

    other agents to avoid the need for the representative to forward client money
    on a daily

    basis but instead requires a firm to segregate into its client money bank account
    amounts

    which it reasonably estimates to be sufficient to cover the amount of client money
    which the

    firm expects its representatives or agents to receive and hold over a given period.
    At the

    expiry of each such period, the firm must obtain information about the actual
    amount of

    client money received and held by its representatives so that it can reconcile
    the amount of

    client money it has segregated with the amounts actually received and held by
    its

    representatives and agents. The frequency at which this reconciliation is to be
    performed is

    not prescribed but it must be at regular and reasonable intervals having regard
    to the nature

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    and frequency of the insurance business carried on by its representatives and
    agents. For

    example, a period of six months might be appropriate for a representative which
    conducts

    business involving the receipt of premiums only infrequently whilst for other
    representatives

    a periodic reconciliation at monthly intervals (or less) may be appropriate.

    (2) Where a firm operates on the basis of CASS 5.5.23 R, the money which is segregated

    into its client bank account is client money and will be available to meet any
    obligations

    owed to the clients of its representatives who for this purpose are treated as
    the

    firm''sclients.

    CASS 5.5.25 G A firm which acts in accordance with CASS 5.5.23 R need not comply
    with CASS 5.5.19 R to

    CASS 5.5.21 R.

    CASS 5.5.26 R Client entitlements

    A firm must take reasonable steps to ensure that it is notified promptly of any
    receipt of client

    money in the form of client entitlements.

    CASS 5.5.27 G The ''entitlements'' mentioned in CASS 5.5.26 R refer to any kind
    of miscellaneous payment

    which the firm receives on behalf of a client and which are due to be paid to
    the client.

    CASS 5.5.28 R When a firm receives a client entitlement on behalf of a client,
    it must pay any part of it which is

    client money:

    (1) for client entitlements received in the United Kingdom, into a client bank
    account in

    accordance with CASS 5.5.5 R; or

    (2) for client entitlements received outside the United Kingdom, into any bank
    account

    operated by the firm, provided that such client money is:

    (a) paid to, or in accordance with, the instructions of the client concerned;
    or

    (b) paid into a client bank account in accordance with CASS 5.5.5 R (1), as soon
    as

    possible but no later than five business days after the firm is notified of its
    receipt.

    CASS 5.5.29 R A firm must take reasonable steps to ensure that a client entitlement
    which is client money is

    allocated within a reasonable period of time after notification of receipt.

    CASS 5.5.30 R Interest and investment returns

    (1) In relation to consumers, a firm must, subject to (2), take reasonable steps
    to ensure that

    its terms of business or other client agreements adequately explain, and where
    necessary

    obtain a client''s informed consent to, the treatment of interest and, if applicable,
    investment

    returns, derived from its holding of client money and any segregated designated

    investments.

    (2) In respect of interest earned on client bank accounts, (1) does not apply
    if a firm has

    reasonable ground to be satisfied that in relation to insurance distribution activities
    carried

    on with or for a consumer the amount of interest earned will be not more than
    £20 per

    transaction.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.5.31 G If no interest is payable to a consumer, that fact should be separately
    identified in the firm''s

    client agreement or terms of business.

    CASS 5.5.32 G If a firm outlines its policy on its payment of interest, it need
    not necessarily disclose the actual

    rates prevailing at any particular time; the firm should disclose the terms, for
    example, the

    relevant reference rate plus or minus ''x'' percentage points.

    CASS 5.5.33 G Transfer of client money to a third party

    CASS 5.5.34 R sets out the requirements a firm must comply with when it transfers
    client

    money to another person without discharging its fiduciary duty owed to that client.
    Such

    circumstances arise when, for example, a firm passes client money to another broker
    for the

    purposes of the client''s transaction being effected. A firm can only discharge
    itself from its

    fiduciary duty by acting in accordance with, and in the circumstances permitted
    by, CASS

    5.5.80 R.

    CASS 5.5.34 R A firm may allow another person, such as another broker to hold
    or control client money, but

    only if:

    (1) the firm transfers the client money for the purpose of a transaction for a
    client through or

    with that person; and

    (2) in the case of a consumer, that customer has been notified (whether through
    a client

    agreement, terms of business, or otherwise in writing) that the client money may
    be

    transferred to another person.

    CASS 5.5.35 G In relation to the notification required by CASS 5.5.34 R (2), there
    is no need for a firm to make

    a separate disclosure in relation to each transfer made.

    CASS 5.5.36 G A firm should not hold excess client money with another broker.
    It should be held in a client

    bank account.

    CASS 5.5.37 G Client bank accounts

    The FCA generally requires a firm to place client money in a client bank account
    with an

    approved bank. However, a firm which is an approved bank must not (subject to
    CASS 5.1.1 R

    (2)(e)) hold client money in an account with itself.

    CASS 5.5.38 R (1) A firm must ensure that client money is held in a client bank
    account at one or more

    approved banks.

    (2) If the firm is a bank, it must not hold client money in an account with itself.

    CASS 5.5.39 R A firm may open one or more client bank accounts in the form of
    a designated client bank

    account. Characteristics of these accounts are that:

    (1) the account holds money of one or more clients;

    (2) the account includes in its title the word ''designated'';

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (3) the clients whose money is in the account have each consented in writing to
    the use of

    the bank with which the client money is to be held; and

    (4) in the event of the failure of that bank, the account is not pooled with any
    other type of

    account unless a primary pooling event occurs.

    CASS 5.5.40 G (1) A firm may operate as many client accounts as it wishes.

    (2) A firm is not obliged to offer its clients the facility of a designated client
    bank account.

    (3) Where a firm holds money in a designated client bank account, the effect upon
    either:

    (a) the failure of a bank where any other client bank account is held; or

    (b) the failure of a third party to whom money has been transferred out of any
    other client

    bank account in accordance with CASS 5.5.34 R;

    (each of which is a secondary pooling event) is that money held in the designated
    client

    bank account is not pooled with money held in any other account. Accordingly clients
    whose

    money is held in a designated client bank account will not share in any shortfall
    resulting

    from a failure of the type described in (a) or (b).

    (4) Where a firm holds client money in a designated client bank account, the effect
    upon the

    failure of the firm (which is a primary pooling event ) is that money held in
    the designated

    client bank account is pooled with money in every other client bank account of
    the firm.

    Accordingly, clients whose money is held in a designated client bank account will
    share in

    any shortfall resulting from a failureof the firm.

    CASS 5.5.41 R A firm may hold client money with a bank that is not an approved
    bank if all the following

    conditions are met:

    (1) the client money relates to one or more insurance transactions which are subject
    to the

    law or market practice of a jurisdiction outside the United Kingdom;

    (2) because of the applicable law or market practice of that overseas jurisdiction,
    it is not

    possible to hold the client money in a client bank account with an approved bank;

    (3) the firm holds the money with such a bank for no longer than is necessary
    to effect the

    transactions;

    (4) the firm notifies each relevant client and has, in relation to a consumer,
    a client

    agreement, or terms of business which adequately explain that:

    (a) client money will not be held with an approved bank;

    (b) in such circumstances, the legal and regulatory regime applying to the bank
    with

    which the client money is held will be different from that of the United Kingdom
    and, in

    the event of a failure of the bank, the client money may be treated differently
    from the

    treatment which would apply if the client money were held by an approved bank
    in the

    United Kingdom; and

    (c) if it is the case, the particular bank has not accepted that it has no right
    of set-off or

    counterclaim against money held in a client bank account, in respect of any sum
    owed

    on any other account of the firm, notwithstanding the firm''s request to the bank
    as

    required by CASS 5.5.49 R; and

    (5) the client money is held in a designated bank account.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.5.42 G A firm''s selection of a bank

    A firm owes a duty of care to a client when it decides where to place client money.
    The review

    required by CASS 5.5.43 R is intended to ensure that the risks inherent in placing
    client money

    with a bank are minimised or appropriately diversified by requiring a firm to
    consider carefully

    the bank or banks with which it chooses to place client money. For example, a
    firm which is

    likely only to hold relatively modest amounts of client money will be likely to
    be able to satisfy

    this requirement if it selects an authorised UK clearing bank.

    CASS 5.5.43 R Before a firm opens a client bank account and as often as is appropriate
    on a continuing basis

    (and no less than once in each financial year), it must take reasonable steps
    to establish that

    the bank is appropriate for that purpose.

    CASS 5.5.44 G A firm should consider diversifying placements of client money with
    more than one bank where

    the amounts are, for example, of sufficient size to warrant such diversification.

    CASS 5.5.45 G When considering where to place client money and to determine the
    frequency of the

    appropriateness test under CASS 5.5.43 R, a firm should consider taking into account,
    together

    with any other relevant matters:

    (1) the capital of the bank;

    (2) the amount of client money placed, as a proportion of the bank''s capital
    and deposits;

    (3) the credit rating of the bank (if available); and

    (4) to the extent that the information is available, the level of risk in the
    investment and loan

    activities undertaken by the bank and its affiliated companies.

    CASS 5.5.46 G A firm will be expected to perform due diligence when opening a
    client bank account with a

    bank that is authorised in the United Kingdom. Any continuing assessment of that
    bank may be

    restricted to verification that it remains authorised in the United Kingdom.

    CASS 5.5.47 R Group banks

    Subject to CASS 5.5.41 R, a firm that holds or intends to hold client money with
    a bank which is

    in the same group as the firm must:

    (1) undertake a continuous review in relation to that bank which is at least as
    rigorous as the

    review of any bank which is not in the same group, in order to ensure that the
    decision to

    use a group bank is appropriate for the client;

    (2) disclose in writing to its client at the outset of the client relationship
    (whether by way of a

    client agreement, terms of business or otherwise in writing) or, if later, not
    less than 20

    business days before it begins to hold client money of that client with that bank:

    (a) that it is holding or intends to hold client money with a bank in the same
    group;

    (b) the identity of the bank concerned; and

    (c) that the client may choose not to have his money placed with such a bank.

    CASS 5.5.48 R If a client has notified a firm in writing that he does not wish
    his money to be held with a bank in

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    the same group as the firm, the firm must either:

    (1) place that client money in a client bank account with another bank in accordance
    with

    CASS 5.5.38 R; or

    (2) return that client money to, or pay it to the order of, the client.

    CASS 5.5.49 R Notification and acknowledgement of trust (banks)

    When a firm opens a client bank account, the firm must give or have given written
    notice to the

    bank requesting the bank to acknowledge to it in writing:

    (1) that all money standing to the credit of the account is held by the firm as
    trustee (or if

    relevant in Scotland, as agent) and that the bank is not entitled to combine the
    account with

    any other account or to exercise any right of set-off or counterclaim against
    money in that

    account in respect of any sum owed to it on any other account of the firm; and

    (2) that the title of the account sufficiently distinguishes that account from
    any account

    containing money that belongs to the firm, and is in the form requested by the
    firm.

    CASS 5.5.50 R In the case of a client bank account in the United Kingdom, if the
    bank does not provide the

    acknowledgement referred to in CASS 5.5.49 R within 20 business days after the
    firm

    dispatched the notice, the firm must withdraw all money standing to the credit
    of the account

    and deposit it in a client bank account with another bank as soon as possible.

    CASS 5.5.51 R In the case of a client bank account outside the United Kingdom,
    if the bank does not provide

    the acknowledgement referred to in CASS 5.5.49 R within 20 business days after
    the firm

    dispatched the notice, the firm must notify the client of this fact as set out
    in CASS 5.5.53 R.

    CASS 5.5.52 G Firms are reminded of the provisions of CASS 5.5.41 R (4), which
    sets out the notification and

    consents required when using a bank that is not an approved bank.

    CASS 5.5.53 R Notification to clients: use of an approved bank outside the United

    Kingdom

    A firm must not hold, for a consumer, client money in a client bank account outside
    the United

    Kingdom, unless the firm has previously disclosed to the consumer (whether in
    its terms of

    business, client agreement or otherwise in writing):

    (1) that his money may be deposited in a client bank account outside the United
    Kingdom

    but that the client may notify the firm that he does not wish his money to be
    held in a

    particular jurisdiction;

    (2) that in such circumstances, the legal and regulatory regime applying to the
    approved

    bank will be different from that of the United Kingdom and, in the event of a
    failure of the

    bank, his money may be treated in a different manner from that which would apply
    if the

    client money were held by a bank in the United Kingdom; and

    (3) if it is the case, that a particular bank has not accepted that it has no
    right of set-off or

    counterclaim against money held in a client bank account in respect of any sum
    owed on

    any other account of the firm, notwithstanding the firm''s request to the bank
    as required by

    CASS 5.5.49 R.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.5.54 G There is no need for a firm to make a separate disclosure under
    CASS 5.5.53 R (1) and CASS

    5.5.53 R (2) in relation to each jurisdiction.

    CASS 5.5.55 G Firms are reminded of the provisions of CASS 5.5.41 R (4), which
    sets out the notification and

    consents required when using a bank that is not an approved bank.

    CASS 5.5.56 R If a client has notified a firm in writing before entering into
    a transaction that client money is not

    to be held in a particular jurisdiction, the firm must either:

    (1) hold the client money in a client bank account in a jurisdiction to which
    the client has not

    objected; or

    (2) return the client money to, or to the order of, the client.

    CASS 5.5.57 G Firms are reminded of the provisions of CASS 5.5.41 R (4), which
    sets out the notification and

    consents required when using a bank that is not an approved bank.

    CASS 5.5.58 R Notification to consumers: use of broker or settlement agent outside
    the

    United Kingdom

    A firm must not undertake any transaction for a consumer that involves client
    money being

    passed to another broker or settlement agent located in a jurisdiction outside
    the United

    Kingdom, unless the firm has previously disclosed to the consumer (whether in
    its terms of

    business, client agreement or otherwise in writing):

    (1) that his client money may be passed to a person outside the United Kingdom
    but the

    client may notify the firm that he does not wish his money to be passed to a person
    in a

    particular jurisdiction; and

    (2) that, in such circumstances, the legal and regulatory regime applying to the
    broker or

    settlement agent will be different from that of the United Kingdom and, in the
    event of a

    failure of the broker or settlement agent, this money may be treated in a different
    manner

    from that which would apply if the money were held by a broker or settlement agent
    in the

    United Kingdom.

    CASS 5.5.59 G There is no need for a firm to make a separate disclosure under
    CASS 5.5.58 R in relation to

    each jurisdiction.

    CASS 5.5.60 R If a client has notified a firm before entering into a transaction
    that he does not wish his money

    to be passed to another broker or settlement agent located in a particular jurisdiction,
    the firm

    must either:

    (1) hold the client money in a client bank account in the United Kingdom or a
    jurisdiction to

    which the money has not objected and pay its own money to the firm''s own account
    with the

    broker, agent or counterparty; or

    (2) return the money to, or to the order of, the client.

    CASS 5.5.61 R Notification to the FCA: failure of a bank, broker or settlement
    agent

    On the failure of a third party with which client money is held, a firm must notify
    the FCA:

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (1) as soon as it becomes aware, of the failure of any bank, other broker or settlement
    agent

    or other entity with which it has placed, or to which it has passed, client money;
    and

    (2) as soon as reasonably practical, whether it intends to make good any shortfall
    that has

    arisen or may arise and of the amounts involved.

    CASS 5.5.62 G Client money calculation and reconciliation

    (1) In order that a firm may check that it has sufficient money segregated in
    its client bank

    account (and held by third parties) to meet its obligations to clients it is required
    periodically

    to calculate the amount which should be segregated (the client money requirement)
    and to

    compare this with the amount shown as its client money resource. This calculation
    is, in the

    first instance, based upon the firm''s accounting records and is followed by a
    reconciliation

    with its banking records. A firm is required to make a payment into the client
    bank account if

    there is a shortfall or to remove any money which is not required to meet the
    firm''s

    obligations.

    (2) For the purpose of calculating its client money requirement two alternative
    calculation

    methods are permitted, but a firm must use the same method in relation to CASS
    5.3 and

    CASS 5.4. The first refers to individual client cash balances; the second to aggregate

    amounts of client money recorded on a firm business ledgers.

    CASS 5.5.63 R (1) A firm must, as often as is necessary to ensure the accuracy
    of its records and at least at

    intervals of not more than 25 business days:

    (a) check whether its client money resource, as determined by CASS 5.5.65 R on
    the

    previous business day, was at least equal to the client money requirement, as

    determined by CASS 5.5.66 R or CASS 5.5.68 R, as at the close of business on that

    day; and

    (b) ensure that:

    (i) any shortfall is paid into a client bank account by the close of business
    on the day

    the calculation is performed; or

    (ii) any excess is withdrawn within the same time period unless CASS 5.5.9 R or

    CASS 5.5.10 R applies to the extent that the firm is satisfied on reasonable grounds

    that it is prudent to maintain a positive margin to ensure the calculation in
    (a) is

    satisfied having regard to any unreconciled items in its business ledgers as at
    the

    date on which the calculations are performed; and

    (c) include in any calculation of its client money requirement (whether calculated
    in

    accordance with CASS 5.5.66 R or CASS 5.5.68 R) any amounts attributable to client

    money received by its appointed representatives, field representatives or other
    agents

    and which, as at the date of calculation, it is required to segregate in accordance
    with

    CASS 5.5.19 R.

    (2) A firm must within ten business days of the calculation in (a) reconcile the
    balance on

    each client bank account as recorded by the firm with the balance on that account
    as set out

    in the statement or other form of confirmation used by the bank with which that
    account is

    held.

    (3) When any discrepancy arises as a result of the reconciliation carried out
    in (2), the firm

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    must identify the reason for the discrepancy and correct it as soon as possible,
    unless the

    discrepancy arises solely as a result of timing differences between the accounting
    systems

    of the party providing the statement or confirmation and those of the firm.

    (4) While a firm is unable to resolve a difference arising from a reconciliation,
    and one

    record or a set of records examined by the firm during its reconciliation indicates
    that there

    is a need to have a greater amount of client money than is in fact the case, the
    firm must

    assume, until the matter is finally resolved, that the record or set of records
    is accurate and

    either pay its own money into a relevant account or make a withdrawal of any excess.

    CASS 5.5.64 R A firm must keep a record of whether it calculates its client money
    requirement in accordance

    with CASS 5.5.66 R or CASS 5.5.68 R and may only use one method during each annual

    accounting period (which method must be the same in relation to both CASS 5.3
    and CASS

    5.4).

    CASS 5.5.65 R Client money resource

    The client money resource, for the purposes of CASS 5.5.63 R (1)(a), is:

    (1) the aggregate of the balances on the firm''s client money bank accounts, as
    at the close

    of business on the previous business day and, if held in accordance with CASS
    5.4,

    designated investments (valued on a prudent and consistent basis) together with
    client

    money held by a third party in accordance with CASS 5.5.34 R; and

    (2) (but only if the firm is comparing the client money resource with its client''s
    money

    (accruals) requirement in accordance with CASS 5.5.68 R) to the extent that client
    money is

    held in accordance with CASS 5.3 (statutory trust), insurance debtors (which in
    this case

    cannot include pre-funded items); and

    (3) (but only if the firm is comparing the client money resource with its client''s
    money

    (accruals) requirement in accordance with CASS 5.5.68 R) to the extent that client
    money is

    held in accordance with CASS 5.4 (non-statutory trust):

    (a) all insurance debtors (including pre-funded items whether in respect of advance

    premiums, claims, premium refunds or otherwise) shown in the firm''s business
    ledgers

    as amounts due from clients, insurance undertakings and other persons, such debts

    valued on a prudent and consistent basis to the extent required to meet any shortfall
    of

    the client money resource compared with the firm''s client money requirement;
    and

    (b) the amount of any letter of credit or unconditional guarantee provided by
    an approved

    bank and held on the terms of the trust (or, in Scotland, agency), limited to:

    (i) the maximum sum payable by the approved bank under the letter of credit or

    guarantee; or

    (ii) if less, the amount which would, apart from the benefit of the letter of
    credit or

    guarantee, be the shortfall of the client money resource compared with the client

    money requirement under CASS 5.5.66 R or CASS 5.5.68 R.

    But a firm may treat a transaction with an insurance undertaking which is not
    a UK domestic

    firm as complete, and accordingly may (but only for the purposes of the calculation
    in (1))

    disregard any unreconciled items of client money transferred to an intermediate
    broker relating

    to such a transaction, if:

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (4) it has taken reasonable steps to ascertain whether the transaction is complete;
    and

    (5) it has no reason to consider the transaction has not been completed; and

    (6) a period of at least 12 months has elapsed since the money was transferred
    to the

    intermediate broker for the purpose of the transaction.

    CASS 5.5.66 R Client money (client balance) requirement

    A firm''s client money (client balance) requirement is the sum of, for all clients,
    the individual

    client balances calculated in accordance with CASS 5.5.67 R but excluding any
    individual

    balances which are negative (that is, uncleared client funds).

    CASS 5.5.67 R The individual client balance for each client must be calculated
    as follows:

    (1) the amount paid by a client to the firm (to include all premiums); plus

    (2) the amount due to the client (to include all claims and premium refunds);
    plus

    (3) the amount of any interest or investment returns due to the client;

    (4) less the amount paid to insurance undertakings for the benefit of the client
    (to include all

    premiums and commission due to itself) (i.e. commissions that are due but have
    not yet

    been removed from the client account);

    (5) less the amount paid by the firm to the client (to include all claims and
    premium refunds);

    and where the individual client balance is found by the sum ((1) + (2) + (3))
    - ((4) + (5)).

    CASS 5.5.68 R Client money (accruals) requirement

    A firm''s client money (accruals) requirement is the sum of the following:

    (1) all insurance creditors shown in the firm''s business ledgers as amounts due
    to insurance

    undertakings, clients and other persons; plus

    (2) unearned commission being the amount of commission shown as accrued (but not

    shown as due and payable) as at the date of the calculation (a prudent estimate
    must be

    used if the firm is unable to produce an exact figure at the date of the calculation).

    CASS 5.5.69 R A firm which calculates its client money requirement on the preceding
    basis must in addition

    and within a reasonable period be able to match its client money resource to its
    requirement by

    reference to individual clients (with such matching being achieved for the majority
    of its clients

    and transactions).

    CASS 5.5.76 R Failure to perform calculations or reconciliation

    A firm must notify the FCA immediately if it is unable to, or does not, perform
    the calculation

    required by CASS 5.5.63 R (1).

    CASS 5.5.77 R A firm must notify the FCA immediately it becomes aware that it
    may not be able to make good

    any shortfall identified by CASS 5.5.63 R (1) by the close of business on the
    day the calculation

    is performed and if applicable when the reconciliation is completed.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.5.79 G Discharge of fiduciary duty

    The purpose of CASS 5.5.80 R to CASS 5.5.83 R is to set out those situations in
    which a firm

    will have fulfilled its contractual and fiduciary obligations in relation to any
    client money held for

    or on behalf of its client, or in relation to the firm''s ability to require repayment
    of that money

    from a third party.

    CASS 5.5.80 R Money ceases to be client money if it is paid:

    (1) to the client, or a duly authorised representative of the client; or

    (2) to a third party on the instruction of or with the specific consent of the
    client, but not if it is

    transferred to a third party in the course of effecting a transaction, in accordance
    with CASS

    5.5.34 R; or

    (3) into a bank account of the client (not being an account which is also in the
    name of the

    firm); or

    (4) to the firm itself, when it is due and payable to the firm in accordance with
    CASS 5.1.5 R

    (1); or

    (5) to the firm itself, when it is an excess in the client bank account as set
    out in CASS

    5.5.63 R (1)(b)(ii); or

    (6) to a dormant asset fund operator under the applicable provisions of Part 1
    of the

    Dormant Assets Act 2022 and in accordance with CASS 5.5.85R.

    CASS 5.5.81 G (1) A firm which pays professional fees (for example to a loss adjuster
    or valuer) on behalf

    of a client may do so in accordance with CASS 5.5.80 R (2) where this is done
    on the

    instruction of or with the consent of the client.

    (2) When a firm wishes to transfer client money balances to a third party in the
    course of

    transferring its business to another firm, it should do so in compliance with
    CASS 5.5.80 R

    and a transferee firm will come under an obligation to treat any client money
    so transferred

    in accordance with these rules.

    (3) Firms are reminded of their obligation, when transferring money to third parties
    in

    accordance with CASS 5.5.34 R, to use appropriate skill, care and judgment in
    their

    selection of third parties in order to ensure adequate protection of client money.

    (4) Firms are reminded that, in order to calculate their client money resource
    in accordance

    with CASS 5.5.63 R to CASS 5.5.65 R, they will need to have systems in place to
    produce

    an accurate accounting record showing how much client money is being held by third

    parties at any point in time. For the purposes of CASS 5.5.63 R to CASS 5.5.65
    R, however,

    a firm must assume that monies remain at an intermediate broker awaiting completion
    of the

    transaction unless it has received confirmation that the transaction has been
    completed.

    (5) A payment of client money under section 21 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022
    to a

    dormant asset fund operator that has Part 4A permission for dealing with unwanted
    asset

    money would amount to a payment to a third party with the instruction of the client
    for the

    purposes of CASS 5.5.80R(2).

    CASS 5.5.82 R When a firm draws a cheque or other payable order to discharge its
    fiduciary duty under CASS

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    5.5.80 R, it must continue to treat the sum concerned as client money until the
    cheque or order

    is presented and paid by the bank.

    CASS 5.5.83 R For the purposes of CASS 5.1.5 R, if a firm makes a payment to,
    or on the instructions of, a

    client, from an account other than a client bank account, until that payment has
    cleared, no

    equivalent sum will become due and payable to the firm or may be withdrawn from
    a client bank

    account by way of reimbursement.

    CASS 5.5.84 R Records

    A firm must ensure that proper records, sufficient to show and explain the firm''s
    transactions

    and commitments in respect of its client money, are made and retained for a period
    of three

    years after they were made.

    CASS 5.5.85 R Transfers of client money to a dormant asset fund operator under
    Part 1

    of the Dormant Assets Act 2022

    A firm may transfer a client money balance to a dormant asset fund operator under
    the

    applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022. If it does so
    the transferred

    balance will cease to be client money under CASS 5.5.80R(6), provided that the
    firm can

    demonstrate it took reasonable steps to trace the client concerned and to return
    the balance

    prior to making such a transfer.

    CASS 5.5.86 E (1)

    (a) This paragraph applies where the balance of client money in question is of
    a minimal

    amount. For these purposes, a ‘minimal amount’ means either:

    (i) in respect of a balance held for a consumer, £25 or less in aggregate; or

    (ii) in respect of a balance held for a commercial customer, £100 or less in

    aggregate.

    (b) Where the balance of client money in question is of a minimal amount, taking

    reasonable steps in CASS 5.5.85R includes the firm making at least one attempt
    to

    contact the client to return the balance (using the most up-to-date contact details
    the firm

    has for the client) and allowing the client 28 days to respond.

    (2) This paragraph applies in all other cases where paragraph (1) does not apply.
    In all other

    such cases, taking reasonable steps in CASS 5.5.85R includes following this course
    of

    conduct:

    (a) determining, as far as reasonably possible, the correct contact details for
    the relevant

    client;

    (b) writing to the client at the last known address either by post or by electronic
    mail to

    inform it of the firm’s intention to no longer treat the client money balance
    as client

    money and to transfer the sums concerned to a dormant asset fund operator if the
    firm

    does not receive instructions from the client within 28 days (naming the specific
    relevant

    dormant asset fund operator);

    (c) where the client has not responded after the 28 days referred to in (b), attempting
    to

    communicate the information set out in (b) to the client on at least one further
    occasion

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    by any means other than that used in (b), including by post, electronic mail,
    telephone or

    media advertisement;

    (d) subject to (e) and (f), where the client has not responded within 28 days
    following the

    most recent communication, writing again to the client at the last known address
    either

    by post or by electronic mail to inform them:

    (i) that, as the firm did not receive a claim for the relevant client money balance,
    it will

    in 28 days transfer the balance to a dormant asset fund operator (naming the specific

    relevant dormant asset fund operator); and

    (ii) of the steps that they must take to make a repayment claim;

    (e) if the firm has carried out the steps in (b) or (c) and in response has received
    positive

    confirmation in writing that the client is no longer at a particular address,
    the firm should

    not use that address for the purposes of (d);

    (f) if, after carrying out the steps in (a), (b) and (c), the firm has obtained
    positive

    confirmation that none of the contact details it holds for the relevant client
    are accurate

    or, if utilised, the communication is unlikely to reach the client, the firm does
    not have to

    comply with (d); and

    (g) waiting a further 28 days following the most recent communication under this
    rule

    before transferring the balance to the dormant asset fund operator.

    (3) Compliance with (1) or (2) (as applicable) may be relied on as tending to
    establish

    compliance with CASS 5.5.85R.

    (4) Contravention of (1) or (2) (as applicable) may be relied on as tending to
    establish

    contravention of CASS 5.5.85R.

    CASS 5.5.87 G (1) Unless the firm has failed and CASS 5.3.2R(4) or CASS 5.4.7R(4)
    applies (as

    applicable), any costs associated with a firm ceasing to treat unclaimed client
    money

    balances as client money pursuant to CASS 5.5.85R should be paid for from the
    firm’s own

    funds.

    (2) When transferring a client money balance to a dormant asset fund operator
    under the

    applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022, a firm will need
    to consider

    its obligations under any contractual or other arrangements of the sort described
    at section

    23 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022 in addition to meeting its obligations under
    the client

    money rules and the client money (insurance) distribution rules.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.6 Client money distribution

    CASS 5.6.1 R Application

    (1) CASS 5.6 (the client money (insurance) distribution rules) applies to a firm
    that in holding

    client money is subject to CASS 5.3 (statutory trust) or CASS 5.4 (Non-statutory
    trust) when

    a primary pooling event or a secondary pooling event occurs.

    (2) In the event of there being any discrepancy between the terms of the trust
    as required by

    CASS 5.4.7 R (1)(c) and the provisions of CASS 5.6, the latter shall apply.

    CASS 5.6.2 G (1) The client money (insurance) distribution rules have force and
    effect on any firm that

    holds client money in accordance with CASS 5.3 or CASS 5.4. Therefore, they may
    apply to

    a UK branch of a an overseas firm. In this case, the UK branch of the firm may
    be treated as

    if the branch itself is a free-standing entity subject to the client money (insurance)

    distribution rules.

    (2) Firms that act in accordance with CASS 5.4 (Non-statutory trust) are reminded
    that the

    client money (insurance) distribution rules should be given effect in the terms
    of trust

    required by CASS 5.4.

    CASS 5.6.3 G Purpose

    The client money (insurance) distribution rules seek to facilitate the timely
    return of client

    money to a client in the event of the failure of a firm or third party at which
    the firm holds client

    money.

    CASS 5.6.4 G Failure of the authorised firm: primary pooling event

    A primary pooling event triggers a notional pooling of all the client money, in
    every type of client

    money account, and the obligation to distribute it.

    CASS 5.6.5 R A primary pooling event occurs:

    (1) on the failure of the firm; or

    (2) on the vesting of assets in a trustee in accordance with an ''assets requirement''
    imposed

    under 55P(1)(b) or (c) (as the case may be) of the Act; or

    (3) on the coming into force of a requirement for all client money held by the
    firm; or

    (4) when the firm notifies, or is in breach of its duty to notify, the FCA, in
    accordance with

    CASS 5.5.77 R, that it is unable correctly to identify and allocate in its records
    all valid

    claims arising as a result of a secondary pooling event.

    CASS 5.6.6 R CASS 5.6.5 R (4) does not apply so long as:

    (1) the firm is taking steps, in consultation with the FCA, to establish those
    records; and

    (2) there are reasonable grounds to conclude that the records will be capable
    of rectification

    within a reasonable period.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.6.7 R Pooling and distribution

    If a primary pooling event occurs:

    (1) client money held in each client money account of the firm is treated as pooled;

    (2) the firm must distribute that client money in accordance with CASS 5.3.2 R
    or, as

    appropriate, CASS 5.4.7 R, so that each client receives a sum which is rateable
    to the client

    money entitlement calculated in accordance with CASS 5.5.66 R;

    (3) the firm must, as trustee, call in and make demand in respect of any debt
    due to the firm

    as trustee, and must liquidate any designated investment, and any letter of credit
    or

    guarantee upon which it relies for meeting any shortfall in its client money resource
    and the

    proceeds shall be pooled together with other client money as in (1) and distributed
    in

    accordance with (2) and;

    (4)

    (a) subject to (b), as an alternative to distributing a client’s client money
    to them under

    (2), a firm may transfer all of that client’s client money to a dormant asset
    fund operator

    under the applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022 and in

    accordance with CASS 5.5.85R; and

    (b) as a consequence of any such transfer to a dormant asset fund operator, the
    firm

    must not distribute to any other client an amount of money that would be less
    than that

    which such other client was entitled to have distributed under this rule.

    CASS 5.6.7A G The purpose of CASS 5.6.7R(4)(b) is to ensure that where a particular
    client’s client money is

    transferred under CASS 5.6.7R(4)(a) to a dormant asset fund operator, such a transfer
    does

    not prejudice any other client. This means, for example, that the amount that
    may be

    transferred to a dormant asset fund operator under that provision should take
    account of any

    shortfall that affects the relevant clients.

    CASS 5.6.8 G A client''s main claim is for the return of client money held in
    a client bank account. A client may

    claim for any shortfall against money held in a firm''s own account. For that
    claim, the client will

    be an unsecured creditor of the firm.

    CASS 5.6.9 R Client money received after the failure of the firm

    Client money received by the firm (including in its capacity as trustee under
    CASS 5.4 (Nonstatutory trust)) after a primary pooling event must not be pooled
    with client money held in any

    client money account operated by the firm at the time of the primary pooling event.
    It must be

    placed in a client bank account that has been opened after that event and must
    be handled in

    accordance with the client money rules, and returned to the relevant client without
    delay, except

    to the extent that:

    (1) it is client money relating to a transaction that has not completed at the
    time of the

    primary pooling event; or

    (2) it is money relating to a client, for whom the client money requirement, calculated
    in

    accordance with CASS 5.5.66 R or CASS 5.5.68 R, shows that money is due from the
    client

    to the firm including in its capacity as trustee under CASS 5.4 (Non-statutory
    trust) at the

    time of the primary pooling event.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.6.10 G Client money received after the primary pooling event relating to
    an incomplete transaction

    should be used to complete that transaction.

    CASS 5.6.11 R If a firm receives a mixed remittance after a primary pooling event,
    it must:

    (1) pay the full sum into the separate client bank account opened in accordance
    with CASS

    5.6.9 R; and

    (2) pay the money that is not client money out of that client bank account into
    the firm''s own

    bank account within one business day of the day on which the remittance is cleared.

    CASS 5.6.12 G Whenever possible the firm should seek to split a mixed remittance
    before the relevant

    accounts are credited.

    CASS 5.6.12A R Closing a client money pool - transfers to dormant asset fund operator

    (1) This rule applies to a firm which, prior to a primary pooling event, had put
    in place

    contractual or other arrangements with a dormant asset fund operator of the sort
    described

    at section 23 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022.

    (2) If, having attempted to, a firm is unable to distribute a balance of client
    money in

    accordance with CASS 5.6.7R to the relevant client, it must attempt to transfer
    the balance

    to a dormant asset fund operator under the applicable provisions of Part 1 of
    the Dormant

    Assets Act 2022 and in accordance with CASS 5.5.85R.

    CASS 5.6.12B G (1) A firm may be unable to distribute a balance of client money
    in accordance with CASS

    5.6.7R for reasons including that:

    (a) the firm is unable to trace the relevant client; or

    (b) despite the firm making enquiries, the relevant client has not provided the
    firm with

    instructions that would enable the firm to make a distribution.

    (2) Where the firm transfers a balance to a dormant asset fund operator under
    the

    applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022 and in accordance
    with

    CASS 5.5.85R, it may cease to treat the balance as client money under CASS 5.5.80R(6).

    (3) In attempting to transfer the balance to a dormant asset fund operator under
    CASS

    5.6.12AR(2), the firm should begin by seeking confirmation from the relevant dormant
    asset

    fund operator as to whether or not it would be in a position to accept the balance.

    CASS 5.6.13 R Failure of a bank, other broker or settlement agent: secondary pooling

    events

    If both a primary pooling event and a secondary pooling event occur, the provisions
    of this

    section relating to a primary pooling event apply.

    CASS 5.6.14 R A secondary pooling event occurs on the failure of a third party
    to which client money held by

    the firm has been transferred under CASS 5.5.34 R.

    CASS 5.6.15 R CASS 5.6.20 R to CASS 5.6.31 R do not apply if, on the failure of
    the third party, the firm

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    repays to its clients or pays into a client bank account, at an unaffected bank,
    an amount equal

    to the amount of client money which would have been held if a shortfall had not
    occurred at that

    third party.

    CASS 5.6.16 G When client money is transferred to a third party, a firm continues
    to owe a fiduciary duty to the

    client. However, consistent with a fiduciary''s responsibility (whether as agent
    or trustee) for third

    parties under general law, a firm will not be held responsible for a shortfall
    in client money

    caused by a third party failure if it has complied with those duties.

    CASS 5.6.17 G To comply with its duties, the firm should show proper care:

    (1) in the selection of a third party; and

    (2) when monitoring the performance of the third party.

    In the case of client money transferred to a bank, by demonstrating compliance
    with CASS

    5.5.43 R, a firm should be able to demonstrate that it has taken reasonable steps
    to comply

    with its duties.

    CASS 5.6.18 G Failure of a bank

    When a bank fails and the firm decides not to make good the shortfall in the amount
    of client

    money held at that bank, a secondary pooling event will occur in accordance with
    CASS 5.6.20

    R. The firm would be expected to reflect the shortfall that arises at the firm''s
    bank in the

    periodic client money calculation by reducing the client money resource and client
    money

    requirement accordingly.

    CASS 5.6.19 G The client money (insurance) distribution rules seek to ensure that
    clients who have previously

    specified that they are not willing to accept the risk of the bank that has fails,
    and who therefore

    requested that their client money be placed in a designated client bank account
    as a different

    bank, should not suffer the loss of the bank that has failed.

    CASS 5.6.20 R Failure of a bank: pooling

    If a secondary pooling event occurs as a result of the failure of a bank where
    one or more

    general client bank accounts are held, then:

    (1) in relation to every general client bank account of the firm, the provisions
    of CASS 5.6.22

    R and CASS 5.6.26 R to CASS 5.6.28 G will apply;

    (2) in relation to every designated client bank account held by the firm with
    the failed bank,

    the provisions of CASS 5.6.24 R and CASS 5.6.26 R to CASS 5.6.28 G will apply;
    and

    (3) any money held at a bank, other than the bank that has failed, in designated
    client bank

    accounts is not pooled with any other client money.

    CASS 5.6.21 R If a secondary pooling event occurs as a result of the failure of
    a bank where one or more

    designated client bank accounts are held then in relation to every designated
    client bank

    account held by the firm with the failed bank, the provisions of CASS 5.6.24 R
    and CASS

    5.6.26 R to CASS 5.6.28 G will apply.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 5.6.22 R Money held in each general client bank account of the firm must
    be treated as pooled and:

    (1) any shortfall in client money held, or which should have been held, in general
    client bank

    accounts, that has arisen as a result of the failure of the bank, must be borne
    by all the

    clients whose client money is held in a general client bank account of the firm,
    rateably in

    accordance with their entitlements;

    (2) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each client by the firm,
    to reflect

    the requirements in (1), and the firm''s records must be amended to reflect the
    reduced client

    money entitlement;

    (3) the firm must make and retain a record of each client''s share of the client
    money shortfall

    at the failed bank until the client is repaid; and

    (4) the firm must use the new client entitlements, calculated in accordance with
    (2), when

    performing the client money calculation in accordance with CASS 5.5.63 R to CASS
    5.5.69

    R.

    CASS 5.6.23 G The term ''which should have been held'' is a reference to the failed
    bank''s failure (and

    elsewhere, as appropriate, is a reference to the other failed third party''s failure)
    to hold the

    client money at the time of the pooling event.

    CASS 5.6.24 R For each client with a designated client bank account held at the
    failed bank:

    (1) any shortfall in client money held, or which should have been held, in designated
    client

    bank accounts that has arisen as a result of the failure, must be borne by all
    the clients

    whose client money is held in a designated client bank account of the firm at
    the failed bank,

    rateably in accordance with their entitlements;

    (2) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each of the relevant
    clients by the

    firm, and the firm''s records must be amended to reflect the reduced client money

    entitlement;

    (3) the firm must make and retain a record of each client''s share of the client
    money shortfall

    at the failed bank until the client is repaid; and

    (4) the firm must use the new client money entitlements, calculated in accordance
    with (2),

    when performing the periodic client money calculation, in accordance with CASS
    5.5.63 R to

    CASS 5.5.69 R.

    CASS 5.6.25 R A client whose money was held, or which should have been held, in
    a designated client bank

    account with a bank that has failed is not entitled to claim in respect of that
    money against any

    other client bank account or client transaction account of the firm.

    CASS 5.6.26 R Client money received after the failure of a bank

    Client money received by the firm after the failure of a bank, that would otherwise
    have been

    paid into a client bank account at that bank:

    (1) must not be transferred to the failed bank unless specifically instructed
    by the client in

    order to settle an obligation of that client to the failed bank; and

    (2) must be, subject to (1), placed in a separate client bank account that has
    been opened

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    after the secondary pooling event and either:

    (a) on the written instruction of the client, transferred to a bank other than
    the one that

    has failed; or

    (b) returned to the client as soon as possible.

    CASS 5.6.27 R If a firm receives a mixed remittance after the secondary pooling
    event which consists of client

    money that would have been paid into a general client bank account, a designated
    client bank

    account or a designated client fund account maintained at the bank that has failed,
    it must:

    (1) pay the full sum into a client bank account other than one operated at the
    bank that has

    failed; and

    (2) pay the money that is not client money out of that client bank account within
    one

    business day of the day on which the remittance is cleared.

    CASS 5.6.28 G Whenever possible the firm should seek to split a mixed remittance
    before the relevant

    accounts are credited.

    CASS 5.6.29 R Failure of an intermediate broker or settlement agent: pooling

    If a secondary pooling event occurs as a result of the failure of another broker
    or settlement

    agent to whom the firm has transferred client''s money then, in relation to every
    general client

    bank account of the firm, the provisions of CASS 5.6.26 R to CASS 5.6.28 G and
    CASS 5.6.30

    R will apply.

    CASS 5.6.30 R Money held in each general client bank account of the firm must
    be treated as pooled and:

    (1) any shortfall in client money held, or which should have been held, in general
    client bank

    accounts, that has arisen as a result of the failure, must be borne by all the
    clients whose

    client money is held in a general client bank account of the firm, rateably in
    accordance with

    their entitlements;

    (2) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each client by the firm,
    to reflect

    the requirements of (1), and the firm''s records must be amended to reflect the
    reduced client

    money entitlement;

    (3) the firm must make and retain a record of each client''s share of the client
    money shortfall

    at the failed intermediate broker or settlement agent until the client is repaid;
    and

    (4) the firm must use the new client money entitlements, calculated in accordance
    with (2),

    when performing the periodic client money calculation, in accordance with CASS
    5.5.63 R to

    CASS 5.5.69 R.

    CASS 5.6.31 R Client money received after the failure of a broker or settlement
    agent

    Client money received by the firm after the failure of another broker or settlement
    agent, to

    whom the firm has transferred client money that would otherwise have been paid
    into a client

    bank account at that broker or settlement agent:

    (1) must not be transferred to the failed thirty party unless specifically instructed
    by the client

    in order to settle an obligation of that client to the failed broker or settlement
    agent; and

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (2) must be, subject to (1), placed in a separate client bank account that has
    been opened

    after the secondary pooling event and either:

    (a) on the written instruction of the client, transferred to a third party other
    than the one

    that has failed; or

    (b) returned to the client as soon as possible.

    CASS 5.6.32 R Notification on the failure of a bank, other broker or settlement
    agent

    The provisions of CASS 5.5.61 R apply.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5.8 Safe keeping of client''s documents and other assets

    CASS 5.8.1 R Application

    (1) CASS 5.8 applies to a firm (including in its capacity as trustee under CASS
    5.4) which in

    the course of insurance distribution activity takes into its possession for safekeeping
    any

    client title documents (other than documents of no value) or other tangible assets
    belonging

    to clients.

    (2) CASS 5.8 does not apply to a firm when:

    (a) carrying on an insurance distribution activity which is in respect of a reinsurance

    contract; or

    (b) acting in accordance with CASS 6 (Custody rules).

    CASS 5.8.2 G Purpose

    The rules in this section amplify the obligation in Principle 10 which requires
    a firm to arrange

    adequate protection for client''s assets. Firms carrying on insurance distribution
    activities may

    hold, on a temporary or longer basis, client title documents such as policy documents
    (other

    than policy documents of no value) and also items of physical property if, for
    example, a firm

    arranges for a valuation. The rules are intended to ensure that firms make adequate

    arrangements for the safe keeping of such property.

    CASS 5.8.3 R Requirement

    (1) A firm which has in its possession or control documents evidencing a client''s
    title to a

    contract of insurance or other similar documents (other than documents of no value)
    or

    which takes into its possession or control tangible assets belonging to a client,
    must take

    reasonable steps to ensure that any such documents or items of property:

    (a) are kept safe until they are delivered to the client;

    (b) are not delivered or given to any other person except in accordance with instructions

    given by the client; and that

    a record is kept as to the identity of any such documents or items of property
    and the dates

    on which they were received by the firm and delivered to the client or other person.

    (2) A firm must retain the record required in (1) for a period of three years
    after the

    document or property concerned is delivered to the client or other person.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 5 Annex 1 Segregation of designated investments: permitted investments,

    general principles and conditions (This Annex belongs to CASS 5.5.14 R)

    CASS 5 Annex 1

    1 The general principles which must be followed when client

    money segregation includes designated investments:

    (a) there must be a suitable

    spread of investments;

    (b) investments must be made in

    accordance with an

    appropriate liquidity strategy;

    (c) the investments must be in

    accordance with an

    appropriate credit risk policy;

    (d) any foreign exchange risks

    must be prudently managed.

    2 Table of permitted designated investments for the purpose of

    CASS 5.5.14 R (1).

    Investment type Qualification

    1. Negotiable debt security (a) Remaining term to

    (including a certificate of maturity of 5 years or less;

    deposit) and

    (b) The issuer or investment

    must have a short-term credit

    rating of A1 by Standard and

    Poor''s, or P1 by Moody''s

    Investor Services, or F1 by

    Fitch if the instrument has a

    remaining term to maturity of

    366 days or less; or a

    minimum long term credit

    rating of AA- by Standards

    and Poor''s, or Aa3 by

    Moody''s Investor Services or

    AA- by Fitch if the instrument

    has a term to maturity of

    more than 366 days.

    2. A repo in relation to As for 1 above and where the

    negotiable debt security credit rating of the

    counterparty also meets the

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    criteria in 1.

    3. Bond funds (a) An authorised fund or a

    recognised scheme or an

    investment company which is

    registered by the Securities

    and Exchange Commission

    of the United States of

    America under the

    Investment Company Act

    1940;

    (b) A minimum credit rating

    and risk rating of Aaf and S2

    respectively by Standard and

    Poor''s or Aa and MR2

    respectively by Moody''s

    Investor Services or AA and

    V2 respectively by Fitch.

    4. Money market fund (a) An authorised fund or a

    recognised scheme;

    (b) A minimum credit and risk

    rating of Aaa and MR1+

    respectively by Moody''s

    Investor Services or AAAm

    by Standard and Poor''s or

    AAA and V1+ respectively by

    Fitch.

    5. Derivatives Only for the purpose of

    prudently managing foreign

    currency risks.

    3 The general conditions which must be satisfied in the

    segregation of designated investments are:

    (a) any redemption of an

    investment must be by

    payment into the firm''s client

    money bank account;

    (b) where the credit or risk rating

    of a designated investment

    falls below the minimum set

    out in the Table, the firm must

    dispose of the investment as

    soon as possible and in any

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    event not later than 20

    business days following the

    downgrade;

    (c) where any investment or

    issuer has more than one

    rating, the lowest shall apply.

    CASS 5 Client money: insurance distribution activity www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 6 Custody rules

    CASS 6.1 Application

    CASS 6.2 Holding of client assets

    CASS 6.3 Depositing assets and arranging for assets to be deposited with third
    parties

    CASS 6.4 Use of safe custody assets

    CASS 6.6 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 6.7 Treatment of custody assets after a failure

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 6 Custody rules

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 6.1 Application

    CASS 6.1.1 R This chapter (the custody rules) applies to a firm:

    (1) [deleted]

    (a) [deleted]

    (b) [deleted]

    (1A) when it holds financial instruments belonging to a client in the course of
    its MiFID

    business;

    (1B) when it is safeguarding and administering investments, in the course of business
    that is

    not MiFID business;

    (1C) when it is acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF;

    (1D) when it is acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS; and

    (1E) in respect of any arrangement for a client to transfer full ownership of
    a safe custody

    asset (or an asset which would be a safe custody asset but for the arrangement)
    to the firm

    which is:

    (a) in the course of, or in connection with, the firm''s designated investment
    business;

    and

    (b) for the purpose of securing or otherwise covering present or future, actual
    or

    contingent or prospective obligations, and the application of the custody rules
    to a firm

    under this paragraph is set out in the rules and guidance in CASS 6.1.6 R to CASS
    6.1.9

    G; and

    (1F) when it is a small AIFM carrying on excluded custody activities.

    (2) [deleted]'
  display: CASS 1A.3.1
- id: 6.1.1
  chapter: '6'
  type: null
  title: A R In applying the custody rules to a small AIFM's excluded custody activities,
    any reference to a
  summary: null
  risk_ids: []
  default_control_ids: []
  applicability_conditions: null
  text: 'firm carrying on the regulated activities of safeguarding and administering
    investments,

    safeguarding and administering assets (without arranging) or arranging safeguarding
    and

    administration of assets includes those excluded custody activities that would,
    but for the

    exclusion in article 72AA of the RAO, amount to whichever of those regulated activities
    is

    referred to.

    CASS 6.1.1A G The regulated activity of safeguarding and administering investments
    covers both the

    safeguarding and administration of assets (without arranging) andarranging safeguarding
    and

    administration of assets, when those assets are either safe custody investments
    or custody

    assets. A safe custody investment is, in summary, a designated investment which
    a firm

    receives or holds on behalf of a client. Custody assets include designated investments,
    and any

    other assets that the firm holds or may hold in the same portfolio as a designated
    investment

    held for or on behalf of a client.

    CASS 6.1.1B R (1) Firms to which the custody rules apply by virtue of CASS 6.1.1R
    (1B) or (1E) must also

    apply the custody rules to those custody assets which are not safe custody investments
    in a

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    manner appropriate to the nature and value of those custody assets.

    (2) Firms to which the custody rules apply by virtue of CASS 6.1.1R (1C) must
    also apply

    the custody rules:

    (a) to those custody assets which are not AIF custodial assets but are safe custody

    investments; and

    (b) in a manner appropriate to the nature and value of those custody assets, to
    those

    custody assets which are neither AIF custodial assets nor safe custody investments.

    (3) Firms to which the custody rules apply by virtue of CASS 6.1.1R(1D) must also
    apply

    them:

    (a) to those custody assets which are not UCITS custodial assets but are safe
    custody

    investments; and

    (b) in a manner appropriate to the nature and value of those custody assets, to
    those

    custody assets which are neither UCITS custodial assets nor safe custody investments.

    CASS 6.1.1C G In accordance with article 42 of the Regulated Activities Order,
    a firm ("I") will not be arranging

    safeguarding and administration of assets if it introduces a client to another
    firm whose

    permitted activities include the safeguarding and administration of investments,
    or to an exempt

    person acting as such, with a view to that other firm or exempt person:

    (1) providing a safe custody service in the United Kingdom; or

    (2) arranging for the provision of a safe custody service in the United Kingdom
    by another

    person;

    and the other firm, exempt person or other person who is to provide the safe custody
    service is

    not in the same group as I, and does not remunerate I.

    CASS 6.1.2 G Firms are reminded that dividends (actual or payments in lieu), stock
    lending fees and other

    payments received for the benefit of a client, and which are due to the clients,
    should be held in

    accordance with the client money chapter where appropriate.

    CASS 6.1.4 R Business in the name of the firm

    The custody rules do not apply where a firm carries on business in its name but
    on behalf of the

    client where that is required by the very nature of the transaction and the client
    is in agreement.

    [Note: recital 51 to MiFID]

    CASS 6.1.5 G For example, this chapter does not apply where a firm borrows safe
    custody assets from a

    client as principal under a stock lending agreement.

    CASS 6.1.6 R Title transfer collateral arrangements

    (1) [deleted]

    (2) [deleted]

    (3)

    (a) A firm must not enter into a TTCA in respect of an asset belonging to a retail
    client.

    (b) Where a firm entered into a TTCA in respect of an asset belonging to a retail
    client

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (or one which would belong to a retail client but for the arrangement) before
    3 January

    2018, the firm must terminate that TTCA.

    [Note: article 16(10) of MiFID and article 5(5) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    (4) Except for CASS 6.1.6BR to CASS 6.1.9G and provided that the TTCA is not with
    a

    retail client, the custody rules do not apply to a firm in respect of an asset
    which is subject to

    a TTCA and which would otherwise be a safe custody asset.[Note: recital 52 to
    MiFID]

    CASS 6.1.6B R (1) A firm must ensure that any TTCA is the subject of a written
    agreement made on a

    durable medium between the firm and the client.

    (2) Regardless of the form of the agreement in (1) (which may have additional
    commercial

    purposes), it must cover the client''s agreement to:

    (a) the terms for the arrangement relating to the transfer of the client''s full
    ownership of

    the safe custody asset to the firm;

    (b) any terms under which the ownership of the safe custody asset is to transfer
    from the

    firm back to the client; and

    (c) (to the extent not covered by the terms under (b)), any terms for the termination
    of:

    (i) the arrangement under (a); or

    (ii) the overall agreement in (1).

    (3) A firm must retain a copy of the agreement under (1) from the date the agreement
    is

    entered into and until five years after the agreement is terminated.

    CASS 6.1.6C G The terms referred to in CASS 6.1.6BR (2)(b) may include, for example,
    terms under which the

    arrangement relating to the transfer of full ownership of the safe custody asset
    to the firm is not

    in effect from time to time, or is contingent on some other condition.

    CASS 6.1.6D R (1) A firm must properly consider and document the use of TTCAs
    in the context of:

    (a) the relationship between the client’s obligation to the firm; and

    (b) the safe custody assets subjected to TTCAs by the firm.

    (2) A firm must be able to demonstrate that it has complied with the requirement
    under (1).

    (3) When considering, and documenting, the appropriateness of the use of TTCAs,
    a firm

    must take into account the following factors:

    (a) whether there is only a very weak connection between the client’s obligation
    to the

    firm and the use of TTCAs, including whether the likelihood of a client’s liability
    to the

    firm is low or negligible;

    (b) the extent by which the amount of safe custody assets subject to a TTCA is
    in excess

    of the client’s obligations (including where the TTCA applies to all safe custody
    assets

    from the point of receipt by the firm) and whether the client might have no obligations
    at

    all to the firm; and

    (c) whether all the client’s safe custody assets are made subject to TTCAs, without

    consideration of what obligation the client has to the firm.

    (4) Where a firm uses a TTCA, it must highlight to the client the risks involved
    and the effect

    of any TTCA on the client’s safe custody assets.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    [Note: article 6 of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.1.6E G A firm may choose to combine its client communication under CASS
    6.1.6DR(4) with any

    communication made in order to comply with article 15.1(a)(ii) of the SFTR or
    CASS

    9.3.1R(2)(d).

    CASS 6.1.8 G Firms are reminded of the client''s best interests rule, which requires
    them to act honestly, fairly

    and professionally in accordance with the best interests of their clients when
    structuring their

    business particularly in respect of the effect of that structure on firms'' obligations
    under this

    chapter.

    CASS 6.1.8A R Termination of title transfer collateral arrangements

    (1) If a client communicates to a firm that it wishes (whether pursuant to a contractual
    right

    or otherwise) to terminate a TTCA and the client''s communication is not in writing,
    the firm

    must make a written record of the client''s communication which also records the
    date the

    communication was received.

    (2) A firm must keep a client''s written communication, or a written record of
    the client''s

    communication in (1), for five years, starting from the date the communication
    was received

    by the firm.

    (3)

    (a) If a firm agrees to the termination of a TTCA, it must notify the client of
    its agreement

    in writing. The notification must state when the termination is to take effect
    and whether

    or not the client''s safe custody asset will be held under the custody rules by
    the firm

    thereafter.

    (b) If a firm does not agree to terminate a TTCA, it must notify the client of
    its

    disagreement in writing.

    (4) A firm must keep a written record of any notification it makes to a client
    under (3) for a

    period of five years, starting from the date the notification was made.

    CASS 6.1.8B G CASS 6.1.8AR (3)(a) refers only to a firm''s agreement to terminate
    an existing TTCA. Such

    agreement by a firm does not necessarily need to amount to the termination of
    its entire

    agreement with the client.

    CASS 6.1.8C G When a firm notifies a client under CASS 6.1.8AR (3)(a) of when
    the termination of a TTCA is

    to take effect, it should take into account:

    (1) any relevant terms relating to such a termination that have been agreed with
    the client;

    and

    (2) the period of time it reasonably requires to return the safe custody asset
    to the client or

    to update the registration under (Holding of client assets) CASS 6.2and update
    its records

    under CASS 6.6 (Records, accounts and reconciliations).

    CASS 6.1.8D R If a TTCA is terminated, then the exemption at CASS 6.1.6R(4) no
    longer applies.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.1.8E G (1) Following the termination of a TTCA , where a firm does not
    immediately return the safe

    custody assets to the client the firm should consider whether the custody rules
    apply in

    respect of the safe custody assets pursuant to CASS 6.1.1R.

    (2) Where the custody rules apply to a firm for safe custody assets in these circumstances

    then the firm is required to comply with those rules and should, for example,
    update the

    registration under CASS 6.2(Holding of client assets), update its records under
    CASS 6.6

    (Records, accounts and reconciliations) and treat any shortfall in accordance
    with CASS

    6.6.54 R (in each case as appropriate).

    CASS 6.1.9 G Firms are reminded that, in certain cases, the collateral rules apply
    where a firm receives

    collateral from a client in order to secure the obligations of the client.

    CASS 6.1.9A G Prime brokerage agreements

    A prime brokerage firm is reminded of the additional obligations in CASS 9.3.1
    R which apply to

    prime brokerage agreements.

    CASS 6.1.10 G Affiliated companies - MiFID business

    The fact that a client is an affiliated company in respect of MiFID business does
    not affect the

    operation of the custody rules in relation to that client.

    CASS 6.1.10B R Affiliated companies - non-MiFID business

    In respect of a firm''s business falling under CASS 6.1.1R (1B), the custody rules
    do not apply to

    the firm when it is safeguarding and administering investments on behalf of an
    affiliated

    company, unless:

    (1) the firm has been notified that the designated investment belongs to a client
    of the

    affiliated company; or

    (2) the affiliated company is a client dealt with at arm''s length.

    CASS 6.1.12 R Delivery versus payment transaction exemption

    (1) Subject to (2) and CASS 6.1.12B R and with the written agreement of the relevant
    client,

    a firm need not treat this chapter as applying in respect of a delivery versus
    payment

    transaction through a commercial settlement system if:

    (a) in respect of a client''s purchase, the firm intends for the asset in question
    to be due

    to the client within one business day following the client''s fulfilment of its
    payment

    obligation to the firm; or

    (b) in respect of a client''s sale, the firm intends for the asset in question
    to be due to the

    firm within one business day following the firm''s fulfilment of its payment obligation
    to the

    client.

    (2) If the payment or delivery by the firm to the client has not occurred by the
    close of

    business on the third business day following the date on which a firm makes use
    of the

    exemption under (1), the firm must stop using that exemption for the transaction.

    (3) If the period referred to in CASS 6.1.12R (2) has expired before such a delivery
    versus

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    payment transaction through a commercial settlement system has settled, a firm
    may, until

    settlement and provided that doing so is consistent with the firm''s permissions
    and it

    complies with (4), segregate the firm''s own money as client money (in accordance
    with the

    client money rules) of an amount equivalent to the value at which that safe custody
    asset is

    reasonably expected to settle instead of holding the client''s safe custody assets
    (in

    accordance with the custody rules).

    (4) Where a firm intends to segregate money as client money instead of the client''s
    safe

    custody asset under (3) it must, before doing so, ensure that this would result
    in money

    being held for the relevant client in respect of the shortfall under CASS 7.17.2R
    (statutory

    trust).

    (5) Where a firm segregates an amount of client money instead of the client''s
    safe custody

    assets under (3) it must also:

    (a) ensure the money is segregated under CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client money)
    and

    recorded as being held for the relevant client(s) under CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts

    and reconciliations);

    (b) keep a record of the actions the firm has taken under this rule which includes
    a

    description of the safe custody asset in question, identifies the relevant affected
    client,

    and specifies the amount of money that the firm has appropriated as client money
    to

    cover the value of the safe custody asset; and

    (c) update the record made under (5)(b) when the transaction in question has settled
    and

    the firm has re-appropriated the money.

    CASS 6.1.12A G (1) The amount of client money a firm segregates for the purposes
    of CASS 6.1.12R (3)

    may be determined by the previous day''s closing mark to market valuation of the
    relevant

    safe custody asset or, if in relation to a particular safe custody asset none
    is available, the

    most recent available valuation.

    (2) Where a firm is segregating money for the purposes of CASS 6.1.12R (3) it
    should, as

    regularly as necessary, and having regard to Principle 10:

    (a) review the value of the safe custody asset in question in line with (1); and

    (b) where the firm has found that the value of the safe custody asset has changed,

    adjust the amount of money it has appropriated to ensure that these monies are

    sufficient to cover the latest value of the safe custody asset.

    CASS 6.1.12B R A firm cannot, in respect of a particular delivery versus payment
    transaction, make use of the

    exemption under CASS 6.1.12 R in either or both of the following circumstances:

    (1) it is not a direct member or participant of the relevant commercial settlement
    system, nor

    is it sponsored by such a member or participant, in accordance with the terms
    and

    conditions of that commercial settlement system;

    (2) the transaction in question is being settled by another person on behalf of
    the firm

    through an account held at the relevant commercial settlement system by that other
    person.

    CASS 6.1.12C G Where a firm does not meet the requirements in CASS 6.1.12 R or
    CASS 6.1.12B R for use of

    the exemption in CASS 6.1.12 R, the firm is subject to the custody rules in respect
    of any safe

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    custody asset it holds in connection with the delivery versus payment transaction
    in question.

    CASS 6.1.12D G (1) In line with CASS 6.1.12 R, where a firm receives a safe custody
    asset from a client in

    respect of a delivery versus payment transaction the firm is carrying out through
    a

    commercial settlement system in respect of a client''s sale, and the firm has
    not fulfilled its

    payment obligation to the client by close of business on the third business day
    following the

    date of the client''s fulfilment of its delivery obligation to the firm, the firm
    should consider

    whether the custody rules apply in respect of the safe custody asset pursuant
    to CASS

    6.1.1R (1A) to CASS 6.1.1R (1D).

    (2) Upon settlement of a delivery versus payment transaction a firm is carrying
    out through a

    commercial settlement system (including when it is settled within the three business
    day

    period referred to in CASS 6.1.12 R), in respect of:

    (a) a client''s purchase, the custody rules apply to the relevant safe custody
    asset the

    firm receives upon settlement; and

    (b) a client''s sale, the client money rules will apply to the relevant money
    received on

    settlement.

    CASS 6.1.12E R (1) If a firm makes use of the exemption under CASS 6.1.12 R, it
    must obtain the client''s

    written agreement to the firm''s use of this exemption.

    (2) In respect of each client, the written agreement in (1) must be retained during
    the time

    that the firm makes use, or intends to make use, of the exemption under CASS 6.1.12
    R in

    respect of that client''s safe custody assets.

    CASS 6.1.15 G Temporary handling of safe custody assets

    The custody rules do not apply if a firm temporarily handles a safe custody asset
    belonging to a

    client. A firm should temporarily handle a safe custody asset for no longer than
    is reasonably

    necessary. In most transactions this would be no longer than one business day,
    but it may be

    longer or shorter depending upon the transaction in question. For example, when
    a firm

    executes an order to sell shares which have not been registered on a de-materialised

    exchange, handling documents for longer periods may be reasonably necessary. However,
    in

    the case of safe custody assets in bearer form, the firm is expected to handle
    them for less than

    one business day. When a firm temporarily handles safe custody assets, it is still
    obliged to

    comply with Principle 10 (Clients'' assets).

    CASS 6.1.16 G When a firm temporarily handles a safe custody asset, in order to
    comply with its obligation to

    act in accordance with Principle 10 (Clients'' assets), the following are guides
    to good practice:

    (1) a firm should keep the safe custody asset secure, record it as belonging to
    that client,

    and forward it to the client or in accordance with the client''s instructions
    as soon as

    practicable after receiving it; and

    (2) a firm should make and retain a record of the fact that the firm has handled
    that safe

    custody asset and of the details of the client concerned and of any action the
    firm has taken.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.1.16A R Exemptions which do not apply to MiFID business

    The exemptions in CASS 6.1.16B R to CASS 6.1.16D G do not apply to a MiFID investment

    firm which holds financial instruments belonging to a client in the course of
    MiFID business.

    CASS 6.1.16BA Managers of AIFs and UCITS

    G

    (1) The custody rules do not apply to a firm that is managing an AIF or managing
    a UK

    UCITS in relation to excluded custody activities, except where the firm is a small
    AIFM.

    (2) The custody rules can apply to a firm that is managing an AIF or managing
    a UK UCITS

    in relation to activities that are not excluded custody activities. For example,
    where the firm:

    (a) holds financial instruments belonging to a client in the course of its MiFID
    business

    (see CASS 6.1.1R (1A)); or

    (b) is safeguarding and administering investments, in the course of business that
    is not

    MiFID business (see CASS 6.1.1R (1B)).

    CASS 6.1.16C R Personal investment firms

    The custody rules do not apply to a personal investment firm when it temporarily
    holds a

    designated investment, other than in bearer form, belonging to a client, if the
    firm:

    (1) keeps it secure, records it as belonging to that client, and forwards it to
    the client or in

    accordance with the client''s instructions, as soon as practicable after receiving
    it;

    (2) retains the designated investment for no longer than the firm has taken reasonable
    steps

    to determine is necessary to check for errors and to receive the final document
    in

    connection with any series of transactions to which the documents relate; and

    (3) makes a record, which must then be retained for a period of 5 years after
    the record is

    made, of all the designated investments handled in accordance with (1) and (2)
    together

    with the details of the clients concerned and of any action the firm has taken.

    CASS 6.1.16D G Administrative convenience alone should not lead a personal investment
    firm to rely on CASS

    6.1.16C R. Personal investment firms should consider what is in the client''s
    interest and not rely

    on CASS 6.1.16C R as a matter of course.

    CASS 6.1.16E R Trustees and depositaries (except depositaries of AIFs and UCITS)

    The specialist regime in CASS 6.1.16F R to CASS 6.1.16I G does not apply to a
    MiFID

    investment firm which holds financial instruments belonging to a client in the
    course of MiFID

    business.

    CASS 6.1.16F R When a trustee firm or depositary acts as a custodian for a trust
    or collective investment

    scheme, (except for a firm acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF and a firm
    acting as trustee

    or depositary of a UK UCITS), and:

    (1) the trust or scheme is established by written instrument; and

    (2) the trustee firm or depositary has taken reasonable steps to determine that
    the relevant

    law and provisions of the trust instrument or scheme constitution will provide
    protections at

    least equivalent to the custody rules for the trust property or scheme property;

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    the trustee firm or depositary need comply only with the custody rules listed
    in the table below.

    Reference Rule

    CASS 6.1.1 R to CASS 6.1.9 G and CASS Application

    6.1.15 G to CASS 6.1.16C R

    CASS 6.1.16E R to CASS 6.1.16I G Trustees and depositaries

    CASS 6.1.22 G to CASS 6.1.24 G General purpose

    CASS 6.2.1 R and CASS 6.2.2 R Protection of clients'' safe custody assets

    CASS 6.2.3 R and CASS 6.2.3B G Registration and recording of legal title

    CASS 6.2.7 R Holding

    CASS 6.3.1 R to CASS 6.3.4B G Depositing safe custody assets with third

    parties

    CASS 6.4.1 R and CASS 6.4.2 G Use of safe custody assets

    CASS 6.6 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 6.1.16G G The reasonable steps referred in CASS 6.1.16FR (2) could include
    obtaining an appropriate

    legal opinion to that effect.

    CASS 6.1.16I G A trustee firm or depositary that just arranges safeguarding and
    administration of assets may

    also take advantage of the exemption in CASS 6.1.16J R (Arrangers).

    CASS 6.1.16IA R Depositaries of AIFs

    (1) Subject to (2), when a firm is acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF the
    firm need

    comply only with the custody rules in the table below:

    Reference Rule

    CASS 6.1.1 R, CASS 6.1.9 G, CASS 6.1.9A Application

    G and CASS 6.1.16IB G

    CASS 6.1.22 G to CASS 6.1.24 G General purpose

    CASS 6.2.3 R and CASS 6.2.3B G to CASS Registration and recording of legal title

    6.2.6 G

    CASS 6.2.7 R Holding

    CASS 6.6.2 R, CASS 6.6.4 R, CASS 6.6.6 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    R, CASS 6.6.7 R, CASS 6.6.57R (2) and

    CASS 6.6.58 G

    (2) When a firm is acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF that is an authorised
    AIF the firm

    must, in addition to the custody rules in (1), also comply with the custody rules
    in the table

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    below:

    Reference Rule

    CASS 6.1.1BR (2) Application

    CASS 6.6.8 R, CASS 6.6.11 R to CASS Records, accounts and reconciliations

    6.6.32 G, CASS 6.6.41 G, CASS 6.6.43 G

    and CASS 6.6.47 G.

    CASS 6.1.16IB Firms acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF are reminded of
    the obligations in FUND 3.11

    G (Depositaries) and Chapter IV (Depositary) of the AIFMD level 2 regulation which
    apply in

    addition to those in CASS 6.

    CASS 6.1.16IC A firm (Firm A) to which another firm acting as trustee or depositary
    of an AIF (Firm B) has

    G delegated safekeeping functions in accordance with FUND 3.11.28 R (Delegation:
    safekeeping)

    will not itself be acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF for that AIF. CASS
    6.1.16IA R will not

    apply to Firm A in respect of that AIF. However, Firm A may be safeguarding and
    administering

    investments in respect of that AIF.

    CASS 6.1.16ID Depositaries of UCITS

    R

    When a firm is acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS, the firm need comply
    only with

    the custody rules in the table below:

    Reference Rule

    CASS 6.1.1R, CASS 6.1.1BR(3), CASS Application

    6.1.9G, CASS 6.1.16IEG

    CASS 6.1.22G to CASS 6.1.24G General purpose

    CASS 6.2.3R, CASS 6.2.3AR, CASS Holding of client assets

    6.2.3BG, CASS 6.2.7R

    CASS 6.6.2R, CASS 6.6.4R, CASS 6.6.7R, Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 6.6.41AG, CASS 6.6.57R(2A), CASS

    6.6.58G

    CASS 6.1.16IE Firms acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS are reminded
    of the obligations in COLL

    G 6.6B (UCITS depositaries) which apply as well as those in CASS 6.

    CASS 6.1.16IF G (1) A firm (Firm A) to which another firm acting as trustee or
    depositary of a UK UCITS (Firm

    B) has delegated safekeeping functions under COLL 6.6B.25R (Delegation: safekeeping)

    will not itself be acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS for that UCITS
    scheme.

    (2) CASS 6.1.16IDR will not apply to Firm A for that UCITS scheme.

    (3) However, Firm A may be safeguarding and administering investments in respect
    of that

    UCITS scheme.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.1.16J R Arrangers

    Only the custody rules in the table below apply to a firm when arranging safeguarding
    and

    administration of assets.

    Reference Rule

    CASS 6.1.1 R to CASS 6.1.9 G and CASS Application

    6.1.15 G to CASS 6.1.16B R

    CASS 6.1.16J R Arrangers

    CASS 6.1.16K R Records

    CASS 6.1.22 G to CASS 6.1.24 G General purpose

    CASS 6.3.4A R and CASS 6.3.4B G Third-party custody agreements

    CASS 6.1.16K R When a firm arranges safeguarding and administration of assets,
    it must ensure that proper

    records of the arrangements are made and retained for a period of 5 years after
    they are made.

    CASS 6.1.22 G General purpose

    Principle 10 (Clients'' assets) requires a firm to arrange adequate protection
    for clients'' assets

    when it is responsible for them. As part of these protections, the custody rules
    require a firm to

    take appropriate steps to protect safe custody assets for which it is responsible.

    CASS 6.1.23 G The rules in this chapter are designed primarily to restrict the
    commingling of client and the

    firm''s assets and minimise the risk of the client''s safe custody assets being
    used by the firm

    without the client''s agreement or contrary to the client''s wishes, or being
    treated as the firm''s

    assets in the event of its insolvency.

    CASS 6.1.24 G The custody rules also, where relevant,implemented the provisions
    of MiFID which regulated

    the obligations of a firm when it held financial instruments belonging to a client
    in the course of

    its MiFID business.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 6.2 Holding of client assets

    CASS 6.2.1 R Requirement to protect clients'' safe custody assets

    A firm must, when holding safe custody assets belonging to clients, make adequate

    arrangements so as to safeguard clients'' ownership rights, especially in the
    event of the firm''s

    insolvency, and to prevent the use of safe custody assets belonging to a client
    on the firm''s own

    account except with the client''s express consent.

    [Note: article 16(8) of MiFID]

    CASS 6.2.2 R Requirement to have adequate organisational arrangements

    A firm must introduce adequate organisational arrangements to minimise the risk
    of the loss or

    diminution of clients'' safe custody assets, or the rights in connection with
    those safe custody

    assets, as a result of the misuse of the safe custody assets, fraud, poor administration,

    inadequate record-keeping or negligence.

    [Note: article 2(1)(f) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.2.3 R Registration and recording of legal title

    Subject to CASS 6.2.3-AR , a firm must effect appropriate registration or recording
    of legal title

    to a safe custody asset belonging to a client in the name of:

    (1) the client , unless the client is an authorised person acting on behalf of
    its client , in

    which case it may be registered in the name of the client of that authorised person
    ;

    (2) a nominee company which is controlled by:

    (a) the firm ;

    (b) an affiliated company ;

    (c) a recognised investment exchange ; or

    (d) a third party with whom financial instruments are deposited under CASS 6.3

    (Depositing assets and arranging for assets to be deposited with third parties);

    (3) any other third party, if the firm is not a trustee firm but is prevented
    from registering or

    recording legal title in the way set out in (1) or (2) and provided that:

    (a) the safe custody asset is subject to the law or market practice of a jurisdiction

    outside the United Kingdom and the firm has taken reasonable steps to determine
    that it

    is in the client''s best interests to register or record it in that way, or that
    it is not feasible

    to do otherwise, because of the nature of the applicable law or market practice;
    and

    (b) the firm has notified the client in writing;

    (4) the firm if either:

    (a) it is not a trustee firm but is prevented from registering or recording legal
    title in the

    way set out in (1), (2) or (3) and provided that:

    (i) the safe custody asset is subject to the law or market practice of a jurisdiction

    outside the United Kingdom and the firm has taken reasonable steps to determine

    that it is in the client''s best interests to register or record it in that way,
    or that it is not

    feasible to do otherwise, because of the nature of the applicable law or market

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    practice; and

    (ii) the firm has notified the client if a professional client , or obtained prior
    written

    consent if a retail client .

    (b) it is a trustee firm and is prevented from registering or recording legal
    title in the way

    set out in (1) or (2).'
  display: CASS 6.1.1
- id: 6.2.3
  chapter: '6'
  type: null
  title: 'A R A firm need not comply with CASS 6.2.3 R for any safe custody asset:'
  summary: null
  risk_ids: []
  default_control_ids: []
  applicability_conditions: null
  text: '(1) that it has deposited with a third party in accordance with CASS 6.3
    (Depositing assets

    and arranging for assets to be deposited with third parties); and

    (2) for which, because of the arrangements with that third party for depositing
    the safe

    custody asset, it is not practicable for the firm to effect appropriate registration
    or recording

    of legal title itself.

    CASS 6.2.3A R If:

    (1) the safe custody asset is an emission auction product that is a financial
    instrument; and

    (2) it is not practicable or possible for a firm to effect registration or recording
    of legal title in

    this asset in the manner set out in CASS 6.2.3 R,

    the firm must register or record legal title in its name provided it has notified
    the client in writing.

    CASS 6.2.3B G A firm, when complying with CASS 6.2.3R (3) or CASS 6.2.3R (4)(a),
    will be expected to

    demonstrate that adequate investigations have been made of the jurisdiction concerned
    by

    reference to local sources, which may include an appropriate legal opinion.

    CASS 6.2.4 R A firm must accept the same level of responsibility to its client
    for any nominee company

    controlled by the firm, or any nominee company controlled by an affiliated company
    of the firm,

    with respect of any requirements of the custody rules.

    CASS 6.2.5 R A firm may only register or record legal title to its own applicable
    asset in the same name as

    that in which legal title to a client''s safe custody asset is registered or recorded
    if the firm''s

    applicable asset is separately identified from the client''s safe custody asset
    in the firm''s

    records, and either or both of the conditions in (1) and (2) are met.

    (1) The firm''s holding of its own applicable asset arises incidentally to:

    (a) designated investment business it carries on for the account of any client;
    or

    (b) steps taken by the firm to comply with an applicable custody rule;

    and, in the case of either (a) or (b), the situation where registration or recording
    of legal title

    of the firm''s applicable asset is in the same name as the client''s safe custody
    asset under

    this rule remains in place only to the extent that it is reasonably necessary.

    (2) The registration or recording of legal title of the firm''s own applicable
    asset in the same

    name as the client''s safe custody asset is only as a result of the law or market
    practice of a

    jurisdiction outside of the United Kingdom.

    CASS 6.2.6 G (1) Consistent with a firm''s requirements to protect clients'' safe
    custody assets and have

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    adequate organisation arrangements in place (CASS 6.2.1 R and CASS 6.2.2 R), before
    a

    firm registers or records legal title to its own applicable asset in the same
    name as that in

    which legal title to a client''s safe custody asset is registered or recorded
    under CASS 6.2.5

    R, it should consider whether there are any means to avoid doing so.

    (2) Examples of where the conditions under CASS 6.2.5R (1) might be met include
    in the

    course of a firm:

    (a) correcting a dealing error that relates to a transaction for the account of
    a client; or

    (b) maintaining a small balance of the firm''s own applicable assets for purely
    operational

    or compliance purposes (eg, as a float to cover potential custody shortfalls)
    in an amount

    that is proportionate to the total amount of safe custody assets held for clients;
    or

    (c) allocating safe custody assets to clients following settlement of a bulk order;
    or

    (d) facilitating a client transaction that involves fractional entitlements; or

    (e) making good a shortfall.

    CASS 6.2.7 R A firm must ensure that any documents of title to applicable assets
    in bearer form, belonging to

    the firm and which it holds in its physical possession, are kept separately from
    any document of

    title to a client''s safe custody assets in bearer form.

    CASS 6.2.7A R Allocated but unclaimed safe custody assets

    CASS 6.2.8G to CASS 6.2.16G do not apply to a firm following its failure.

    CASS 6.2.7B G CASS 6.7.2R to CASS 6.7.7R (Disposal of safe custody assets) applies
    to a firm following its

    failure in respect of allocated but unclaimed safe custody assets.

    CASS 6.2.8 G The purpose of CASS 6.2.10 R is to set out the requirements a firm
    must comply with if it

    chooses to divest itself of a client''s unclaimed safe custody assets.

    CASS 6.2.9 G Before acting in accordance with CASS 6.2.10 R to CASS 6.2.16 G,
    a firm should consider

    whether its actions are permitted by law and consistent with the arrangements
    under which the

    safe custody assets are held. These provisions relate to a firm''s obligations
    as an authorised

    person.

    CASS 6.2.10 R A firm may either (i) liquidate an unclaimed safe custody asset
    it holds for a client, at market

    value, and pay away the proceeds or (ii) pay away an unclaimed safe custody asset
    it holds for

    a client, in either case, to a registered charity of its choice provided:

    (1) this is permitted by law and consistent with the arrangements under which
    that safe

    custody asset is held;

    (2) it has held that safe custody asset for at least 12 years;

    (3) in the 12 years preceding the divestment of that safe custody asset, it has
    not received

    instructions relating to any safe custody assets from or on behalf of the client
    concerned;

    (4) it can demonstrate that it has taken reasonable steps to trace the client
    concerned and

    return that safe custody asset; and

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (5) the firm complies with CASS 6.2.14 R: the undertaking requirement.

    CASS 6.2.11 E (1) Taking reasonable steps in CASS 6.2.10R (4) includes following
    this course of conduct:

    (a) determining, as far as reasonably possible, the correct contact details for
    the relevant

    client;

    (b) writing to the client at the last known address either by post or by electronic
    mail to

    inform it:

    (i) of the name of the firm with which the client first deposited the safe custody
    asset

    in question;

    (ii) of the firm''s intention to pay the safe custody asset to charity under CASS
    6.2.10

    R if it does not receive instructions from the client within 28 days;

    (c) where the client has not responded after the 28 days referred to in (b) attempting
    to

    communicate the information set out in (b) to the client on at least one further
    occasion

    by any means other than that used in (b) including by post, electronic mail, telephone
    or

    media advertisement;

    (d) subject to (e) and (f), where the client has not responded within 28 days
    following the

    most recent communication, writing again to the client at the last known address
    either

    by post or by electronic mail to inform them that:

    (i) as the firm received no instructions from the client, it will in 28 days pay
    the safe

    custody asset to charity under CASS 6.2.10 R; and

    (ii) an undertaking will be provided by the firm or a member of its group to pay
    to the

    client concerned a sum equal to the value of the safe custody asset at the time
    it was

    liquidated or paid away in the event of the client seeking to claim the safe custody

    asset in future;

    (e) if the firm has carried out the steps in (b) or (c) and in response has received
    positive

    confirmation in writing that the client is no longer at a particular address,
    the firm should

    not use that address for the purposes of (d);

    (f) if, after carrying out the steps in (a), (b) and (c), the firm has obtained
    positive

    confirmation that none of the contact details it holds for the relevant client
    are accurate

    or, if utilised, the communication is unlikely to reach the client, the firm does
    not have to

    comply with (d); and

    (g) waiting a further 28 days following the most recent communication under this
    rule

    before divesting itself of the safe custody asset under CASS 6.2.10 R.

    (2) Compliance with (1) may be relied on as tending to establish compliance with
    CASS

    6.2.10R (4).

    (3) Contravention of (1) may be relied on as tending to establish contravention
    of CASS

    6.2.10R (4).

    CASS 6.2.12 G For the purpose of CASS 6.2.11E (1)(a), a firm may use any available
    means to determine the

    correct contact details for the relevant client, including telephoning the client,
    searching internal

    records, media advertising, searching public records, mortality screening, using
    credit reference

    agencies or tracing agents.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.2.13 R Where a firm liquidates a safe custody asset under CASS 6.2.10 R,
    it must pay away the

    proceeds to charity as soon as practicable.

    CASS 6.2.14 R Where a firm divests itself of a client''s safe custody asset under
    CASS 6.2.10 R, it must comply

    with either (1)(a) or (1)(b) and, in either case, (2).

    (1)

    (a) The firm must unconditionally undertake to pay to the client concerned a sum
    equal

    to the value of the safe custody asset at the time it was liquidated or paid away
    in the

    event of the client seeking to claim the safe custody asset in future.

    (b) The firm must ensure that an unconditional undertaking in the terms set out
    in (1)(a)

    is made by a member of its group and there is suitable information available for
    relevant

    clients to identify the member of the group granting the undertaking.

    (2) Any undertaking under this rule must be:

    (a) authorised by the firm''s governing body where (1)(a) applies or the governing
    body of

    the group member where (1)(b) applies;

    (b) legally enforceable by any person that had a legally enforceable claim to
    the

    unclaimed safe custody asset in question at the time it was divested by the firm,
    or by an

    assign or successor in title to such claim; and

    (c) retained by the firm, and, where (1)(b) applies, by the group member, indefinitely.

    CASS 6.2.15 R (1) If a firm pays away a client''s unclaimed safe custody assets
    to charity or liquidates a

    client''s unclaimed safe custody assets and pays the proceeds to charity under
    CASS 6.2.10

    R it must make and retain, or where the firm already has such records, retain:

    (a) records of all safe custody assets divested under CASS 6.2.10 R (including
    details of

    the value of each asset at that time and the identity of the client to whom the
    asset was

    allocated);

    (b) all relevant documentation (including charity receipts); and

    (c) details of the communications the firm had or attempted to make with the client

    concerned pursuant to CASS 6.2.10R (4).

    (2) Records in (1) must be retained indefinitely.

    (3) If a member of the firm''s group has provided an undertaking under CASS 6.2.14R
    (1)(b)

    then the records in (1) must be readily accessible to that group member.

    CASS 6.2.16 G Costs associated with divesting allocated but unclaimed client assets

    Any costs associated with the firm divesting itself of safe custody assets pursuant
    to CASS

    6.2.10 R to CASS 6.2.15 R should be paid for from the firm''s own funds, including:

    (1) any costs associated with the firm carrying out the steps in CASS 6.2.10R
    (4) or CASS

    6.2.11 E; and

    (2) the cost of any insurance purchased by a firm or the relevant member of its
    group to

    cover any legally enforceable claim in respect of the assets divested under CASS
    6.2.10 R.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 6.3 Depositing assets and arranging for assets to be deposited
    with third

    parties

    CASS 6.3.1 R Depositing safe custody assets with third parties

    (1) A firm may deposit safe custody assets held by it on behalf of its clients
    into an account

    or accounts opened with a third party, but only if it exercises all due skill,
    care and diligence

    in the selection, appointment and periodic review of the third party and of the
    arrangements

    for the holding and safekeeping of those safe custody assets.

    (1A) [deleted]

    (2) [deleted]

    (3) When a firm makes the selection, appointment and conducts the periodic review
    referred

    to under this rule, it must take into account:

    (a) the expertise and market reputation of the third party; and

    (b) any legal requirements related to the holding of those safe custody assets
    that could

    adversely affect clients'' rights.

    (4) [deleted]

    [Note: article 3(1) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.3.2 G In discharging its obligations under CASS 6.3.1 R, a firm should
    also consider, as appropriate,

    together with any other relevant matters:

    (1) the third party''s performance of its services to the firm;

    (2) the arrangements that the third party has in place for holding and safeguarding
    the safe

    custody asset;

    (2A) market practices related to the holding of the safe custody asset that could
    adversely

    affect clients’ rights.

    (3) current industry standard reports, for example "Assurance reports on internal
    controls of

    services organisations made available to third parties" made in line with Technical
    Release

    AAF 01/06 of The Institute of Chartered Accountants in England and Wales or equivalent;

    (4) the capital or financial resources of the third party;

    (5) the credit-worthiness of the third party;

    (6) any other activities undertaken by the third party and, if relevant, any affiliated
    company;

    and

    (7) whether the third party has the appropriate regulatory permissions.

    CASS 6.3.2A R (1) A firm must make a record of the grounds upon which it satisfies
    itself as to the

    appropriateness of its selection and appointment of a third party under CASS 6.3.1
    R. The

    firm must make the record on the date it makes the selection or appointment and
    must keep

    it from that date until five years after the firm ceases to use the third party
    to hold safe

    custody assets belonging to clients.

    (2) A firm must make a record of each periodic review of its selection and appointment
    of a

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    third party that it conducts under CASS 6.3.1 R, its considerations and conclusions.
    The firm

    must make the record on the date it completes the review and must keep it from
    that date

    until five years after the firm ceases to use the third party to hold safe custody
    assets

    belonging to clients.

    CASS 6.3.4 R (1) Subject to (2), a firm must only deposit safe custody assets
    with a third party in a

    jurisdiction which specifically regulates and supervises the safekeeping of safe
    custody

    assets for the account of another person with a third party who is subject to
    such regulation.

    (2) A firm must not deposit safe custody assets held on behalf of a client with
    a third party in

    a third country which does not regulate the holding and safekeeping of safe custody
    assets

    for the account of another person unless:

    (a) the nature of the safe custody assets or of the investment services connected
    with

    those safe custody assets requires them to be deposited with a third party in
    that third

    country; or

    (b) the safe custody assets are held on behalf of a professional client and the
    client

    requests the firm in writing to deposit them with a third party in that third
    country.

    (3) [deleted]

    (a) [deleted]

    (b) [deleted]

    (i) [deleted]

    (ii) [deleted]

    (iii) [deleted]

    (4) The requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this rule also apply when
    the third

    party has delegated any of its functions concerning the holding and safekeeping
    of safe

    custody assets to another third party.

    [Note: article 3(2)-(4) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.3.4A R Third-party custody agreements

    A firm must have entered into a written agreement with any person with whom it
    deposits

    clients''safe custody assets under CASS 6.3.1 R, or with whom it arranges safeguarding
    and

    administration of assets which are clients''safe custody assets. This agreement
    must, at

    minimum:

    (1) set out the binding terms of the arrangement between the firm and the third
    party;

    (2) be in force for the duration of that arrangement; and

    (3) clearly set out the custody service(s) that the third party is contracted
    to provide.

    CASS 6.3.4A-2 Depositing safe custody assets with third parties

    G

    CASS 6.3.4R(4) applies to a firm which deposits a safe custody asset into an account
    opened

    with a third party under CASS 6.3.1R(1). It is therefore possible for more than
    one firm in a

    chain of custody to be subject to CASS 6.3.4R(4) in respect of the same safe custody
    asset.

    CASS 6.3.4A-1 A firm must take the necessary steps to ensure that any client''s
    safe custody assets deposited

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    R with a third party are identifiable separately from the applicable assets belonging
    to the firm and

    from the applicable assets belonging to that third party, by means of differently
    titled accounts

    on the books of the third party or other equivalent measures that achieve the
    same level of

    protection.

    [Note: article 2(1)(d) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.3.4B G Third-party custody agreements

    A firm should consider carefully the terms of any agreement entered into with
    a third party

    under CASS 6.3.4A R. The following terms are examples of the issues that should
    be

    addressed in these agreements (where relevant):

    (1) that the title of the account in the third party''s books and records indicates
    that any safe

    custody asset credited to it does not belong to the firm;

    (2) that the third party will hold or record a safe custody asset belonging to
    the firm''sclient

    separately from any applicable asset belonging to the firm or to the third party;

    (3) the arrangements for registration or recording of the safe custody asset,
    if this will not be

    registered in the firm''sclient''s name;

    (4) the restrictions over the circumstances in which the third party may withdraw
    assets from

    the account;

    (5) the procedures and authorities for the passing of instructions to, or by,
    the firm;

    (6) the procedures for the claiming and receiving of dividends, interest payments
    and other

    entitlements accruing to the firm''sclient; and

    (7) the provisions detailing the extent of the third party''s liability in the
    event of the loss of a

    safe custody asset caused by the fraud, wilful default or negligence of the third
    party or an

    agent appointed by him.

    CASS 6.3.6A R (1) A firm must not grant any security interest, lien or right of
    set-off to another person over

    clients’ safe custody assets that enable that other person to dispose of the safe
    custody

    assets in order to recover debts unless condition (a) or (b) is satisfied:

    (a) those debts relate to:

    (i) one or more of the firm’s clients; or

    (ii) the provision of services by that other person to one or more of the firm’s
    clients;

    or

    (b) to the extent those debts relate to anything else then:

    (i) the security interest, lien or right of set-off is required by applicable
    law in a third

    country jurisdiction in which the safe custody assets are held;

    (ii) the firm discloses information to the client so that the client is informed
    of the risks

    associated with these arrangements; and

    (iii) the firm has taken reasonable steps to determine that holding safe custody

    assets subject to that security interest, lien or right of set-off is in the best
    interests of

    the firm’s clients.

    (2) Where security interests, liens or rights of set-off are granted by a firm
    over safe custody

    assets, or where the firm has been informed that they are granted, these must
    be recorded

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    in client contracts and the firm’s own books and records to make the ownership
    status of

    safe custody assets clear, such as in the event of an insolvency.

    [Note: article 2(4) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.3.6B G Under CASS 6.3.6AR(1)(a), a security interest, lien or right of
    set-off to facilitate the clearing or

    settlement of transactions referring to clients of the firm may be regarded as
    being granted in

    order to recover debts that relate to the provision of services to one or more
    clients.

    CASS 6.3.6C G (1) Under CASS 6.3.6AR(1)(b)(i) a security interest, lien or right
    of set-off may be regarded

    as being required by applicable law in a third country for example where:

    (a) because of applicable law it is mandatory for such a security interest, lien
    or right of

    set-off to be given in order for the safe custody assets to be held in that third
    country; or

    (b)

    (i) in the context of the service being provided for the firm’s client the applicable
    law

    of that third country requires the use of a central securities depositary, securities

    settlement system or central counterparty;

    (ii) the rules of that central securities depositary, securities settlement system
    or

    central counterparty are subject to the oversight of a regulator that performs
    that

    function under the applicable law; and

    (iii) those rules require such a security interest, lien or right of set-off to
    be given.

    (2) But a firm should not grant a security interest, lien or right of set-off
    under CASS

    6.3.6AR(1)(b)(i) that is wider than that under CASS 6.3.6AR(1)(a) where another
    person in a

    third country simply requests or demands this as a condition of business.

    CASS 6.3.6D G To comply with CASS 6.3.6AR(2) and in relation to any security interests,
    liens or rights of setoff over safe custody assets, a firm should ensure that:

    (1) the written terms of its client contracts include the client’s agreement to
    another person

    having such a security interest, lien or right of set-off over the client’s assets;
    and

    (2) its books and records are able to show the safe custody assets in respect
    of which the

    firm is aware that such security interests, liens, or rights of set-off exist.

    CASS 6.3.9 R CASS 6.3.6AR does not permit a firm to agree to a third party having
    any recourse or right

    against client money in a client bank account or standing to the credit of a client
    transaction

    account of the kind referred to in:

    (1) paragraph (d) of CASS 7 Annex 2R; or

    (2) paragraph (e) of CASS 7 Annex 3R; or

    (3) paragraph (e) of CASS 7 Annex 4R.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 6.4 Use of safe custody assets

    CASS 6.4.1 R (1) A firm must not enter into arrangements for securities financing
    transactions in respect of

    safe custody assets held by it on behalf of a client or otherwise use such safe
    custody

    assets for its own account or the account of any other person or client of the
    firm, unless:

    (a) the client has given express prior consent to the use of the safe custody
    assets on

    specified terms; and

    (b) the use of that client''s safe custody assets is restricted to the specified
    terms to

    which the client consents.

    (2) A firm must not enter into arrangements for securities financing transactions
    in respect of

    safe custody assets held by it on behalf of a client in an omnibus account maintained
    by a

    third party, or otherwise use safe custody assets held in such an account for
    its own account

    or for the account of any other person unless, in addition to the conditions set
    out in (1):

    (a) each client whose safe custody assets are held together in an omnibus account
    has

    given express prior consent in accordance with (1)(a); or

    (b) the firm has in place systems and controls which ensure that only safe custody

    assets belonging to clients who have given express prior consent in accordance
    with

    (1)(a) are so used.

    (3) For the purposes of obtaining the express prior consent of a client under
    this rule, the

    consent must be clearly evidenced in writing and the signature of the client or
    an equivalent

    alternative means of affirmative execution is required.

    (4) [deleted]

    [Note: article 5(1) and (2) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.4.1A G The FCA expects firms which enter into arrangements under CASS 6.4.1
    R with retail clients to

    only enter into securities financing transactions and not otherwise use retail
    clients'' safe

    custody assets.

    CASS 6.4.1B G (1) Prior express consent by clients should be given and recorded
    by firms in order to allow

    the firm to demonstrate clearly what the client agreed to and to help clarify
    the status of safe

    custody assets.

    (2) Clients’ consent may be given once at the start of the commercial relationship,
    as long

    as it is sufficiently clear that the client has consented to the use of their
    safe custody assets.

    (3) Where a firm is acting on a client instruction to lend safe custody assets
    and where this

    constitutes consent to entering into the transaction, the firm should hold evidence
    to

    demonstrate this.

    [Note: recital 10 to the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.4.1C R A firm must take appropriate measures to prevent the unauthorised
    use of safe custody assets

    for its own account or the account of any other person, such as:

    (1) the conclusion of agreements with clients on measures to be taken by the firm
    in case

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    the client does not have enough provision on its account on the settlement date,
    such as

    borrowing of the corresponding securities on behalf of the client or unwinding
    the position;

    (2) the close monitoring by the firm of its projected ability to deliver on the
    settlement date;

    (3) the putting in place of remedial measures if the firm cannot deliver on the
    settlement

    date; and

    (4) the close monitoring and prompt requesting of undelivered securities outstanding
    on the

    settlement day and beyond.

    [Note: article 5(3) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.4.1D G Examples of remedial measures in CASS 6.4.1CR(3) can be found in
    CASS 6.6.54R.

    CASS 6.4.2 G Firms are reminded of the client''s best interests rule, which requires
    the firm to act honestly,

    fairly and professionally in accordance with the best interests of their clients.
    For any

    transactions involving retail clients carried out under this section the FCA expects
    that:

    (1) the firm ensures that relevant collateral is provided by the borrower in favour
    of the

    client;

    (2) the current realisable value of the safe custody asset and of the relevant
    collateral is

    monitored daily; and

    (3) the firm provides relevant collateral to make up the difference where the
    current

    realisable value of the collateral falls below that of the safe custody asset
    , unless otherwise

    agreed in writing by the client.

    CASS 6.4.2A R A firm must adopt specific arrangements for all clients to ensure
    that the borrower of client safe

    custody assets provides the appropriate collateral and that the firm monitors
    the continued

    appropriateness of such collateral and takes the necessary steps to maintain the
    balance with

    the value of the client safe custody assets.

    [Note: article 5(4) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.4.2B G The requirement to monitor collateral under CASS 6.4.2AR applies
    to a firm where it is party to

    a securities financing transaction, including when acting as an agent for the
    conclusion of a

    securities financing transaction or in the case of a tripartite transaction between
    a borrower, a

    client and the firm.

    [Note: recital 9 to the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.4.3 R Where a firm uses safe custody assets as permitted in this section,
    the records of the firm must

    include details of the client on whose instructions the use of the safe custody
    assets has been

    effected, as well as the number of safe custody assets used belonging to each
    client who has

    given consent, so as to enable the correct allocation of any loss.

    [Note: article 5(2), second sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 6.6 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 6.6.1 G Records and accounts

    This section sets out the requirements a firm must meet when keeping records and
    accounts of

    the safe custody assets it holds for clients.

    CASS 6.6.2 R A firm must keep such records and accounts as necessary to enable
    it at any time and without

    delay to distinguish safe custody assets held for one client from safe custody
    assets held for

    any other client, and from the firm''s own applicable assets.

    [Note: article 2(1)(a) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.6.3 R A firm must maintain its records and accounts in a way that ensures
    their accuracy, and in

    particular their correspondence to the safe custody assets held for clients and
    that they may be

    used as an audit trail.

    [Note: article 2(1)(b) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.6.4 R A firm must maintain a client-specific safe custody asset record.

    CASS 6.6.5 G (1) The requirements in CASS 6.6.2 R to CASS 6.6.4 R are for a firm
    to keep internal

    records and accounts of clients'' safe custody assets. Therefore any records falling
    under

    those requirements should be maintained by the firm, and should be separate to
    any

    records the firm may have obtained from any third parties, such as those with
    whom it may

    have deposited, or through whom it may have registered legal title to, clients''
    safe custody

    assets.

    (2) The FCA expects that compliance by a firm with CASS 6.6 as a whole (to the
    extent

    applicable to that firm) will be sufficient to comply with the requirement under
    CASS 6.6.3R

    to maintain its records and accounts in a way that ensures they may be used as
    an audit

    trail.

    CASS 6.6.6 R Right to use agreements

    A firm must keep a copy of every executed client agreement that includes that
    firm''s right to use

    safe custody assets for its own account (see CASS 6.4.1 R), including in the case
    of a prime

    brokerage agreement the disclosure annex referred to in CASS 9.3.1 R.

    CASS 6.6.7 R General record-keeping

    Unless otherwise stated, a firm must ensure that any record made under the custody
    rules is

    retained for a period of five years starting from the later of:

    (1) the date it was created; and

    (2) (if it has been modified since the date it was created), the date it was most
    recently

    modified.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.6.8 R For each internal custody record check, each physical asset reconciliation
    and each external

    custody reconciliation carried out by a firm, it must make a record including:

    (1) the date it carried out the relevant process;

    (2) the actions the firm took in carrying out the relevant process; and

    (3) a list of any discrepancies the firm identified and the actions the firm took
    to resolve

    those discrepancies.

    CASS 6.6.9 G Policies and procedures

    Firms are reminded that they must, under SYSC 6.1.1 R, establish, implement and
    maintain

    adequate policies and procedures sufficient to ensure compliance of the firm with
    the rules in

    this chapter. This should include, for example, establishing and maintaining policies
    and

    procedures concerning:

    (1) the frequency and method of the checks and reconciliations the firm is required
    to carry

    out under this section;

    (2) the frequency with which the firm is required to review its arrangements in
    compliance

    with this chapter; and

    (3) the resolution of discrepancies and the treatment of shortfalls under this
    section.

    CASS 6.6.10 G Internal custody record checks

    (1) An internal custody record check is one of the steps a firm takes to satisfy
    its obligations

    under:

    (a) Principle 10 (Clients'' assets);

    (b) CASS 6.2.2 R (Requirement to have adequate organisational arrangements);

    (c) CASS 6.6.2 R to CASS 6.6.4 R (Records and accounts); and

    (d) where relevant, SYSC 4.1.1 R (General requirements) and SYSC 6.1.1 R

    (Compliance).

    (2) An internal custody record check is a check as to whether the firm''s records
    and

    accounts of the safe custody assets held by the firm (including, for example,
    those

    deposited with third parties under CASS 6.3 (Depositing safe custody assets with
    third

    parties)) correspond with the firm''s obligations to its clients to hold those
    safe custody

    assets.

    CASS 6.6.10A R CASS 6.6.11R does not apply to a firm following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.10B G CASS 6.6.46AR (Frequency of checks and reconciliations after failure)
    applies to a firm

    following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.11 R (1) A firm must perform an internal custody record check:

    (a) subject to paragraph (2), as regularly as is necessary but without allowing
    more than

    one month to pass between each internal custody record check; and

    (b) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the internal custody
    record

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    check relates.

    (2) A firm that holds no safe custody assets other than physical safe custody
    assets must

    perform an internal custody record check as regularly as necessary but, in any
    case, no less

    often than its physical asset reconciliations under CASS 6.6.22 R.

    CASS 6.6.12 G CASS 6.6.44 R sets out the matters which a firm must have regard
    to when determining the

    frequency at which to undertake an internal custody record check.

    CASS 6.6.13 R A firm must perform an internal custody record check using either
    the internal custody

    reconciliation method or the internal system evaluation method. It must not use
    a combination

    of these methods.

    CASS 6.6.14 R A firm must only use its internal records (for example its depot
    and client-specific ledgers for

    safe custody assets or other internal accounting records) in order to perform
    an internal custody

    record check.

    CASS 6.6.15 G CASS 6.6.14 R means that a firm must not base its internal custody
    record checks on any

    records that the firm may have obtained from any third parties, such as those
    with whom it may

    have deposited, or through whom it may have registered legal title to, clients''
    safe custody

    assets.

    CASS 6.6.16 R The internal custody reconciliation method for internal custody
    record

    checks

    A firm may only use the internal custody reconciliation method if:

    (1) it separately maintains an aggregate safe custody asset record and a client-specific
    safe

    custody asset record; and

    (2) its aggregate safe custody asset record and its client-specific safe custody
    asset record

    are capable of being compared.

    CASS 6.6.17 R The internal custody reconciliation method requires a firm to perform
    a comparison between its

    aggregate safe custody asset record and its client-specific safe custody asset
    record, as at the

    date of the internal custody record check.

    CASS 6.6.18 G The internal system evaluation method for internal custody record

    checks

    (1) The internal system evaluation method is available to any firm, including
    one that is not

    able to use the internal custody reconciliation method because it does not meet
    the

    requirements at CASS 6.6.16R (1) and CASS 6.6.16R (2).

    (2) The purpose of the internal system evaluation method is to detect weaknesses
    in a firm''s

    systems and controls and any recordkeeping discrepancies. However, this method
    is not

    designed to substitute a firm''s other measures for ensuring compliance with the
    custody

    rules, such as monitoring the accuracy of its records (see also CASS 6.2.2 R and
    CASS

    6.6.3 R).

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.6.19 R The internal system evaluation method requires a firm to:

    (1) establish a process that evaluates:

    (a) the completeness and accuracy of the firm''s internal records and accounts
    of safe

    custody assets held by the firm for clients, in particular whether sufficient
    information is

    being completely and accurately recorded by the firm to enable it to:

    (i) comply with CASS 6.6.4 R; and

    (ii) readily determine the total of all the safe custody assets that the firm
    holds for its

    clients; and

    (b) whether the firm''s systems and controls correctly identify and resolve all

    discrepancies in its internal records and accounts of safe custody assets held
    by the firm

    for clients;

    (2) run the evaluation process established under (1) on the date of each internal
    custody

    record check; and

    (3) promptly investigate and, without undue delay, resolve any causes of discrepancies
    that

    the evaluation process reveals.

    CASS 6.6.20 G The evaluation process under CASS 6.6.19R (1) should verify that
    the firm''s systems and

    controls correctly identify and resolve at least the following types or causes
    of discrepancies:

    (1) items in the firm''s records and accounts that might be erroneously overstating
    or

    understating the safe custody assets held by a firm (for example, ''test'' entries
    and

    ''balancing'' entries);

    (2) negative balances;

    (3) processing errors;

    (4) journal entry errors (eg, omissions and unauthorised system entries); and

    (5) IT errors (eg, software issues that could lead to inaccurate records).

    CASS 6.6.21 G Physical asset reconciliations

    (1) A physical asset reconciliation is a separate process to the internal custody
    record

    check. Firms that hold physical safe custody assets for clients are required to
    perform both

    processes.

    (2) The purpose of a physical asset reconciliation is to check that a firm''s
    internal records

    and accounts of the physical safe custody assets kept by the firm for clients
    are accurate

    and complete, and to ensure any discrepancies are investigated and resolved.

    CASS 6.6.21A R CASS 6.6.22R does not apply to a firm following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.21B G CASS 6.6.46AR (Frequency of checks and reconciliations after failure)
    applies to a firm

    following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.22 R A firm that holds physical safe custody assets must perform a physical
    asset reconciliation for

    all the physical safe custody assets it holds for clients:

    (1) as regularly as is necessary but without allowing more than six months to
    pass between

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    each physical asset reconciliation; and

    (2) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the physical asset

    reconciliation relates.

    CASS 6.6.23 G CASS 6.6.44 R sets out the matters which a firm must have regard
    to when determining the

    frequency at which to undertake a physical asset reconciliation.

    CASS 6.6.24 R When performing a physical asset reconciliation a firm must:

    (1) count all the physical safe custody assets held by the firm for clients as
    at the date to

    which the physical asset reconciliation relates; and

    (2) compare the count in (1) against what the firm''s internal records and accounts
    state as

    being in the firm''s possession as at the same date.

    CASS 6.6.25 R A firm must perform each physical asset reconciliation under CASS
    6.6.24 R using the total

    count method or the rolling stock method.

    CASS 6.6.26 G Regardless of the method used, a firm should ensure that all safe
    custody assets held by the

    firm as physical safe custody assets for clients are subject to a physical asset
    reconciliation at

    the frequency required under CASS 6.6.22 R.

    CASS 6.6.27 R If a firm completes a physical asset reconciliation in a single
    stage, such that the firm:

    (1) performs a single count under CASS 6.6.24R (1) which encompasses all the physical

    safe custody assets held by the firm for clients as at the date to which the physical
    asset

    reconciliation relates; and

    (2) compares that count against the firm''s internal records and accounts in accordance
    with

    CASS 6.6.24R (2);

    then the firm will have used the total count method for that physical asset reconciliation.

    CASS 6.6.28 R If a firm completes a physical asset reconciliation in two or more
    stages, such that the firm:

    (1) performs two or more counts under CASS 6.6.24R (1) (each on a separate occasion
    and

    relating to a different stock line or group of stock lines forming part of the
    firm''s overall

    holdings of physical safe custody assets) which, once all of the counts are complete,

    encompass all the physical safe custody assets held by the firm for clients; and

    (2) compares each of those counts against the firm''s internal records and accounts
    in

    accordance with CASS 6.6.24R (2);

    then the firm will have used the rolling stock method for that physical asset
    reconciliation.

    CASS 6.6.29 G (1) The rolling stock method allows a firm to perform its physical
    asset reconciliation in

    several stages, with each stage referring to a line of stock or group of stock
    lines in a

    designated investment selected by a firm (for example, all the shares with an
    issuer whose

    name begins with the letter ''A'' or all the stock lines held in connection with
    a particular

    business line).

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (2) Where a firm uses the rolling stock method to perform a physical asset reconciliation,
    all

    the stages in that physical asset reconciliation must be completed in time to
    ensure the firm

    complies with CASS 6.6.22 R.

    CASS 6.6.30 R (1) If a firm wishes to use the rolling stock method to perform
    a physical asset reconciliation

    it must first establish and document in writing its reasons for concluding that
    the way in

    which it will carry out its physical asset reconciliations is adequately designed
    to mitigate the

    risk of the firm''s records being manipulated or falsified.

    (2) A firm must retain any documents created under (1) for a period of at least
    five years

    after the date it ceases to use the rolling stock method to perform its physical
    asset

    reconciliation.

    CASS 6.6.31 G The documents under CASS 6.6.30R (1) should, for example, cover
    the systems and controls

    the firm will have in place to mitigate the risk of ''teeming and lading'' in
    respect of all the

    physical safe custody assets held by the firm for clients and across all the firm''s
    business lines.

    CASS 6.6.32 G To meet the requirement to have adequate organisational arrangements
    under CASS 6.2.2 R,

    a firm should consider performing ''spot checks'' as to whether title to an appropriate
    sample of

    physical safe custody assets that it holds is registered correctly under CASS
    6.2.3 R

    (Registration and recording of legal title).

    CASS 6.6.33 G External custody reconciliations

    The purpose of an external custody reconciliation is to ensure the completeness
    and accuracy

    of a firm''s internal records and accounts of safe custody assets held by the
    firm for clients

    against those of relevant third parties.

    CASS 6.6.34 R A firm must conduct, on a regular basis, reconciliations between
    its internal records and

    accounts of safe custody assets held by the firm for clients and those of any
    third parties by

    whom those safe custody assets are held.

    [Note: article 2(1)(c) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 6.6.35 R In CASS 6.6.34 R, the third parties whose records and accounts a
    firm is required to reconcile

    its own internal records and accounts with must include:

    (1) the third parties with which the firm has deposited clients'' safe custody
    assets;

    (2) where the firm has not deposited a client''s safe custody asset with a third
    party:

    (a) the third parties responsible for the registration of legal title to that
    safe custody

    asset; or

    (b) a person acting as an operator for the purposes of any of the relevant overseas

    USRs if:

    (i) the safe custody asset is an uncertificated unit of a security governed by
    any of the

    relevant overseas USRs; and

    (ii) the firm has reasonable grounds to be satisfied that the records of that
    person

    take into account all instructions issued by that person which require an issuer
    to

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    register on a register of securities a transfer of title to any uncertificated
    units.

    CASS 6.6.36 G Examples of the sorts of third parties referred to at CASS 6.6.35R
    (2)(a) include central

    securities depositaries, operators of collective investment schemes, and administrators
    of

    offshore funds.

    CASS 6.6.36A R CASS 6.6.37R does not apply to a firm following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.36B G CASS 6.6.46AR (Frequency of checks and reconciliations after failure)
    applies to a firm

    following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.37 R A firm must conduct external custody reconciliations:

    (1) as regularly as necessary but allowing no more than one month to pass between
    each

    external custody reconciliation; and

    (2) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the external custody

    reconciliation relates.

    CASS 6.6.38 G CASS 6.6.44 R sets out the matters which a firm must consider when
    determining the

    frequency at which to undertake an external custody reconciliation.

    CASS 6.6.39 G Where a firm holds clients'' safe custody assets electronically
    with a central securities

    depositary which is able to provide adequate information to the firm on its holdings
    on a daily

    basis, it is best practice under CASS 6.6.37R (1) for the firm to conduct an external
    custody

    reconciliation each business day in respect of those assets.

    CASS 6.6.40 G Where a firm deposits safe custody assets belonging to a client
    with a third party or where a

    third party is responsible for the registration of legal title to that asset,
    in complying with the

    requirements of CASS 6.6.34 R, the firm should seek to ensure that the third party
    provides the

    firm with adequate information (for example in the form of a statement) as at
    a date specified by

    the firm which details the description and amounts of all the safe custody assets
    credited to the

    relevant account(s) and that this information is provided in sufficient time to
    allow the firm to

    carry out its external custody reconciliations under CASS 6.6.37 R.

    CASS 6.6.41 G If a firm acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF that is an authorised
    AIF deposits safe

    custody assets belonging to a client with a third party, under article 89(1)(c)
    (Safekeeping

    duties with regard to assets held in custody) of the AIFMD level 2 regulation,
    the firm should

    seek to ensure that the third party provides the firm with adequate information
    (for example in

    the form of a statement) as at a date or dates specified by the firm which details
    the description

    and amounts of all the safe custody assets credited to the account(s) and that
    this information

    is provided in adequate time to allow the firm to carry out the periodic reconciliations
    required

    under article 89(1)(c) (Safekeeping duties with regard to assets held in custody)
    of the AIFMD

    level 2 regulation.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.6.41A G If a firm acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS deposits
    safe custody assets belonging

    to a client with a third party, under article 13(1)(c) (Safekeeping duties with
    regard to assets

    held in custody) of the UCITS level 2 regulation, the firm should seek to ensure
    that:

    (1) the third party provides the firm with adequate information (for example in
    the form of a

    statement):

    (a) as at a date or dates specified by the firm; and

    (b) which details the description and amounts of all the safe custody assets credited
    to

    the account(s); and

    (2) such information is provided in adequate time to allow the firm to carry out
    the periodic

    reconciliations required under article 13(1)(c) of the UCITS level 2 regulation.

    CASS 6.6.42 G External custody reconciliations must be performed for each safe
    custody asset held by the firm

    for its clients, except for physical safe custody assets. A reconciliation of
    transactions involving

    safe custody assets, rather than of the safe custody assets themselves, will not
    satisfy the

    requirement under CASS 6.6.34 R.

    CASS 6.6.43 G A firm acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF that is an authorised
    AIF should perform the

    reconciliation under article 89(1)(c) (Safekeeping duties with regard to assets
    held in custody)

    of the AIFMD level 2 regulation:

    (1) as regularly as is necessary having regard to the frequency, number and value
    of

    transactions which the firm undertakes in respect of safe custody assets, but
    with no more

    than one month between each reconciliation; and

    (2) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the reconciliation
    relates;

    to ensure the accuracy of its internal records and accounts against those of third
    parties by

    whom client''s safe custody assets are held.

    CASS 6.6.43A R Frequency of checks and reconciliations under this section

    CASS 6.6.44R to CASS 6.6.46R do not apply to a firm following its failure.

    CASS 6.6.43B G CASS 6.6.46AR (Frequency of checks and reconciliations after failure)
    applies to a firm

    following its failure in respect of the frequency at which the firm undertakes
    its internal custody

    record checks under CASS 6.6.11R, physical asset reconciliations under CASS 6.6.22R,
    and

    external custody reconciliations under CASS 6.6.37R.

    CASS 6.6.44 R When determining the frequency at which it will undertake its internal
    custody record checks

    under CASS 6.6.11 R, physical asset reconciliations under CASS 6.6.22 R, and external

    custody reconciliations under CASS 6.6.37 R, a firm must have regard to:

    (1) the frequency, number and value of transactions which the firm undertakes
    in respect of

    clients'' safe custody assets; and

    (2) the risks to which clients'' safe custody assets are exposed, such as the
    nature, volume

    and complexity of the firm''s business and where and with whom safe custody assets
    are

    held.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 6.6.45 R (1) A firm must make and retain records sufficient to show and explain
    any decision it has

    taken under CASS 6.6.44 R when determining the frequency of its internal custody
    record

    checks, physical asset reconciliations and external custody reconciliations. Subject
    to (2),

    such records must be retained indefinitely.

    (2) If any decision under CASS 6.6.44 R is superseded by a subsequent decision
    under that

    rule then the record of that earlier decision retained in accordance with (1)
    need only be

    retained for a further period of five years from the subsequent decision.

    CASS 6.6.46 R (1) Subject to (3), a firm must review the frequency at which it
    conducts internal custody

    record checks, physical asset reconciliations and external custody reconciliations
    at least

    annually to ensure that it continues to comply with CASS 6.6.11 R, CASS 6.6.22
    R and

    CASS 6.6.37 R, respectively, and has given due consideration to the matters in
    CASS

    6.6.44 R.

    (2) For each review a firm undertakes under (1), it must record the date and the
    actions it

    took in reviewing the frequency of its internal custody record checks, physical
    asset

    reconciliations and external custody reconciliations.

    (3) A firm need not carry out a review under (1) in respect of its internal custody
    record

    checks, physical asset reconciliations and external custody reconciliations, if
    it already

    conducts the particular process in respect of all relevant safe custody assets
    each business

    day.

    CASS 6.6.46A R Frequency of checks and reconciliations after failure

    (1) This rule applies to a firm following its failure.

    (2) A firm must perform an internal custody record check and a physical asset
    reconciliation

    that relates to the time of its failure as soon as reasonably practicable after
    its failure.

    (3)

    (a) A firm must perform an external custody reconciliation that relates to the
    time of its

    failure as soon as reasonably practicable after its failure.

    (b) If any records and accounts of the relevant third parties under CASS 6.6.35R
    relating

    to the time of the firm’s failure are unavailable, the firm must use the next
    available

    records and accounts to perform the external custody reconciliation under subparagraph
    (a).

    (4) A firm must perform further internal custody record checks and physical asset

    reconciliations:

    (a) as regularly as is necessary to ensure that the firm remains in compliance
    with CASS

    6.6.2R, CASS 6.6.3R and CASS 6.6.4R (Records and accounts); and

    (b) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the internal custody
    record

    check or physical asset reconciliation relates.

    (5) A firm must perform further external custody reconciliations on a regular
    basis:

    (a) as regularly as is necessary; and

    (b) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the external custody

    reconciliation relates.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (6) A firm must determine the frequency at which it will undertake its internal
    custody record

    checks and physical asset reconciliations under paragraph (4), and its external
    custody

    reconciliations under paragraph (5) with regard to:

    (a) the frequency, number and value of transactions which the firm undertakes
    in respect

    of clients’ safe custody assets;

    (b) the risks to which clients’ safe custody assets are exposed, such as the nature,

    volume and complexity of the firm’s business, and where and with whom safe custody

    assets are held; and

    (c) the need to comply with CASS 6.7.

    CASS 6.6.46B G (1) The reference point for the internal custody record check and
    physical asset

    reconciliation under CASS 6.6.46A(2) and the external custody reconciliation under

    6.6.46A(3)(a) should be the precise point in time at which the firm’s failure
    occurred.

    (2) The reference point for any further internal custody record checks and physical
    asset

    reconciliations under CASS 6.6.46A(4) and any further external custody reconciliations

    under 6.6.46A(5) can be determined by the firm.

    CASS 6.6.47 G Independence of person performing checks and reconciliations

    Whenever possible, a firm should ensure that checks and reconciliations are carried
    out by a

    person (for example an employee of the firm) who is independent of the production
    or

    maintenance of the records to be checked and/or reconciled.

    CASS 6.6.48 G Resolution of discrepancies

    In this section, a discrepancy should not be considered to be resolved until it
    is fully

    investigated and corrected, and any associated shortfall is made good by way of
    the firm

    ensuring that:

    (1) it is holding (under the custody rules) each of the safe custody assets that
    the firm ought

    to be holding for each of its clients; and

    (2) its own records, and the records of any relevant other person (such as a third
    party with

    whom the firm deposited the safe custody assets) accurately correspond to the
    position

    under (1).

    CASS 6.6.49 R When a firm identifies a discrepancy as a result of carrying out
    an internal custody record

    check, physical asset reconciliation or external custody reconciliation, the firm
    must:

    (1) promptly investigate the reason for the discrepancy and resolve it without
    undue delay;

    and

    (2) take appropriate steps under CASS 6.6.54 R for the treatment of any shortfalls
    until that

    discrepancy is resolved.

    CASS 6.6.50 R When a firm identifies a discrepancy outside of its processes for
    an internal custody record

    check, physical asset reconciliation or external custody reconciliation, the firm
    must:

    (1) take all reasonable steps both to investigate the reason for the discrepancy
    and to

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    resolve it; and

    (2) take appropriate steps under CASS 6.6.54 R for the treatment of shortfalls
    until that

    discrepancy is resolved.

    CASS 6.6.51 G Where the discrepancy identified under CASS 6.6.49 R or CASS 6.6.50
    R has arisen as a

    result of a breach of thecustody rules, the firm should ensure it takes sufficient
    steps to avoid a

    reoccurrence of that breach (see Principle 10 (Clients'' assets), CASS 6.6.3 R
    and, as

    applicable, SYSC 4.1.1R (1) and SYSC 6.1.1 R).

    CASS 6.6.52 G Items recorded or held within a suspense or error account fall within
    the scope of discrepancies

    in this section.

    CASS 6.6.53 G Items recorded in a firm''s records and accounts that are no longer
    recorded by relevant third

    parties (such as ''liquidated stocks'') also fall within the scope of discrepancies
    in this section.

    CASS 6.6.54 R Treatment of shortfalls

    (1) This rule applies where a firm identifies a discrepancy as a result of, or
    that reveals, a

    shortfall, which the firm has not yet resolved.

    (2) Subject to paragraphs (3) and (4), until the discrepancy is resolved a firm
    must do one of

    the following:

    (a) appropriate a sufficient number of its own applicable assets to cover the
    value of the

    shortfall and hold them for the relevant clients under the custody rules in such
    a way that

    the applicable assets, or the proceeds of their liquidation, will be available
    for distribution

    for the benefit of the relevant clients in the event of the firm''s failure and,
    in doing so:

    (i) ensure that the applicable assets are clearly identifiable as separate from
    the

    firm''s own property and are recorded by the firm in its client-specific safe
    custody

    asset record as being held for the relevant client;

    (ii) keep a record of the actions the firm has taken under this rule which includes
    a

    description of the shortfall, identifies the relevant affected clients, and lists
    the

    applicable assets that the firm has appropriated to cover the shortfall; and

    (iii) update the record made under (ii) whenever the discrepancy is resolved and
    the

    firm has re-appropriated the applicable assets; or

    (b) (provided that doing so is consistent with the firm''s permissions and would
    result in

    money being held for the relevant client) in respect of the shortfall under CASS
    7.17.2 R

    (statutory trust) appropriate a sufficient amount of its own money to cover the
    value of

    the shortfall, hold it for the relevant client as client money under the client
    money rules

    and, in doing so:

    (i) ensure the money is segregated under CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client money)

    and recorded as being held for the relevant client under CASS 7.15 (Records,

    accounts and reconciliations);

    (ii) keep a record of the actions the firm has taken under this rule which includes
    a

    description of the shortfall, identifies the relevant affected clients, and specifies
    the

    amount of money that the firm has appropriated to cover the shortfall; and

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (iii) update the record made under (ii) whenever the discrepancy is resolved and
    the

    firm has re-appropriated the money; or

    (c) appropriate a number of applicable assets in accordance with (a) and an amount
    of

    money in accordance with (b) which, in aggregate, are sufficient to cover the
    value of the

    shortfall.

    (3) If the firm, where justified, concludes that another person is responsible
    for the

    discrepancy, regardless of any dispute with that other person, or that the discrepancy
    is due

    to a timing difference between the accounting systems of that other person and
    that of the

    firm, the firm must take all reasonable steps to resolve the situation without
    undue delay

    with the other person. Until the discrepancy is resolved the firm must consider
    whether it

    would be appropriate to notify the affected client of the situation, and may take
    steps under

    (2) for the treatment of shortfalls until that discrepancy is resolved.

    (4) A firm that has failed is not required to take steps under paragraph (2) in
    relation to the

    firm’s own applicable assets or money in so far as the legal procedure for the
    firm’s failure

    prevents the firm from taking any such steps.

    CASS 6.6.55 G In considering whether it should notify affected clients under CASS
    6.6.54R (3), a firm should

    have regard to its obligations under the client''s best interests rule to act
    honestly, fairly and

    professionally in accordance with the best interests of its clients, and to Principle
    7

    (communications with clients).

    CASS 6.6.56 G (1) The value of a shortfall for the purposes of CASS 6.6.54 R may
    be determined by the

    previous day''s closing mark to market valuation, or if in relation to a particular
    safe custody

    asset none is available, the most recently available valuation.

    (2) Where a firm is taking the measures under CASS 6.6.54R (2) in respect of a
    particular

    shortfall it should, as regularly as necessary, and having regard to Principle
    10:

    (a) review the value of the shortfall in line with (1); and

    (b) where the firm has found that the value of the shortfall has changed, adjust
    either or

    both the number of own applicable assets or the amount of money it has appropriated
    to

    ensure that in aggregate the assets and monies set aside are sufficient to cover
    the

    changed value of the shortfall.

    CASS 6.6.56A G CASS 6.6.54R(4) recognises that a failed firm is required to investigate
    and resolve

    discrepancies, but the extent to which it is able to address shortfalls pending
    the resolution of

    discrepancies may be limited by insolvency law, for example.

    CASS 6.6.57 R Notification requirements

    A firm must inform the FCA in writing without delay if:

    (1) its internal records and accounts of the safe custody assets held by the firm
    for clients

    are materially out of date, or materially inaccurate or invalid, so that the firm
    is no longer

    able to comply with the requirements in CASS 6.6.2 R to CASS 6.6.4 R; or

    (2) it is a firm acting as trustee or depositary of an AIF and has not complied
    with, or is

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    materially unable to comply with, the requirements in CASS 6.6.2 R or in article
    89(1)(b) or

    89(1)(c) (Safekeeping duties with regard to assets held in custody) of the AIFMD
    level 2

    regulation; or

    (2A) it is a firm acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS and has not complied
    with, or

    is materially unable to comply with, the requirements in:

    (a) CASS 6.6.2R; or

    (b) article 13(1)(b) or 13(1)(c) (Safekeeping duties with regard to assets held
    in custody)

    of the UCITS level 2 regulation; or

    (3) it will be unable, or materially fails, to take the steps required under CASS
    6.6.54 R for

    the treatment of shortfalls; or

    (4) it will be unable, or materially fails, to conduct an internal custody record
    check in

    compliance with CASS 6.6.11 R to CASS 6.6.19 R; or

    (5) it will be unable, or materially fails, to conduct a physical asset reconciliation
    in

    compliance with CASS 6.6.22 R to CASS 6.6.30 R; or

    (6) it will be unable, or materially fails, to conduct an external custody reconciliation
    in

    compliance with CASS 6.6.34 R to CASS 6.6.37 R.

    CASS 6.6.58 G Annual audit of compliance with the custody rules

    Firms are reminded that the auditor of the firm has to confirm in the report submitted
    to the FCA

    under SUP 3.10 (Duties of auditors: notification and report on client assets)
    that the firm has

    maintained systems adequate to enable it to comply with the custody rules.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 6.7 Treatment of custody assets after a failure

    CASS 6.7.1 R Application

    This section applies to a firm following its failure.

    CASS 6.7.2 R Disposal of safe custody assets

    (1) Before a firm takes any steps to dispose of a safe custody asset it must:

    (a) (subject to paragraph (2)) attempt to return it to the relevant client or
    transfer it to

    another person for safekeeping on behalf of the client in accordance with CASS
    6.7.8R;

    and

    (b) (subject to paragraph (3)) take reasonable steps to notify the client of the
    firm’s

    proposed course of action for disposing of the safe custody asset.

    (2) A firm is not required to attempt to return or transfer a safe custody asset
    under

    paragraph (1)(a) where the client to whom the safe custody asset belongs has confirmed
    to

    the firm that it disclaims all its interests in the safe custody asset.

    (3) A firm is not required to notify a client under paragraph (1)(b) where:

    (a) the firm is able to return the safe custody asset to the relevant client or
    transfer it to

    another person on behalf of the client in accordance with CASS 6.7.8R; or

    (b) the client to whom the safe custody asset belongs has confirmed to the firm
    that it

    disclaims all its interests in the safe custody asset.

    CASS 6.7.3 G (1) The disposal of a safe custody asset referred to under CASS 6.7.2R(1)
    includes cases

    where the firm is using the procedure under regulation 12B of the IBSA Regulations
    to set a

    ‘hard bar date’ by giving a ‘hard bar date notice’, or is using another similar
    procedure in

    accordance with the legal procedure for the firm’s failure.

    (2) In any case, a firm should consider whether its obligations under law or any
    agreement

    permit it to dispose of a safe custody asset in the way in which it proposes to
    do so.

    CASS 6.7.4 E (1) Reasonable steps in CASS 6.7.2R(1)(b) include the following course
    of conduct:

    (a) determining, as far as reasonably possible, the correct contact details for
    the relevant

    client;

    (b) for a client for whom the firm has evidence that it was a professional client
    for the

    purposes of the custody rules at the time of the failure:

    (i) writing to the client at its last known address either by post or by electronic
    mail:

    (A) to inform it of the firm’s intention to dispose of the safe custody asset;

    (B) to inform it of the consequences of the firm’s proposed course of action in

    relation to the client’s ability to assert a claim in respect of that safe custody

    asset; and

    (C) to invite the client to submit a claim for that safe custody asset;

    (ii) where the client has not responded within 28 days of the communication under

    sub-paragraph (i), attempting to communicate the information in (i) to the client
    on at

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    least one further occasion by any means other than that used in sub-paragraph
    (i)

    including by post, electronic mail, telephone or media advertisement; and

    (c) for any other client:

    (i) the same steps as under sub-paragraphs (b)(i) and (b)(ii); and

    (ii) where the client has not responded within 28 days of the second communication

    under sub-paragraph (b)(ii), attempting to communicate the information in subparagraph
    (b)(i) to the client on at least one further occasion by any means other

    than one in respect of which the firm has obtained positive confirmation that
    the client

    is not receiving such communications.

    (2) Compliance with paragraph (1) may be relied on as tending to establish compliance
    with

    CASS 6.7.2R(1)(b).

    (3) Contravention of paragraph (1) may be relied on as tending to establish contravention
    of

    CASS 6.7.2R(1)(b).

    CASS 6.7.5 G For the purposes of CASS 6.7.4E(1)(a), a firm may use any available
    means to determine the

    correct contact details for the relevant client, including:

    (1) telephoning the client;

    (2) searching internal and/or public records;

    (3) media advertising;

    (4) mortality screening; and

    (5) using credit reference agencies or tracing agents.

    CASS 6.7.6 R If the firm undertook a tracing exercise for the purposes of CASS
    6.2.10R(4) (Allocated but

    unclaimed safe custody assets) before its failure but had not made the charity
    payment under

    that rule by the time of its failure then the findings of that exercise may be
    relied on for the

    purposes of CASS 6.7.4E(1)(a).

    CASS 6.7.7 R (1) A firm must make a record of any safe custody asset disposed
    of in accordance with

    CASS 6.7.2R at the time of the disposal.

    (2) The record under paragraph (1) must state:

    (a) the safe custody asset that was disposed of;

    (b) the value of the consideration received for the safe custody asset disposed
    of;

    (c) the name and contact details of the client to whom the safe custody asset
    was

    allocated, according to the firm’s records at the time of making the record under
    this rule;

    and

    (d) either:

    (i) the efforts applied by the firm to determine the client’s correct contact
    details under

    CASS 6.7.4E(1)(a); or

    (ii) if being relied on under CASS 6.7.6R, the efforts applied by the firm to
    determine

    the client’s correct contact details for the purposes of CASS 6.2.10R(4) (Allocated
    but

    unclaimed safe custody assets).

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (3) A firm must keep the record under paragraph (1) indefinitely.

    CASS 6.7.8 R Transfers of safe custody assets

    (1) This rule applies where, instead of returning a safe custody asset to a client,
    a firm (Firm

    A) is able to transfer the safe custody asset to another person (Firm B) for safekeeping
    on

    behalf of the client.

    (2) Firm A may only effect such a transfer if, in advance of the transfer, it
    has obtained a

    contractual undertaking from Firm B that:

    (a) where regulation 10C(3) of the IBSA Regulations does not apply, Firm B will
    return

    the safe custody asset to the client at the client’s request; and

    (b) Firm B will notify the client, within 14 days of the transfer of that client’s
    safe custody

    asset having commenced:

    (i) of the applicable regulatory regime under which the safe custody asset will
    be held

    by Firm B;

    (ii) either:

    (A) of any relevant compensation scheme limits that may apply in respect of Firm

    B’s handling of the safe custody asset; or

    (B) of the fact that Firm B does not participate in a relevant compensation

    scheme, if that is the case; and

    (iii) where regulation 10C(3) of the IBSA Regulations does not apply, that the
    client

    has the option of having its safe custody asset returned to it by Firm B.

    CASS 6.7.9 G Where regulation 10C(3) of the IBSA Regulations does apply, Firm
    A should, in advance of the

    transfer under CASS 6.7.8R, obtain a contractual undertaking from Firm B that:

    (1) Firm B will comply with the client’s request for a ‘reverse transfer’ as defined
    in

    regulation 10C of the IBSA Regulations; and

    (2) Firm B will notify the client, within 14 days of the transfer of that client’s
    safe custody

    asset having commenced, that the client can demand a ‘reverse transfer’ as defined
    in

    regulation 10C of the IBSA Regulations.

    CASS 6 Custody rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 7 Client money rules

    CASS 7.10 Application and purpose

    CASS 7.11 Treatment of client money

    CASS 7.12 Organisational requirements: client money

    CASS 7.13 Segregation of client money

    CASS 7.14 Client money held by a third party

    CASS 7.15 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 7.16 The standard methods of internal client money reconciliation

    CASS 7.17 Statutory trust

    CASS 7.18 Acknowledgment letters

    CASS 7.19 Clearing member client money sub-pools

    CASS 7 Annex 2 Client bank account acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 3 Client transaction account acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 4 Authorised central counterparty acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 5 Guidance notes for acknowledgement letters (CASS 7.18)

    CASS 7 Annex 6 Sub-pool disclosure document

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 7 Client money rules

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.10 Application and purpose

    CASS 7.10.1 R This chapter applies to a firm that receives money from or holds
    money for, or on behalf of, a

    client in the course of, or in connection with, its:

    (1) MiFID business; and/or

    (2) designated investment business; and/or

    (3) stocks and shares ISA business; and/or

    (4) innovative finance ISA business; and/or

    (5) lifetime ISA business,

    unless otherwise specified in this section.

    CASS 7.10.2 G A firm is reminded that when CASS 7.10.1 R applies it should treat
    client money in an

    appropriate manner so that, for example:

    (1) if it holds client money in a client bank account that account is held in
    the firm''s name in

    accordance with CASS 7.13.13 R;

    (2) if it allows another person to hold client money this is effected under CASS
    7.14; and

    (3) its internal client money reconciliation takes into account any client equity
    balance

    relating to its margined transaction requirements.

    CASS 7.10.3 R Opt-in to the client money rules

    (1) A firm that receives or holds money to which this chapter applies in relation
    to:

    (a) its MiFID business; or

    (b) its MiFID business and its designated investment business which is not MiFID

    business;

    and holds money in respect of which CASS 5 applies, may elect to comply with the

    provisions of this chapter in respect of all such money and if it does so, this
    chapter applies

    as if all such money were money that the firm receives and holds in the course
    of, or in

    connection with, its MiFID business.

    (2) A firm that receives or holds money to which this chapter applies solely in
    relation to its

    designated investment business which is not MiFID business and receives or holds
    money

    in respect of which the insurance client money chapter applies, may elect to comply
    with the

    provisions of this chapter in respect of all such money and if it does so, this
    chapter applies

    as if all such money were money that the firm receives and holds in the course
    of or in

    connection with its designated investment business.

    (2A)

    (a) A firm may elect to comply with all the provisions of this chapter for money
    that it

    receives or holds in respect of an ISA that only contains a cash deposit ISA.

    (b) Where a firm makes an election under (a), this chapter applies to it in the
    same way

    that it applies to a firm who receives and holds money in the course of or in
    connection

    with its MIFID business.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (3) A firm must make and retain a written record of any election it makes under
    this rule,

    including the date from which the election is to be effective. The firm must make
    the record

    on the date it makes the election and must keep it for a period of five years
    after ceasing to

    use it.

    (4) This rule is subject to CASS 1.2.11 R.

    CASS 7.10.3A R Where a firm opts into this chapter under CASS 7.10.3 R (2A) it
    must notify clients for whom it

    holds the opted-in money that it is holding their money in accordance with the
    client money

    rules.

    CASS 7.10.4 G Firms are reminded that, under CASS 1.2.11 R, they must not keep
    money in respect of which

    the client money chapter applies in the same client bank account or client transaction
    account

    as money for which the insurance client money chapter applies.

    CASS 7.10.5 G The opt-in to the client money rules under CASS 7.10.3R does not
    apply in respect of money

    that a firm holds outside of either the:

    (1) scope of the insurance client money chapter; or

    (2) relevant cash deposit ISA wrapper;

    as the case may be.

    CASS 7.10.6 G If a firm has opted to comply with this chapter under CASS 7.10.3R,
    the insurance client money

    chapter will have no application to the activities to which the election applies.

    CASS 7.10.7 G (1) A firm that is only subject to the insurance client money chapter
    may not opt to comply

    with this chapter under either or both CASS 7.10.3 R (1) and CASS 7.10.3 R (2).

    (2) Under CASS 7.10.3 R (2A), a firm may opt to comply with this chapter regardless
    of

    whether it is otherwise subject to the client money rules.

    CASS 7.10.7A R Loan-based crowdfunding

    (1) If both the conditions in (a) and (b) below are met in respect of a firm,
    or the firm

    reasonably expects that they will all be met in the future, then the firm has
    the option to elect

    to comply with this chapter for all of the money described in those conditions:

    (a) the firm receives or holds money for one or more persons in the course of,
    or in

    connection with, the firm’s activity of operating an electronic system in relation
    to nonP2P agreements; and

    (b) those persons are customers of the firm in their capacity as lenders under
    non-P2P

    agreements or prospective lenders under non-P2P agreements.

    (2) A firm can only make the election under (1) by informing the FCA in writing
    of the

    election at least one month before the date on which it intends to start holding
    the money in

    accordance with the client money rules (“the effective date”).

    (3) The communication in (2) must specify the effective date.

    (4) The firm may change the effective date after it has made the communication
    in (2)

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    provided that:

    (a) it informs the FCA in writing before the new effective date; and

    (b) the new effective date is not less than one month after the date of the communication

    in (2).

    CASS 7.10.7B R (1) When a firm makes an election under CASS 7.10.7AR it must write
    to any customer

    (“C”) with whom it has agreed to provide relevant electronic lending services
    in C’s capacity

    as a lender or prospective lender, informing C at least one month before it will
    start to hold

    the money in accordance with the client money rules:

    (a) that all the money it holds in the course of, or in connection with, operating
    an

    electronic system in relation to non-P2P agreements for lenders and prospective
    lenders

    under non-P2P agreements will be treated in accordance with the client money rules;

    and

    (b) of the date on which this will start.

    (2) The firm must also write to any customer (“C”) with whom, following the firm’s
    election, it

    agrees to provide relevant electronic lending services in C’s capacity as a lender
    or

    prospective lender.

    (a) The firm must make this communication in advance of it receiving any money
    from or

    on behalf of C.

    (b) The communication must inform C that all the money the firm holds in the course
    of,

    or in connection with, operating an electronic system in relation to non-P2P agreements

    for lenders and prospective lenders under non-P2P agreements will be treated in

    accordance with the client money rules from the date specified under (1)(b) or,
    if that

    date has passed, that this will be the case from the time of the communication
    onwards.

    CASS 7.10.7C R Once an election made by a firm under CASS 7.10.7AR becomes effective,
    and until it ceases

    to be effective:

    (1) the firm must treat all the money referred to under CASS 7.10.7AR(1) in accordance
    with

    the election; and

    (2) for the purposes of (1), this chapter applies to the firm in the same way
    that it applies to

    a firm that receives and holds money in the course of or in connection with its
    designated

    investment business, except that:

    (a) CASS 7.10.10R will not apply to the money referred to under CASS 7.10.7AR(1);
    and

    (b) “client” for the purposes of CASS and rules and guidance related to CASS and
    their

    application to the firm includes customers of the firm in their capacity as lenders
    or

    prospective lenders under non-P2P agreements.

    CASS 7.10.7D R If a firm that has made an election under CASS 7.10.7AR subsequently
    decides to cancel that

    election:

    (1) it can only do so by writing to the FCA, at least one month before the date
    the election

    ceases to be effective;

    (2) it must write to any customer with whom, as at the time of the cancellation,
    it has agreed

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    to operate an electronic system in relation to non-P2P agreements in their capacity
    as a

    lender or prospective lender, informing them at least one month before the date
    the election

    ceases to be effective:

    (a) of the extent to which it will cease to hold their money in accordance with
    the client

    money rules; and

    (b) of the date from which those changes will take effect; and

    (3) it must write to any customer (“C”) with whom, following the firm’s decision
    to cancel the

    election but before the election ceases to be effective, it agrees to operate
    an electronic

    system in relation to non-P2P agreements in C’s capacity as a lender or prospective
    lender,

    in advance of the firm receiving any money from them or on their behalf, informing
    them:

    (a) of the period during which it will continue to hold all the money of lenders
    and

    prospective lenders under non-P2P agreements in accordance with the client money

    rules;

    (b) of the extent to which it will subsequently cease to hold their money in accordance

    with the client money rules; and

    (c) of the date from which those changes will take effect.

    CASS 7.10.7E R (1) A firm must make and retain a written record of any election
    it makes under CASS

    7.10.7AR including:

    (a) the date from which the election is to be effective; and

    (b) if it cancels the election, the date from which the election is to cease to
    be effective.

    (2) The firm must:

    (a) make the record on the date it makes the election;

    (b) update the record it if it decides to cancel the election or change the effective
    date;

    and

    (c) keep the record for a period of five years after ceasing to use the election.

    CASS 7.10.7F G (1) Where a firm has made an election under CASS 7.10.7AR:

    (a) it should treat money held for a client as client money both in the course
    of or in

    connection with:

    (i) operating an electronic system in relation to lending; and

    (ii) operating an electronic system in relation to non-P2P agreements;

    (b) (a) is regardless of whether, at the time the firm is holding the money, the
    client could

    or could not be a lender under a P2P agreement; and

    (c) under SYSC 4.1.8ER(2) it will be not be able to accept, take, or receive the
    transfer

    of full ownership of money relating to non-P2P agreements.

    (2) Where a firm has not made an election under CASS 7.10.7AR, or where it has

    previously made an election but the election has ceased to be effective under
    CASS

    7.10.7DR, any money it holds:

    (a) in the course of, or in connection with relevant electronic lending services,
    for a client

    who at that time will or could be a lender under a P2P agreement in respect of
    that

    money, should be treated as client money (for example because that client’s contractual

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    investment criteria permit that money to be invested in a P2P agreement); and

    (b) in the course of, or in connection with, operating an electronic system in
    relation to

    non-P2P agreements, for a customer who at that time could not be a lender under
    a P2P

    agreement in respect of that money, should not be treated as client money (for
    example

    because that customer’s contractual investment criteria only permit that money
    to be

    invested in a non-P2P agreement).

    CASS 7.10.8 R Money that is not client money: ''opt outs'' for any business other
    than

    insurance distribution activity

    CASS 7.10.9 G to CASS 7.10.15 G do not apply to a firm in relation to money held
    in

    connection with its MiFID business to which this chapter applies or in relation
    to money for

    which the firm has made an election under CASS 7.10.3 R(1) or CASS 7.10.7AR.

    CASS 7.10.9 G Professional client opt-out

    The ''opt out'' provisions provide a firm with the option of allowing a professional
    client to choose

    whether their money is subject to the client money rules (unless the firm is conducting

    insurance distribution activity).

    CASS 7.10.10 R Subject to CASS 7.10.12 R, money is not client money when a firm
    (other than a sole trader)

    holds that money on behalf of, or receives it from, a professional client, other
    than in the course

    of insurance distribution activity, and the firm has obtained written acknowledgement
    from the

    professional client that:

    (1) money will not be subject to the protections conferred by the client money
    rules;

    (2) as a consequence, this money will not be segregated from the money of the
    firm in

    accordance with the client money rules and will be used by the firm in the course
    of its own

    business; and

    (3) the professional client will rank only as a general creditor of the firm.

    CASS 7.10.11 G ''Opt-outs'' for non-IDD business

    For a firm whose business is not governed by the IDD, it is possible to ''opt
    out'' on a one-way

    basis. However, in order to maintain a comparable regime to that applying to MiFID
    business,

    all ''MiFID type'' business undertaken outside the scope of MiFID should comply
    with the client

    money rules or be ''opted out'' on a two-way basis.

    CASS 7.10.12 R Money is not client money if a firm, in respect of designated investment
    business which is not

    an investment service or activity, an ancillary service, a listed activity or
    insurance distribution

    activity:

    (1) holds it on behalf of or receives it from a professional client who is not
    an authorised

    person; and

    (2) has sent a separate written notice to the professional client stating the
    matters set out in

    CASS 7.10.10 R (1) to CASS 7.10.10 R (3).

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.10.13 G When a firm undertakes a range of business for a professional client
    and has separate

    agreements for each type of business undertaken, the firm may treat client money
    held on

    behalf of the client differently for different types of business; for example,
    a firm may, under

    CASS 7.10.10 R or CASS 7.10.12 R, elect to segregate client money in connection
    with

    securities transactions and not segregate (by complying with CASS 7.10.10 R or
    CASS 7.10.12

    R) money in connection with contingent liability investments for the same client.

    CASS 7.10.14 R When a firm transfers client money to another person, the firm
    must not enter into an

    agreement under CASS 7.10.10 R or CASS 7.10.12 R with that other person in relation
    to that

    client money or represent to that other person that the money is not client money.

    CASS 7.10.15 G CASS 7.10.14 R prevents a firm, when passing client money to another
    person under CASS

    7.14.2 R (Transfer of client money to a third party), from making use of the ''opt
    out'' provisions

    under CASS 7.10.10 R or CASS 7.10.12 R.

    CASS 7.10.16 R Credit institutions and approved banks

    In relation to the application of the client money rules (and any other rule in
    so far as it relates

    to matters covered by the client money rules) to the firms referred to in (1)
    and (2), the following

    is not client money:

    (1) any deposits within the meaning of the CRD held by a CRD credit institution;
    and

    [Note: article 16(9) of MiFID and article 4(1) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    (2) any money held by an approved bank that is not a CRD credit institution in
    an account

    with itself in relation to designated investment business carried on for its clients.

    CASS 7.10.17 G A firm referred to in CASS 7.10.16 R must comply, as relevant,
    with CASS 7.10.18 G to CASS

    7.10.24 R.

    CASS 7.10.18 G The effect of CASS 7.10.16 R is that, unless notified otherwise
    in accordance with CASS

    7.10.20 R or CASS 7.10.22 R, clients of CRD credit institutions or approved banks
    that are not

    CRD credit institutions should expect that where they pass money to such firms
    in connection

    with designated investment business these sums will not be held as client money.

    CASS 7.10.19 R A firm holding money in either of the ways described in CASS 7.10.16
    R must, before providing

    designated investment business services to the client in respect of those sums,
    notify the client

    that:

    (1) the money held for that client is held by the firm as banker and not as a
    trustee under the

    client money rules; and

    (2) if the firm fails, the client money distribution and transfer rules will not
    apply to these

    sums and so the client will not be entitled to share in any distribution under
    the client money

    distribution and transfer rules.

    CASS 7.10.20 R A firm holding money in either of the ways described in CASS 7.10.16
    R in respect of a client

    and providing the services to it referred to in CASS 7.10.19 R must:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (1) explain to its clients the circumstances, if any, under which it will cease
    to hold any

    money in respect of those services as banker and will hold the money as trustee
    in

    accordance with the client money rules; and

    (2) set out the circumstances in (1), if any, in its terms of business so that
    they form part of

    its agreement with the client.

    CASS 7.10.21 G Where a firm receives money that would otherwise be held as client
    money but for CASS

    7.10.16 R:

    (1) it should be able to account to all of its clients for sums held for them
    at all times; and

    (2) that money should, pursuant to Principle 10, be allocated to the relevant
    client promptly.

    This should be done no later than ten business days after the firm has received
    the money.

    CASS 7.10.22 R If a CRD credit institution or an approved bank that is not a CRD
    credit institution wishes to hold

    client money for a client (rather than hold the money in either of the ways described
    in CASS

    7.10.16 R) it must, before providing designated investment business services to
    the client,

    disclose the following information to the client:

    (1) that the money held for that client in the course of or in connection with
    the business

    described under (2) is being held by the firm as client money under the client
    money rules;

    (2) a description of the relevant business carried on with the client in respect
    of which the

    client money rules apply to the firm; and

    (3) that, if the firm fails, the client money distribution and transfer rules
    will apply to money

    held in relation to the business in question.

    CASS 7.10.23 G Firms carrying on MiFID business are reminded of their obligation
    to supply investor

    compensation scheme information to clients under COBS 6.1.16 R or COBS 6.1ZA.22R

    (Compensation Information).

    CASS 7.10.24 R A CRD credit institution or an approved bank that is not a CRD
    credit institution must, in respect

    of any client money held in relation to its designated investment business that
    is not MiFID

    business, comply with the obligations referred to in COBS 6.1.16 R (Compensation

    information).

    CASS 7.10.25 G Affiliated companies: MiFID business

    A firm that holds money on behalf of, or receives money from, an affiliated company
    in respect

    of MiFID business must treat the affiliated company as any other client of the
    firm for the

    purposes of this chapter.

    CASS 7.10.26 R Affiliated companies: non-MiFID business

    A firm that holds money on behalf of, or receives money from, an affiliated company
    in respect

    of designated investment business which is not MiFID business must not treat the
    money as

    client money unless:

    (1) the firm has been notified by the affiliated company that the money belongs
    to a client of

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    the affiliated company; or

    (2) the affiliated company is a client dealt with at arm''s length; or

    (3) the affiliated company is a manager of an occupational pension scheme or is
    an

    overseas company; and

    (a) the money is given to the firm in order to carry on designated investment
    business for

    or on behalf of the clients of the affiliated company; and

    (b) the firm has been notified by the affiliated company that the money is to
    be treated as

    client money.

    CASS 7.10.27 R Coins

    The client money rules do not apply with respect to coins held on behalf of a
    client if the firm

    and the client have agreed that the money (or money of that type) is to be held
    by the firm for

    the intrinsic value of the metal which constitutes the coin.

    CASS 7.10.28 R Solicitors

    (1) An authorised professional firm regulated by the Law Society (of England and
    Wales),

    the Law Society of Scotland or the Law Society of Northern Ireland that, with
    respect to its

    regulated activities, is subject to the following rules of its designated professional
    body, must

    comply with those rules and, where relevant paragraph (3), and if it does so,
    it will be

    deemed to comply with the client money rules.

    (2) The relevant rules are:

    (a) if the firm is regulated by the Law Society (of England and Wales), the SRA
    Accounts

    Rules 2011;

    (b) if the firm is regulated by the Law Society of Scotland, the Law Society of
    Scotland

    Practice Rules 2011; and

    (c) if the firm is regulated by the Law Society of Northern Ireland, the Solicitors''
    Accounts

    Regulations 1998.

    (3) If the firm in (1) is a MiFID investment firm that receives or holds money
    for, or on behalf

    of a client in the course of, or in connection with its MiFID business, it must
    also comply with

    the MiFID client money (minimum implementing) rules in relation to that business.

    CASS 7.10.29 R Long term insurers and friendly societies

    This chapter does not apply to the permitted activities of a long-term insurer
    or a friendly

    society, unless it is a MiFID investment firm that receives money from or holds
    money for or on

    behalf of a client in the course of, or in connection with, its MiFID business.

    CASS 7.10.30 R Contracts of insurance

    (1) Provided it complies with CASS 1.2.11 R, a firm that receives or holds client
    money in

    relation to contracts of insurance may elect to comply with the provisions of
    the insurance

    client money chapter, instead of this chapter, in respect of all such money.

    (2) This rule is subject to CASS 1.2.11 R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.10.31 R A firm must make and retain a written record of any election which
    it makes under CASS

    7.10.30 R.

    CASS 7.10.32 G Life assurance business

    (1) A firm which receives and holds client money in respect of life assurance
    business in the

    course of its designated investment business that is not MiFID business may:

    (a) under CASS 7.10.3 R (2) elect to comply with the client money chapter in respect
    of

    such client money and in doing so avoid the need to comply with the insurance
    client

    money chapter which would otherwise apply to the firm in respect of client money

    received in the course of its insurance distribution activity; or

    (b) under CASS 7.10.30 R, elect to comply with the insurance client money chapter
    in

    respect of such client money.

    (2) These options are available to a firm irrespective of whether it also receives
    and holds

    client money in respect of other parts of its designated investment business.
    A firm may not

    however choose to comply with the insurance client money chapter in respect of
    client

    money which it receives and holds in the course of any part of its designated
    investment

    business which does not involve an insurance distribution activity.

    CASS 7.10.33 R Trustee firms

    A trustee firm which holds money in relation to its designated investment business
    which is not

    MiFID business to which this chapter applies, must hold any such client money
    separate from

    its own money at all times.

    CASS 7.10.34 R Subject to CASS 7.10.35 R only the client money rules listed in
    the table below apply to a

    trustee firm in connection with money that the firm receives, or holds for or
    on behalf of a client

    in the course of or in connection with its designated investment business which
    is not MiFID

    business.

    Reference Rule

    CASS 7.10.1 R to CASS 7.10.6 G, and CASS Application

    7.10.16 R to CASS 7.10.27 R

    CASS 7.10.33 R to CASS 7.10.40 G Trustee firms

    CASS 7.10.41 G General purpose

    CASS 7.13.3 R to CASS 7.13.4 G Depositing client money

    CASS 7.13.8 R to CASS 7.13.11 G Selection, appointment and review of third

    parties

    CASS 7.13.12 R to CASS 7.13.19 G Client bank accounts

    CASS 7.13.20 R to CASS 7.13.25 R Diversification of client money

    CASS 7.13.26 R to CASS 7.13.29 G Qualifying money market funds

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Reference Rule

    CASS 7.15.5 R (3), CASS 7.15.7 R and Reconciliation of client money balances

    CASS 7.15.12 R to CASS 7.15.34 G

    CASS 7.16 The standard methods of internal client

    money reconciliation

    CASS 7.17.2 R to CASS 7.17.4 G Requirement

    CASS 7.10.35 R (1) A trustee firm to which CASS 7.10.34 R applies may, in addition
    to the client money

    rules set out at CASS 7.10.34 R, also elect to comply with:

    (a) all the client money rules in CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client money);

    (b) CASS 7.14 (Client money held by a third party);

    (c) all the client money rules in CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations);
    or

    (d) CASS 7.18 (Acknowledgement letters).

    (2) A trustee firm must make a written record of any election it makes under this
    rule,

    including the date from which the election is to be effective. The firm must make
    the record

    on the date it makes the election and must keep it for a period of five years
    after ceasing to

    use it.

    (3) Where a trustee firm has made an election under (1) which it subsequently
    decides to

    cease to use, it must make a written record of this decision, including the date
    from which

    the decision is to be effective, and keep that record from the date the decision
    is made for a

    period of five years after the date it is to be effective.

    CASS 7.10.36 R A trustee firm to which CASS 7.10.34 R applies and which is otherwise
    subject to the client

    money rules must ensure that any client money it holds other than in its capacity
    as trustee firm

    is segregated from client money it holds as a trustee firm.

    CASS 7.10.37 G A trustee firm to which CASS 7.10.34 R applies and which is otherwise
    subject to the client

    money rules should ensure that in designing its systems and controls it:

    (1) takes into account that the client money distribution rules will only apply
    in relation to any

    client money that the firm holds other than in its capacity as trustee firm; and

    (2) has regard to other legislation that may be applicable.

    CASS 7.10.38 R (1) A trustee firm to which CASS 7.10.34 R applies may elect that:

    (a) the applicable provisions of CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client money) and CASS
    7.15

    (Records, accounts and reconciliations) under CASS 7.10.34 R; and

    (b) any further provisions it elects to comply with under CASS 7.10.35 R (1);

    will apply separately and concurrently for each distinct trust that the trustee
    firm acts for.

    (2) A trustee firm must make a written record of any election it makes under this
    rule,

    including the date from which the election is to be effective. The firm must make
    the record

    on the date it makes the election and must keep it for a period of five years
    after ceasing to

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    use it.

    (3) Where a trustee firm has made an election under (1) which it subsequently
    decides to

    cease to use, it must make a written record of this decision, including the date
    from which

    the decision is to be effective, and must keep that record from the date the decision
    is made

    for a period of five years after the date it is to be effective.

    CASS 7.10.39 G A trustee firm may wish to make an election under CASS 7.10.38
    R if, for example, it acts for a

    number of distinct trusts which it wishes, or is required, to keep operationally
    separate. If a firm

    makes such an election then it should:

    (1) establish and maintain adequate internal systems and controls to effectively
    segregate

    client money held for one trust from client money held for another trust; and

    (2) conduct internal client money reconciliations as set out in CASS 7.16 and
    external client

    money reconciliations under CASS 7.15.20 R for each trust.

    CASS 7.10.40 G The provisions in CASS 7.10.34 R to CASS 7.10.39 G do not affect
    the general application of

    the client money rules regarding money that is held by a firm other than in its
    capacity as a

    trustee firm.

    CASS 7.10.41 G General purpose

    (1) Principle 10 (Clients'' assets) requires a firm to arrange adequate protection
    for clients''

    assets when the firm is responsible for them. An essential part of that protection
    is the

    proper accounting and treatment of client money. The client money rules provide

    requirements for firms that receive or hold client money, in whatever form.

    (2) The client money rules also, where relevant, implement the provisions of MiFID
    which

    regulate the obligations of a firm when it holds client money in the course of
    its MiFID

    business.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.11 Treatment of client money

    CASS 7.11.1 R Title transfer collateral arrangements

    (1) [deleted]

    (2) [deleted]

    (3)

    (a) A firm must not enter into a TTCA in respect of money belonging to a retail
    client.

    (b) Where a firm entered into a TTCA in respect of money belonging to a retail
    client (or

    money which would belong to a retail client but for the arrangement) before 3
    January

    2018, the firm must terminate that TTCA.

    [Note: article 16(10) of MiFID and article 5(5) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    (4) Money that is subject to a TTCA does not amount to client money, provided
    that the

    TTCA is not with a retail client.[Note: recital 52 to MiFID]

    CASS 7.11.3 R (1) A firm must ensure that any TTCA is the subject of a written
    agreement made on a

    durable medium between the firm and the client.

    (2) Regardless of the form of the written agreement in (1) (which may have additional

    commercial purposes), it must cover the client''s agreement to:

    (a) the terms for the arrangement relating to the transfer of the client''s full
    ownership of

    money to the firm;

    (b) any terms under which the ownership of money is to transfer from the firm
    back to the

    client; and

    (c) (to the extent not covered by the terms under (b)), any terms for the termination
    of:

    (i) the arrangement under (a); or

    (ii) the overall agreement in (1).

    (3) A firm must retain a copy of the agreement under (1) from the date the agreement
    is

    entered into and until five years after the agreement is terminated.

    CASS 7.11.4 G The terms referred to in CASS 7.11.3 R (2)(b) may include, for example,
    terms under which the

    arrangement relating to the transfer of full ownership of money to the firm is
    not in effect from

    time to time, or is contingent on some other condition.

    CASS 7.11.4A R (1) A firm must properly consider and document the use of TTCAs
    in the context of the

    relationship between the client’s obligation to the firm and the money subjected
    to TTCAs by

    the firm.

    (2) A firm must be able to demonstrate that it has complied with the requirement
    under (1).

    (3) When considering, and documenting, the appropriateness of the use of TTCAs,
    a firm

    must take into account the following factors:

    (a) whether there is only a very weak connection between the client’s obligation
    to the

    firm and the use of TTCAs, including whether the likelihood of a liability arising
    is low or

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    negligible;

    (b) the extent by which the amount of money subject to a TTCA is in excess of
    the

    client’s obligations (including where the TTCA applies to all money from the point
    of

    receipt by the firm) and whether the client might have no obligations at all to
    the firm; and

    (c) whether all the client’s money is made subject to TTCAs, without consideration
    of

    what obligation the client has to the firm.

    (4) Where a firm uses a TTCA, it must highlight to the client the risks involved
    and the effect

    of any TTCA on the client’s money.

    [Note: article 6 of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.11.6 G Where a firm has received full title or full ownership to money
    under a collateral arrangement,

    the fact that it has also granted a security interest to its client to secure
    its obligation to repay

    that money to the client would not result in the money being client money. This
    can be

    compared to a situation in which a firm takes a charge or other security interest
    over money

    held in a client bank account, where that money would still be client money as
    there would be

    no absolute transfer of title to the firm. However, where a firm has received
    client money under

    a security interest and the security interest includes a "right to use arrangement",
    under which

    the client agrees to transfer all of its rights to money in that account to the
    firm upon the

    exercise of the right to use, the money may cease to be client money, but only
    once the right to

    use is exercised and the money is transferred out of the client bank account to
    the firm.

    CASS 7.11.7 G Firms are reminded of the client''sbest interest rule, which requires
    a firm to act honestly, fairly

    and professionally in accordance with the best interests of its clients when structuring
    its

    business particularly in respect of the effect of that structure on firms'' obligations
    under the

    client money rules.

    CASS 7.11.9 R Termination of title transfer collateral arrangements

    (1) If a client communicates to a firm that it wishes (whether pursuant to a contractual
    right

    or otherwise) to terminate a TTCA, and the client''s communication is not in writing,
    the firm

    must make a written record of the client''s communication, which also records
    the date the

    communication was received.

    (2) A firm must keep a client''s written communication, or a written record of
    the client''s

    communication in (1), for five years starting from the date the communication
    was received

    by the firm.

    (3)

    (a) If a firm agrees to the termination of a TTCA, it must notify the client of
    its agreement

    in writing. The notification must state when the termination is to take effect
    and whether

    or not the client''s money will be treated as client money by the firm thereafter.

    (b) If a firm does not agree to terminate a TTCA, it must notify the client of
    its

    disagreement in writing.

    (4) A firm must keep a written record of any notification it makes to a client
    under (3) for a

    period of five years, starting from the date the notification was made.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.11.10 G CASS 7.11.9 R (3)(a) refers only to a firm''s agreement to terminate
    an existing TTCA. Such

    agreement by a firm does not necessarily need to amount to the termination of
    its entire

    agreement with the client.

    CASS 7.11.11 G When a firm notifies a client under CASS 7.11.9 R (3)(a) of when
    the termination of a TTCA is

    to take effect, it should take into account:

    (1) any relevant terms relating to such a termination that have been agreed with
    the client;

    and

    (2) the period of time it reasonably requires to return the money to the client,
    or to update its

    records under CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations) and to segregate
    the

    money as client money under CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client money).

    CASS 7.11.12 R (1) If a TTCA is terminated then, unless otherwise permitted under
    the client money rules

    and notified to the client under CASS 7.11.9R(3)(a), the firm must treat that
    money as client

    money from the start of the next business day following the date of termination
    as set out in

    the firm’s notification under CASS 7.11.9R (3)(a).

    (2) Where the firm’s notification under CASS 7.11.9R(3)(a) does not state when
    the

    termination of the arrangement will take effect, the firm must treat that money
    as client

    money from the start of the next business day following the date on which the
    firm’s

    notification is made.

    CASS 7.11.13 G A firm to which CASS 7.11.12 R applies should, for example, update
    its records under CASS

    7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations) and segregate the money as client
    money under

    CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client money), from the relevant time at which the firm
    is required to

    treat the money as client money.

    CASS 7.11.14 R Delivery versus payment transaction exemption

    (1) Subject to (2) and CASS 7.11.16 R and with the agreement of the relevant client,
    money

    need not be treated as client money in respect of a delivery versus payment transaction

    through a commercial settlement system if:

    (a) in respect of a client''s purchase the firm intends for the money from the
    client to be

    due to it within one business day following the firm''s fulfilment of its delivery
    obligation to

    the client; or

    (b) in respect of a client''s sale, the firm intends for the money in question
    to be due to

    the client within one business day following the client''s fulfilment of its delivery
    obligation

    to the firm.

    (2) If the payment or delivery by the firm to the client has not occurred by the
    close of

    business on the third business day following the date on which the firm makes
    use of the

    exemption under (1), the firm must stop using that exemption for the transaction.

    CASS 7.11.16 R A firm cannot, in respect of a particular delivery versus payment
    transaction, make use of the

    exemption under CASS 7.11.14 R in either or both of the following circumstances:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (1) it is not a direct member or participant of the relevant commercial settlement
    system, nor

    is it sponsored by such a member or participant, in accordance with the terms
    and

    conditions of that commercial settlement system;

    (2) the transaction in question is being settled by another person on behalf of
    the firm

    through an account held at the relevant commercial settlement system by that other
    person.

    CASS 7.11.17 R Where a firm does not meet the requirements in CASS 7.11.14 R or
    CASS 7.11.16 R for the

    use of the exemption in CASS 7.11.14 R , the firm is subject to the client money
    rules in respect

    of any money it holds in connection with the delivery versus payment transaction
    in question.

    CASS 7.11.18 G (1) In line with CASS 7.11.14 R, where a firm receives money from
    the client in fulfilment of

    the client''s payment obligation in respect of a delivery versus payment transaction
    the firm is

    carrying out through a commercial settlement system in respect of a client''s
    purchase, and

    the firm has not fulfilled its delivery obligation to the client by close of business
    on the third

    business day following the date of the client''s fulfilment of its payment obligation
    to the firm,

    the firm must treat the client money in accordance with the client money rules
    until delivery

    by the firm to the client occurs.

    (2) Upon settlement of a delivery versus payment transaction a firm is carrying
    out through a

    commercial settlement system (including when it is settled within the three business
    day

    period referred to in CASS 7.11.14 R (2)) then, in respect of:

    (a) a client''s purchase, the custody rules apply to the relevant safe custody
    asset the

    firm receives upon settlement; and

    (b) a client''s sale, the client money rules will apply to the relevant money
    received on

    settlement.

    CASS 7.11.19 R A firm will not be in breach of the requirement under CASS 7.13.6
    R to receive client money

    directly into a client bank account if it:

    (1) receives the money in question:

    (a) in accordance with CASS 7.11.14 R (1)(a) but it is subsequently required under

    CASS 7.11.14 R (2) to hold that money in accordance with the client money rules;
    or

    (b) in the circumstances referred to in CASS 7.11.18 G (2)(b); and

    (2) pays the money in question into a client bank account promptly, and in any
    event by

    close of business on the business day following:

    (a) the expiration of the relevant period referred to in CASS 7.11.14 R (2); or

    (b) receipt of the money in the circumstances referred to in CASS 7.11.18 G (2)(b).

    CASS 7.11.20 R (1) If a firm makes use of the exemption under CASS 7.11.14 R,
    it must obtain the client''s

    written agreement to the firm''s use of the exemption.

    (2) In respect of each client, the record created in (1) must be retained during
    the time that

    the firm makes use, or intends to make use, of the exemption under CASS 7.11.14
    R in

    respect of that client''s monies.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.11.21 R (1) Subject to (2)(a), money need not be treated as client money:

    (a) in respect of a delivery versus payment transaction for the purpose of settling
    a

    transaction in relation to units in a regulated collective investment scheme in
    either of the

    following circumstances:

    (i) the authorised fund manager receives the money from a client in relation to
    the

    authorised fund manager''s obligation to issue units, in an AUT or ACS, or to
    arrange

    for the issue of units in an ICVC, in accordance with COLL; or

    (ii) the money is held in the course of redeeming units where the proceeds of
    that

    redemption are paid to a client within the time specified in COLL.

    (2)

    (a) Where, in respect of money received in any of the circumstances set out in
    (1), the

    authorised fund manager has not, by close of business on the business day following
    the

    date of receipt of the money, paid this money to the depositary of an AUT or ACS,
    the

    ICVC or to the client as the case may be, the authorised fund manager must stop
    using

    the exemption under (1) for that transaction.

    (b) Paragraph (2)(a) does not prevent a firm transferring client money segregated
    under

    (2)(a) into the firm''s own account, provided this is done only for the purpose
    of making a

    payment on the same day from that account in accordance with CASS 7.11.34R(1)
    to

    CASS 7.11.34R(3) (Discharge of fiduciary duty).

    CASS 7.11.22 R An authorised fund manager will not be in breach of the requirement
    under CASS 7.13.6R to

    receive client money directly into a client bank account if it received the money
    in accordance

    with CASS 7.11.21 R (1) and is subsequently required under CASS 7.11.21 R (2)
    to hold that

    money in accordance with the client money rules.

    CASS 7.11.23 G Where proceeds of redemption paid to the client in accordance with
    CASS 7.11.21 R (1)(a)(ii)

    are paid by cheque, the cheque should be issued from the relevant client bank
    account.

    CASS 7.11.24 R (1) If a firm makes use of the exemption under CASS 7.11.21 R,
    it must obtain the client''s

    written agreement to the firm''s use of the exemption.

    (2) In respect of each client, the record created in (1) must be retained for
    the duration of the

    time that the firm makes use of the exemption under CASS 7.11.21 R in respect
    of that

    client''s money.

    CASS 7.11.25 R Money due and payable to the firm

    (1) Money is not client money when it becomes properly due and payable to the
    firm for its

    own account.

    (2) For these purposes, if a firm makes a payment to, or on the instructions of,
    a client, from

    an account other than a client bank account, until that payment has cleared, no
    equivalent

    sum from a client bank account for reimbursement will become due and payable to
    the firm.

    CASS 7.11.26 G Money will not become properly due and payable to the firm merely
    through the firm holding

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    that money for a specified period of time. If a firm wishes to cease to hold client
    money for a

    client it must comply with CASS 7.11.34 R (Discharge of fiduciary duty) or, if
    the balance is

    allocated but unclaimed client money, CASS 7.11.50 R (Allocated but unclaimed
    client money)

    or CASS 7.11.57 R (De minimis amounts of unclaimed client money).

    CASS 7.11.27 G Money held as client money becomes due and payable to the firm
    or for the firm''s own account,

    for example, because the firm acted as principal in the contract or the firm,
    acting as agent, has

    itself paid for securities in advance of receiving the purchase money from its
    client. The

    circumstances in which it is due and payable will depend on the contractual arrangement

    between the firm and the client.

    CASS 7.11.28 G Firms are reminded that, notwithstanding that money may be due
    and payable to them, they

    have a continuing obligation to segregate client money in accordance with the
    client money

    rules. In particular, in accordance with CASS 7.15.2 R, firms must ensure the
    accuracy of their

    records and accounts and are reminded of the requirement to carry out internal
    client money

    reconciliations either in accordance with the standard methods of internal client
    money

    reconciliation or the requirements for a non-standard method of internal client
    money

    reconciliation.

    CASS 7.11.29 G When a client''s obligation or liability, which is secured by that
    client''s asset, crystallises, and the

    firm realises the asset in accordance with an agreement entered into between the
    client and the

    firm, the part of the proceeds of the asset to cover such liability that is due
    and payable to the

    firm is not client money. However, any proceeds of sale in excess of the amount
    owed by the

    client to the firm should be paid over to the client immediately or be held in
    accordance with the

    client money rules.

    CASS 7.11.30 G Commission rebate

    When a firm has entered into an arrangement under which commission is rebated
    to a client,

    those rebates need not be treated as client money until they become due and payable
    to the

    client in accordance with the terms of the contractual arrangements between the
    parties.

    CASS 7.11.31 G When commission rebate becomes due and payable to the client, the
    firm should:

    (1) treat it as client money; or

    (2) pay it out in accordance with the rule regarding the discharge of a firm''s
    fiduciary duty to

    the client (see CASS 7.11.34 R);

    unless the firm and the client have entered into an arrangement under which the
    client has

    agreed to transfer full ownership of this money to the firm as collateral against
    payment of

    future professional fees (see CASS 7.11 (Title transfer collateral arrangements)).

    CASS 7.11.32 R Interest

    A firm must pay a retail client any interest earned on client money held for that
    client unless it

    has otherwise notified him in writing.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.11.33 G (1) The firm may, under the terms of its agreement with the client,
    pay some, none, or all

    interest earned to the relevant client.

    (2) Where interest is payable on client money by a firm to clients:

    (a) such sums are client money and so, if not paid to, or to the order of the
    clients, are

    required to be segregated in accordance with CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client
    money);

    (b) the interest should be paid to clients in accordance with the firm''s agreement
    with

    each client; and

    (c) if the firm''s agreement with the client is silent as to when interest should
    be paid to

    the client the firm should follow CASS 7.13.36 R (Allocation of client money receipts);

    irrespective of whether the client is a retail client or otherwise.

    CASS 7.11.33A Discharge of fiduciary duty

    R

    (1) CASS 7.11.34R(2)(c), CASS 7.11.34R(2)(d) and CASS 7.11.34R(10) do not apply
    to a

    firm following a primary pooling event.

    (2) CASS 7.11.34R(2)(e) only applies to a firm following a primary pooling event.

    CASS 7.11.34 R Money ceases to be client money (having regard to CASS 7.11.40
    R where applicable) if:

    (1) it is paid to the client, or a duly authorised representative of the client;
    or

    (2) it is:

    (a) paid to a third party on the instruction of, or with the specific consent
    of, the client

    unless it is transferred to a third party in the course of effecting a transaction
    under

    CASS 7.14.2 R (Transfer of client money to a third party); or

    (b) paid to a third party pursuant to an obligation on the firm where:

    (i) that obligation arises under an enactment; and

    (ii) the obligation under that enactment is applicable to the firm as a result
    of the

    nature of the business being undertaken by the firm for its client; or

    (c) transferred in accordance with CASS 7.11.42 R; or

    (d) transferred in accordance with CASS 7.11.44 R; or

    (e) transferred in accordance with CASS 7A.2.4R(4); or

    (3) subject to CASS 7.11.39R, it is paid into a bank account of the client (not
    being an

    account which is also in the name of the firm); or

    (4) it is due and payable to the firm in accordance with CASS 7.11.25 R (Money
    due and

    payable to the firm); or

    (5) it is paid to the firm as an excess in the client bank account (see CASS 7.15.29
    R (2)

    (Reconciliation discrepancies)); or

    (6) it is paid by an authorised central counterparty to a clearing member other
    than the firm

    in connection with a porting arrangement in accordance with CASS 7.11.35 R; or

    (7) it is paid by an authorised central counterparty directly to the client in
    accordance with

    CASS 7.11.36 R; or

    (8) it is transferred by the firm to a clearing member in connection with a regulated
    clearing

    arrangement and the clearing member remits payment to another firm or to another
    clearing

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    member in accordance with CASS 7.11.37 R (1); or

    (9) it is transferred by the firm to a clearing member in connection with a regulated
    clearing

    arrangement and the clearing member remits payment directly to the indirect clients
    of the

    firm in accordance with CASS 7.11.37 R (2);

    (10) it is paid to charity under CASS 7.11.50 R or CASS 7.11.57 R; or

    (11) it is transferred to a dormant asset fund operator under the applicable provisions
    of Part

    1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022 and in accordance with CASS 7.11.57AR.

    CASS 7.11.35 R Client money which the firm places at an authorised central counterparty
    in connection with a

    regulated clearing arrangement ceases to be client money for that firm if, as
    part of the default

    management process of that authorised central counterparty in respect of a default
    by the firm,

    it is ported by the authorised central counterparty in accordance with article
    48 of EMIR.

    CASS 7.11.36 R Client money which the firm places at an authorised central counterparty
    in connection with a

    regulated clearing arrangement ceases to be client money if, as part of the default
    management

    process of that authorised central counterparty in respect of a default by the
    firm, it is paid

    directly to the client by the authorised central counterparty in accordance with
    the procedure

    described in article 48(7) of EMIR.

    CASS 7.11.37 R Client money received or held by the firm and transferred to a
    clearing member who facilitates

    indirect clearing through a regulated clearing arrangement ceases to be client
    money for that

    firm and, if applicable, the clearing member, if the clearing member in accordance
    with the

    EMIR indirect clearing default management obligations or the MiFIR indirect clearing
    default

    management obligations (as applicable):

    (1) remits payment to another firm or to another clearing member; or

    (2) remits payment to the indirect clients of the firm.

    CASS 7.11.38 R Client money received or held by the firm for a sub-pool ceases
    to be client money for that firm

    to the extent that such client money is transferred by the firm to an authorised
    central

    counterparty or a clearing member as a result of porting.

    CASS 7.11.39 R A firm must not pay client money into a bank account of the client
    that has been opened without

    the consent of that client.

    CASS 7.11.40 R When a firm draws a cheque or other payable order to discharge
    its fiduciary duty to the client,

    it must continue to treat the sum concerned as client money until the cheque or
    order is

    presented and paid by the bank.

    CASS 7.11.40A Transfer of business

    R

    CASS 7.11.41G to CASS 7.11.47R do not apply to a firm following a primary pooling
    event.

    CASS 7.11.40B CASS 7A.2.4R(4) (Pooling and distribution or transfer) applies to
    a firm in respect of transfers

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    G of client money to another person following a primary pooling event.

    CASS 7.11.41 G A firm may transfer client money to a third party as part of transferring
    all or part of its business

    if, in respect of each client with an interest in the client money that is sought
    to be transferred,

    it:

    (1) obtains the consent or instruction of that client at the time of the transfer
    of business (see

    CASS 7.11.34 R (2)(a); or

    (2) complies with CASS 7.11.42 R (see CASS 7.11.34 R (2)(c); or

    (3) complies withCASS 7.11.44 R (see CASS 7.11.34 R (2)(d)).

    CASS 7.11.42 R Subject to CASS 7.11.44 R, money ceases to be client money for
    a firm if:

    (1) it is transferred by the firm to another person as part of a transfer of business
    to that

    person where the client money relates to the business being transferred;

    (2) it is transferred on terms which require the other person to return a client''s
    transferred

    sums to the client as soon as practicable at the client''s request;

    (3) a written agreement between the firm and the relevant client provides that:

    (a) the firm may transfer the client''sclient money to another person; and

    (b)

    (i) the sums transferred will be held by the person to whom they are transferred
    in

    accordance with the client money rules for the clients; or

    (ii) if not held in accordance with (i), the firm will exercise all due skill,
    care and

    diligence in assessing whether the person to whom the client money is transferred

    will apply adequate measures to protect these sums; and

    (4) the firm complies with the requirements in (3)(b)(ii) (if applicable).

    CASS 7.11.43 G In considering how and whether to introduce the written agreement
    referred to in CASS 7.11.42

    R (3), firms should have regard to any relevant obligations to clients, including
    requirements

    under the Unfair Terms Regulations.

    CASS 7.11.44 R Transfer of business: de minimis sums

    (1) Client money belonging to those categories of clients set out in (2) and in
    respect of

    those amounts set out in (2) ceases to be client money of the firm if it is transferred
    by the

    firm to another person:

    (a) as part of a transfer of business to that other person where these sums relate
    to the

    business being transferred; and

    (b) on terms which require the other person to return a client''s transferred
    sums as soon

    as practicable at the client''s request.

    (2)

    (a) For retail clients the amount is £25.

    (b) For all other clients the amount is £100.

    CASS 7.11.45 For the avoidance of doubt, sums transferred under CASS 7.11.44 R
    do not, for the purposes

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    G of that rule, require the instruction or specific consent of each client at
    the time of the transfer or

    a written agreement as set out in CASS 7.11.42 R (3).

    CASS 7.11.46 R Transfer of business: client notifications

    Where a firm transfers client money belonging to its clients under either or both
    of CASS

    7.11.42 R and CASS 7.11.44 R it must ensure that those clients are notified no
    later than seven

    days after the transfer taking place:

    (1) whether or not the sums will be held by the person to whom they have been
    transferred

    in accordance with the client money rules and if not how the sums being transferred
    will be

    held by that person;

    (2) the extent to which the sums transferred will be protected under a compensation

    scheme; and

    (3) that the client may opt to have the client''s transferred sum returned to
    it as soon as

    practicable at the client''s request.

    CASS 7.11.47 R The firm must notify the FCA of its intention to effect any transfer
    of client money under either

    or both of CASS 7.11.42 R and CASS 7.11.44 R at least seven days before it transfers
    the

    client money in question.

    CASS 7.11.47A Allocated but unclaimed client money

    R

    CASS 7.11.48G to CASS 7.11.58G do not apply to a firm following a primary pooling
    event,

    except for CASS 7.11.57AR to CASS 7.11.57CG and CASS 7.11.58G (insofar as it is
    relevant

    to CASS 7.11.57AR).

    CASS 7.11.47B CASS 7A.2.6AR (Closing a client money pool) applies to a firm following
    a primary pooling

    G event in respect of allocated but unclaimed client money.

    CASS 7.11.48 G The purpose of CASS 7.11.50 R is to set out the requirements firms
    must comply with in order

    to cease to treat as client money any unclaimed balance which is allocated to
    an individual

    client.

    CASS 7.11.49 G Before acting in accordance with CASS 7.11.50 R to CASS 7.11.58
    G, a firm should consider

    whether its actions are permitted by law and consistent with the arrangements
    under which the

    client money is held. For the avoidance of doubt, these provisions relate to a
    firm''s obligations

    as an authorised person and to the treatment of client money under the client
    money rules.

    CASS 7.11.50 R A firm may pay away to a registered charity of its choice a client
    money balance which is

    allocated to a client and if it does so the released balance will cease to be
    client money under

    CASS 7.11.34 R (10), provided:

    (1) this is permitted by law and consistent with the arrangements under which
    the client

    money is held;

    (2) the firm held the balance concerned for at least six years following the last
    movement on

    the client''s account (disregarding any payment or receipt of interest, charges
    or similar

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    items);

    (3) it can demonstrate that it has taken reasonable steps to trace the client
    concerned and

    to return the balance; and

    (4) the firm complies with CASS 7.11.54 R.

    CASS 7.11.51 G Where the client money balance held by a firm is, in aggregate,
    £100 or less for a client other

    than a retail client or, for a retail client, £25 or less, the firm may comply
    with CASS 7.11.57 R

    instead of CASS 7.11.50 R.

    CASS 7.11.52 E (1) Taking reasonable steps in CASS 7.11.50 R (3) includes following
    this course of

    conduct:

    (a) determining, as far as reasonably possible, the correct contact details for
    the relevant

    client;

    (b) writing to the client at the last known address either by post or by electronic
    mail to

    inform it of the firm''s intention to no longer treat the client money balance
    as client

    money and to pay the sums concerned to charity if the firm does not receive instructions

    from the client within 28 days;

    (c) where the client has not responded after the 28 days referred to in (b), attempting
    to

    communicate the information set out in (b) to the client on at least one further
    occasion

    by any means other than that used in (b) including by post, electronic mail, telephone
    or

    media advertisement;

    (d) subject to (e) and (f), where the client has not responded within 28 days
    following the

    most recent communication, writing again to the client at the last known address
    either

    by post or by electronic mail to inform them that:

    (i) as the firm did not receive a claim for the relevant client money balance,
    it will in

    28 days pay the balance to a registered charity; and

    (ii) an undertaking will be provided by the firm or a member of its group to pay
    to the

    client concerned a sum equal to the balance paid away to charity in the event
    of the

    client seeking to claim the balance in future;

    (e) if the firm has carried out the steps in (b) or (c) and in response has received
    positive

    confirmation in writing that the client is no longer at a particular address,
    the firm should

    not use that address for the purposes of (d);

    (f) if, after carrying out the steps in (a), (b) and (c), the firm has obtained
    positive

    confirmation that none of the contact details it holds for the relevant client
    are accurate

    or, if utilised, the communication is unlikely to reach the client, the firm does
    not have to

    comply with (d); and

    (g) waiting a further 28 days following the most recent communication under this
    rule

    before paying the balance to a registered charity.

    (2) Compliance with (1) may be relied on as tending to establish compliance with
    CASS

    7.11.50 R.

    (3) Contravention of (1) may be relied on as tending to establish contravention
    of CASS

    7.11.50 R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.11.53 G For the purpose of CASS 7.11.52 E (1)(a), a firm may use any available
    means to determine

    the correct contact details for the relevant client, including telephoning the
    client, searching

    internal records, media advertising, searching public records, mortality screening,
    using credit

    reference agencies or tracing agents.

    CASS 7.11.54 R (1) Where a firm wishes to release a balance allocated to an individual
    client under CASS

    7.11.50 R it must comply with either (a) or (b) and, in either case, (2):

    (a) the firm must unconditionally undertake to pay to the client concerned a sum
    equal to

    the balance paid away to charity in the event of the client seeking to claim the
    balance in

    future;

    or

    (b) the firm must ensure that an unconditional undertaking in the terms set out
    in (a) is

    made by a member of its group and there is suitable information available for
    relevant

    clients to identify the member of the group granting the undertaking.

    (2) The undertakings in this rule must be:

    (a) authorised by the firm''sgoverning body where (1)(a) applies or by the governing
    body

    of the group member where (1)(b) applies;

    (b) legally enforceable by any person who had a legally enforceable claim to the
    balance

    in question at the time it was released by the firm, or by an assign or successor
    in title to

    such claim; and

    (c) retained by the firm, and where (1)(b) applies, by the group member indefinitely.

    CASS 7.11.55 R (1) If a firm pays away client money under CASS 7.11.50 R (4) it
    must make and retain, or

    where the firm already has such records, retain:

    (a) records of all balances released from client bank accounts under CASS 7.11.50
    R

    (including details of the amounts and the identity of the client to whom the money
    was

    allocated);

    (b) all relevant documentation (including charity receipts); and

    (c) details of the communications the firm had or attempted to make with the client

    concerned pursuant to CASS 7.11.50 R (3).

    (2) The records in (1) must be retained indefinitely.

    (3) If a member of the firm''sgroup has provided an undertaking under CASS 7.11.54
    R (2)

    then the records in (1) must be readily accessible to that group member.

    CASS 7.11.56 G De minimis amounts of unclaimed client money

    The purpose of CASS 7.11.57 R is to allow a firm to pay away to charity client
    money balances

    of (i) £25 or less for retail clients or (ii) £100 or less for other clients when
    those balances

    remain unclaimed. If a firm follows this process, the money will cease to be client
    money (see

    CASS 7.11.34 R (10).

    CASS 7.11.57 R A firm may pay away to a registered charity of its choice a client
    money balance which is

    allocated to a client and if it does so the released balance will cease to be
    client money under

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.11.34 R (10):

    (1) the balance in question is (i) for a retail client, in aggregate, £25 or less,
    or (ii) for a

    professional client, in aggregate, £100 or less;

    (2) the firm held the balance concerned for at least six years following the last
    movement on

    the client''s account (disregarding any payment or receipt of interest, charges
    or similar

    items);

    (3) the firm has made at least one attempt to contact the client to return the
    balance using

    the most up-to-date contact details the firm has for the client, and the client
    has not

    responded to such communication within 28 days of the communication having been
    made;

    and

    (4) the firm makes and/or retains records of all balances released from client
    bank accounts

    in according with this rule. Such records must include the information in CASS
    7.11.55 R

    (1)(a) and CASS 7.11.55 R (1)(b).

    CASS 7.11.57A Transfers of client money to a dormant asset fund operator under
    Part 1

    R of the Dormant Assets Act 2022

    A firm may transfer a client money balance to a dormant asset fund operator under
    the

    applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022. If it does so
    the transferred

    balance will cease to be client money under CASS 7.11.34R(11), provided that the
    firm can

    demonstrate it took reasonable steps to trace the client concerned and to return
    the balance

    prior to making such a transfer.

    CASS 7.11.57B (1)

    E (a) This paragraph applies where the balance of client money in question is
    of a minimal

    amount. For these purposes, a ‘minimal amount’ means either:

    (i) in respect of a balance held for a retail client, £25 or less in aggregate;
    or

    (ii) in respect of a balance held for a professional client, £100 or less in aggregate.

    (b) Where the balance of client money in question is of a minimal amount, taking

    reasonable steps in CASS 7.11.57AR includes the firm making at least one attempt
    to

    contact the client to return the balance (using the most up-to-date contact details
    the firm

    has for the client) and allowing the client 28 days to respond.

    (2) This paragraph applies in all other cases where paragraph (1) does not apply.
    In all other

    such cases, taking reasonable steps in CASS 7.11.57AR includes following this
    course of

    conduct:

    (a) determining, as far as reasonably possible, the correct contact details for
    the relevant

    client;

    (b) writing to the client at the last known address either by post or by electronic
    mail to

    inform it of the firm’s intention to no longer treat the client money balance
    as client

    money and to transfer the sums concerned to a dormant asset fund operator if the
    firm

    does not receive instructions from the client within 28 days (naming the specific
    relevant

    dormant asset fund operator);

    (c) where the client has not responded after the 28 days referred to in (b), attempting
    to

    communicate the information set out in (b) to the client on at least one further
    occasion

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    by any means other than that used in (b) including by post, electronic mail, telephone
    or

    media advertisement;

    (d) subject to (e) and (f), where the client has not responded within 28 days
    following the

    most recent communication, writing again to the client at the last known address
    either

    by post or by electronic mail to inform them:

    (i) that, as the firm did not receive a claim for the relevant client money balance,
    it will

    in 28 days transfer the balance to a dormant asset fund operator (naming the specific

    relevant dormant asset fund operator); and

    (ii) of the steps that they must take to make a repayment claim;

    (e) if the firm has carried out the steps in (b) or (c) and in response has received
    positive

    confirmation in writing that the client is no longer at a particular address,
    the firm should

    not use that address for the purposes of (d);

    (f) if, after carrying out the steps in (a), (b) and (c), the firm has obtained
    positive

    confirmation that none of the contact details it holds for the relevant client
    are accurate

    or, if utilised, the communication is unlikely to reach the client, the firm does
    not have to

    comply with (d); and

    (g) waiting a further 28 days following the most recent communication under this
    rule

    before transferring the balance to the dormant asset fund operator.

    (3) Compliance with (1) or (2) (as applicable) may be relied on as tending to
    establish

    compliance with CASS 7.11.57AR.

    (4) Contravention of (1) or (2) (as applicable) may be relied on as tending to
    establish

    contravention of CASS 7.11.57AR.

    CASS 7.11.57C When transferring a client money balance to a dormant asset fund
    operator under the

    G applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022, a firm will
    need to consider its

    obligations under any contractual or other arrangements of the sort described
    at section 23 of

    the Dormant Assets Act 2022 in addition to meeting its obligations under the client
    money rules

    and the client money distribution and transfer rules.

    CASS 7.11.58 G Costs associated with paying away allocated but unclaimed client
    money

    Any costs associated with the firm ceasing to treat unclaimed client money balances
    as client

    money pursuant to CASS 7.11.50 R to CASS 7.11.57BE should be paid for from the
    firm''s own

    funds, including:

    (1) any costs associated with the firm carrying out the steps in CASS 7.11.50
    R (3), CASS

    7.11.51 G, CASS 7.11.57 R (3) or CASS 7.11.57AR; and

    (2) the cost of any insurance purchased by a firm or the relevant member of its
    group to

    cover any legally enforceable claim in respect of the client money paid away.

    CASS 7.11.59 G Unwanted client money

    A payment of client money under section 21 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022 to a
    dormant

    asset fund operator that has Part 4A permission for dealing with unwanted asset
    money would

    amount to a payment to a third party with the instruction of the client for the
    purposes of CASS

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    7.11.34R(2)(a).

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.12 Organisational requirements: client money

    CASS 7.12.1 R Requirement to protect client money

    A firm must, when holding client money, make adequate arrangements to safeguard
    the client''s

    rights and prevent the use of client money for its own account.

    [Note: article 16(9) of MiFID]

    CASS 7.12.2 R Requirement to have adequate organisational arrangements

    A firm must introduce adequate organisational arrangements to minimise the risk
    of the loss or

    diminution of client money, or of rights in connection with client money, as a
    result of misuse of

    client money, fraud, poor administration, inadequate record-keeping or negligence.

    [Note: article 2(1)(f) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.12.3 G The risk of loss or diminution of rights in connection with client
    money can arise where a firm''s

    organisational arrangements give rise to the possibility that client money held
    by the firm may

    be paid for the account of a client whose money is yet to be received by the firm.
    Consistent

    with the requirement to hold client money as trustee (see CASS 7.17.5 G), a firm
    should ensure

    its organisational arrangements are adequate to minimise such a risk. This may
    include, for

    example, allowing for sufficient periods of time for payments of client money
    to the firm to

    become available for use (including automated payments, credit card payments and
    payments

    by cheque), and setting up safeguards to ensure that payments out of client bank
    accounts do

    not take effect before the relevant amount of client money has become available
    for use by the

    firm.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.13 Segregation of client money

    CASS 7.13.1 G Application and purpose

    The segregation of client money from a firm''s own money is an important safeguard
    for its

    protection.

    CASS 7.13.2 R Where a firm establishes one or more sub-pools, the provisions of
    CASS 7.13 (Segregation of

    client money) shall be read as applying separately to the firm''s general pool
    and each sub-pool

    in line with CASS 7.19.3 R and CASS 7.19.12 R.

    CASS 7.13.3 R Depositing client money

    A firm, on receiving any client money, must promptly place this money into one
    or more

    accounts opened with any of the following:

    (1) a central bank;

    (2) a CRD credit institution;

    (3) a bank authorised in a third country;

    (4) a qualifying money market fund.

    [Note: article 4(1) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.4 G A firm should ensure that any money other than client money that
    is deposited in a client bank

    account is promptly paid out of that account unless such money is a minimum sum
    required to

    open the account, or to keep the account open.

    CASS 7.13.5 G Approaches for the segregation of client money

    The two approaches that a firm can adopt in discharging its obligations under
    this section are:

    (1) the ''normal approach''; or

    (2) the ''alternative approach'' (see CASS 7.13.54 G to CASS 7.13.69 G).

    CASS 7.13.6 R The normal approach

    Unless otherwise permitted by any other rule in this chapter, a firm using the
    normal approach

    must ensure that all client money it receives is paid directly into a client bank
    account at an

    institution referred to in CASS 7.13.3 R (1) to CASS 7.13.3 R (3), rather than
    being first

    received into the firm''s own account and then segregated.

    CASS 7.13.7 G Firms should ensure that clients and third parties make transfers
    and payments of any money

    which will be client money directly into the firm''s client bank accounts.

    CASS 7.13.8 R Selection, appointment and review of third parties

    (1) A firm that does not deposit client money with a central bank must exercise
    all due skill,

    care and diligence in the selection, appointment and periodic review of the CRD
    credit

    institution, bank or qualifying money market fund where the money is deposited
    and the

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    arrangements for the holding of this money.

    (2) The firm must consider the need for diversification as part of its due diligence
    under (1).

    [Note: article 4(2) first sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.9 G Firms should ensure that their consideration of a CRD credit institution,
    bank or qualifying

    money market fund under CASS 7.13.8 R focuses on the specific legal entity in
    question and

    not simply that person''s group as a whole.

    CASS 7.13.10 R When a firm makes the selection, appointment and conducts the periodic
    review of a CRD

    credit institution, a bank or a qualifying money market fund, it must take into
    account:

    (1) the expertise and market reputation of the third party with a view to ensuring
    the

    protection of clients’ rights; and

    (2) any legal or regulatory requirements or market practices related to the holding
    of client

    money that could adversely affect clients'' rights.

    [Note: article 4(2) second sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.11 G In complying with CASS 7.13.8 R and CASS 7.13.10 R, a firm should
    consider, as appropriate,

    together with any other relevant matters:

    (1) the capital of the CRD credit institution or bank;

    (2) the amount of client money placed, as a proportion of the CRD credit institution
    or bank''s

    capital and deposits, and, in the case of a qualifying money market fund, compared
    to any

    limit the fund may place on the volume of redemptions in any period;

    (3) the extent to which client money that the firm deposits or holds with any
    CRD credit

    institution or bank incorporated outside the UK would be protected under a deposit

    protection scheme in the relevant jurisdiction;

    (4) the credit-worthiness of the CRD credit institution or bank; and

    (5) to the extent that the information is available, the level of risk in the
    investment and loan

    activities undertaken by the CRD credit institution or bank and affiliated companies.

    CASS 7.13.12 R Client bank accounts

    A firm must take the necessary steps to ensure that client money deposited, in
    accordance with

    CASS 7.13.3 R, in a central bank, a credit institution, a bank authorised in a
    third country or a

    qualifying money market fund is held in an account or accounts identified separately
    from any

    accounts used to hold money belonging to the firm.

    [Note: article 2(1)(e) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.13 R (1) An account which the firm uses to deposit client money under
    CASS 7.13.3 R (1) to

    CASS 7.13.3 R (3) must be a client bank account.

    (2) In respect of each client bank account used by a firm to satisfy its obligation
    under CASS

    7.13.3R(1) to (3):

    (a) the relevant bank''s contractual counterparty must be the firm itself; and

    (b) ) subject to paragraph (3A), the firm must be able to make withdrawals of
    client

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    money promptly and, in any event, within one business day of a request for withdrawal.

    Transitional provision CASS TP 1.1.10AR applies to (2).

    (3) [deleted]

    (3A) Where the requirement under sub-paragraph (2)(b) is not satisfied and provided
    that

    the client bank account is not included in a sub-pool, a firm may use a client
    bank account

    from which it will be unable to make a withdrawal of client money until the expiry
    of a period

    lasting:

    (a) up to 30 days; or

    (b) provided the firm complies with CASS 7.13.14AR, from 31 to 95 days.

    (4) Paragraphs (2)(b) and (3A) do not apply in respect of client money received
    by a firm in

    its capacity as a trustee firm.

    CASS 7.13.14 G CASS 7.13.13 R (2)(b) and CASS 7.13.13R(3A) do not prevent a firm
    from depositing client

    money on terms under which a withdrawal may be made before the expiry of a fixed
    term or a

    notice period (whatever the duration), including where such withdrawal would incur
    a penalty

    charge to the firm.

    CASS 7.13.14A A firm may only use one or more client bank accounts under CASS
    7.13.13R(3A)(b) if:

    R (1) prior to using any such client bank accounts, it:

    (a) produces a written policy that sets out:

    (i) for each of its business lines, the maximum proportion of the client money
    held by

    the firm that the firm considers would be appropriate to hold in such client bank

    accounts having regard to the need to manage the risk of the firm being unable
    to

    access client money when required;

    (ii) the firm’s rationale for reaching its conclusion(s) under (i); and

    (iii) the measures that it will put into place to comply with sub-paragraph (2)(a)
    of this

    rule, having regard to CASS 7.13.14CE; and

    (b) provides each of its clients with a written explanation of the risks that
    arise as a result

    of the longer notice period for withdrawals that:

    (i) is clear, fair and not misleading; and

    (ii) in respect of the medium of the explanation, satisfies whichever of COBS
    6.1.13R

    (Medium of disclosure) or COBS 6.1ZA.19EU (Medium of disclosure) applies to the

    firm in respect of its obligations to provide information to the client; and

    (2) while the firm uses any such client bank accounts, it:

    (a) takes appropriate measures to manage the risk of the firm being unable to
    access

    client money when required;

    (b) keeps its written policy under sub-paragraph (1)(a) under review, amending
    it where

    necessary; and

    (c) provides any of its clients to whom it has not previously provided the explanation

    under sub-paragraph (1)(b) with such a written explanation before it starts to
    hold or

    receive client money for them.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.14B (1) A firm must make and retain a written record of:

    R (a) the written policy it produces under CASS 7.13.14AR(1)(a); and

    (b) each subsequent version of the written policy it produces as a result of CASS

    7.13.14AR(2)(b).

    (2) The firm must make the record:

    (a) under sub-paragraph (1)(a) on the date it produces the written policy; and

    (b) under sub-paragraph (1)(b) on the date it produces the new version of the
    written

    policy.

    (3) The firm must keep each record under this rule for a period of five years
    after the earlier

    of:

    (a) the date on which the version of the policy to which the record relates was

    superseded; and

    (b) the date on which the firm ceased to use client bank accounts under CASS

    7.13.13R(3A)(b).

    CASS 7.13.14C (1) Appropriate measures under CASS 7.13.14AR(2)(a) include the
    firm considering the

    E need to make, and making where appropriate, quarterly or more frequent adjustments
    to the

    amount of client money held in client bank accounts under CASS 7.13.13R(3A)(b),
    taking

    into consideration the following factors:

    (a) historic and expected future client money receipts and payments;

    (b) the firm’s own analysis of its exposure to the risk of being unable to meet
    instructions

    from its clients in relation to client money that it holds, applying an appropriate
    set of time

    horizons and stress scenarios; and

    (c) the content of the firm’s written policy under CASS 7.13.14AR(1)(a)(i) and
    (ii).

    (2) Compliance with (1) may be relied on as tending to establish compliance with
    CASS

    7.13.14AR(2)(a).

    (3) Contravention of (1) may be relied on as tending to establish contravention
    of CASS

    7.13.14AR(2)(a).

    CASS 7.13.14D (1) Under CASS 7.13.14AR(2)(b) a firm should consider whether amendments
    to its written

    G policy under CASS 7.13.14AR(1)(a) are needed for any reason, including in light
    of the

    firm’s analysis in the course of its measures under CASS 7.13.14AR(2)(a).

    (2) Each time a firm amends its written policy under CASS 7.13.14AR(1)(a), it
    should also

    update the rationale for the amended policy under CASS 7.13.14AR(1)(a)(ii).

    (3) The stress scenarios under CASS 7.13.14CE(1)(b) should include a variety of
    severe yet

    plausible institution-specific and market-wide liquidity shocks.

    CASS 7.13.14E (1) If a fixed term or notice period for a withdrawal from a client
    bank account is scheduled

    G to expire on a day on which a firm would expect to be unable to make the withdrawal,
    and

    the result is that the total period for which the withdrawal is prevented is longer
    than that

    permitted under CASS 7.13.13R(3A)(a) or (b), then the firm would be in breach
    of that rule.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (2) Such a situation could arise because the fixed term or notice period expires
    on a day

    which is not a business day for the relevant bank.

    (3) Firms should therefore schedule their withdrawals from client bank accounts
    under

    CASS 7.13.13R(3A)(a) and (b) to avoid such breaches.

    CASS 7.13.14F Firms that hold client money using a client bank account under CASS
    7.13.13R(3A)(b) and to

    G which SUP 16.14 (Client money and asset return) applies may need to fill in
    their CMARs in the

    way set out at SUP 16.14.7R (Reporting of ‘unbreakable’ client money deposits).

    CASS 7.13.15 G CASS 7.13.13 R does not prevent a firm from depositing client money
    in overnight money

    market deposits which are clearly identified as being client money (for example,
    in the client

    bank account acknowledgment letter).

    CASS 7.13.16 G Firms are reminded of their obligations under CASS 7.18 (Acknowledgment
    letters) for client

    bank accounts. Firms should also ensure that client bank accounts meet the requirements
    in

    the relevant Glossary definitions, including regarding the titles given to the
    accounts.

    CASS 7.13.17 G A firm may open one or more client bank accounts in the form of
    a general client bank account,

    a designated client bank account or a designated client fund account. The requirements
    of

    CASS 7.13.13 R (2) and CASS 7.13.13 R (3) apply for each type of client bank account.

    CASS 7.13.18 G A designated client bank account may be used for a client only
    where that client has consented

    to the use of that account. If a firm deposits client money into a designated
    client bank account

    then, in the event of a secondary pooling event in respect of the relevant bank,
    the account will

    not be pooled with any general client bank account or designated client fund account.

    CASS 7.13.19 G A designated client fund account may be used for a client only
    where that client has consented

    to the use of that account and all other designated client fund accounts which
    may be pooled

    with it. For example, a client who consents to the use of bank A and bank B should
    have his

    money held in a different designated client fund account at bank B from a client
    who has

    consented to the use of banks B and C. If a firm deposits client money into a
    designated client

    fund account then, in the event of a secondary pooling event in respect of the
    relevant bank,

    the account will not be pooled with any general client bank account or designated
    client bank

    account.

    CASS 7.13.19A Diversification of client money

    G

    (1) In CASS 7.13.20R to CASS 7.13.25R client money means money deposited under

    CASS 7.13.3R and therefore includes money deposited under CASS 7.13.3R:

    (a) in an account opened with a qualifying money market fund; or

    (b) invested in units or shares of a qualifying money market fund.

    (2) But client money held under CASS 7.14.2R does not fall within the scope of
    the

    diversification provisions at CASS 7.13.20R to CASS 7.13.25R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.20 R Notwithstanding the requirement at CASS 7.13.22 R a firm must limit
    the funds that it deposits

    or holds with a relevant group entity or combination of such entities so that
    the value of those

    funds do not at any point in time exceed 20 per cent of the total of all the client
    money held by

    the firm under CASS 7.13.3R.

    [Note: article 4(3) first sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.21 R For the purpose of CASS 7.13.20 R an entity is a relevant group
    entity if it is:

    (1)

    (a) a CRD credit institution; or

    (b) a bank authorised in a third country; or

    (c) a qualifying money market fund; or

    (d) the entity operating or managing the qualifying money market fund; and

    (2) a member of the same group as that firm.

    [Note: article 4(3) first sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.21A (1) A firm need not comply with CASS 7.13.20R if, following an assessment,
    it is able to

    R demonstrate that the requirement under that rule is not proportionate, in view
    of:

    (a) the small balance of client money that it holds;

    (b) the nature, scale and complexity of its business; and

    (c) the safety offered by the relevant third parties referred to under CASS 7.13.20R.

    (2) A firm must review any assessment it makes under (1) periodically.

    (3) A firm must notify its assessment under (1) and its reviewed assessments under
    (2) to

    the FCA in accordance with CASS 7.13.21CR.

    [Note: article 4(3) second sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.21B (1) In relation to the requirement to take account of a firm’s “small
    balance” of client money

    G at CASS 7.13.21AR(1)(a):

    (a) the FCA expects a firm that would not qualify to be a CASS small firm under
    the rules

    in CASS 1A.2, ignoring any safe custody assets that it holds, to have difficulty
    in

    justifying using the approach in CASS 7.13.21AR(1);

    (b) a firm should calculate its client money balance for these purposes in the
    same way

    required under CASS 1A.2.3R, and base its assessment under CASS 7.13.21AR(1)(a)

    on either:

    (i) the highest total amount of client money that it held during the year ending
    on the

    date of the assessment; or

    (ii) if it did not hold client money in the previous calendar year, the highest
    total

    amount of client money that the firm projects it will hold during the year starting
    on

    the date of the assessment;

    (c) this means that it may be possible for a CASS medium firm or a CASS large
    firm to

    justify using the approach in CASS 7.13.21AR(1) on the basis of small client money

    balances; and

    (d) in any case, a firm seeking to take that approach should also consider the
    points at

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.21AR(1)(b) and (c) as part of its assessment.

    (2) In relation to the requirement under CASS 7.13.21AR(2) to review the assessment
    under

    CASS 7.13.21AR(1):

    (a) a firm should undertake a review and, where appropriate, consider whether
    to cease

    to use the approach in CASS 7.13.21AR(1) when it becomes aware of a change in
    the

    circumstances that might have led the firm to a different conclusion on its previous

    assessment; and

    (b) in any case a firm should undertake a review at least one year after its previous

    assessment until it ceases to use the approach in CASS 7.13.21AR(1).

    (3) A firm may, subject to paragraph (2)(a), wish to perform the assessment and
    any

    periodic reviews under CASS 7.13.21AR when the obligations under CASS 1A.2.9R
    arise.

    (4) Firms are reminded that, independent of CASS 7.13.21AR, each firm is required
    by

    CASS 1A.2.2R to determine once every year whether it is a CASS large firm, CASS

    medium firm or CASS small firm.

    CASS 7.13.21C 1. Where a firm decides following an assessment under CASS 7.13.21AR(1)
    that it intends

    R to use the approach under that rule, the firm must give the FCA notice of this
    upon reaching

    that decision and before it starts to use that approach.

    2. Where, following a review under CASS 7.13.21AR(2) a firm decides that it will
    either

    cease to use the approach under CASS 7.13.21AR(1) or continue to use it, it must
    give the

    FCA notice of this upon reaching that decision.

    CASS 7.13.22 R Subject to the requirement at CASS 7.13.20 R, and in accordance
    with Principle 10 and CASS

    7.12.1 R, a firm must:

    (1) periodically review whether it is appropriate to diversify (or further diversify)
    the third

    parties with which it deposits some or all of the client money that the firm holds;
    and

    (2) whenever it concludes that it is appropriate to do so, it must make adjustments

    accordingly to the third parties it uses and to the amounts of client money deposited
    with

    them.

    [Note: article 4(2) first sub-paragraph of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.23 G In complying with the requirement in CASS 7.13.22 R to periodically
    review whether

    diversification (or further diversification) is appropriate, a firm should have
    regard to:

    (1) whether it would be appropriate to deposit client money in client bank accounts
    opened

    at a number of different third parties;

    (2) whether it would be appropriate to limit the amount of client money the firm
    holds with

    third parties that are in the same group as each other;

    (3) whether risks arising from the firm''s business models create any need for
    diversification

    (or further diversification);

    (4) the market conditions at the time of the assessment; and

    (5) the outcome of any due diligence carried out in accordance with CASS 7.13.8
    R and

    CASS 7.13.10 R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.24 G The rules in SUP 16.14 provide that CASS large firms and CASS medium
    firms must report to

    the FCA in relation to the identity of the entities with which they deposit client
    money and the

    amounts of client money deposited with those entities. The FCA will use that information
    to

    monitor compliance with the diversification rule in CASS 7.13.20 R.

    CASS 7.13.25 R (1) A firm must make a record of the grounds upon which it satisfies
    itself as to the

    appropriateness of its selection and appointment of a bank or a qualifying money
    market

    fund under CASS 7.13.8 R. The firm must make the record on the date it makes the

    selection or appointment and must keep it from that date until five years after
    the firm

    ceases to use that particular person for the purposes of depositing client money
    under

    CASS 7.13.3 R.

    (2) A firm must make a record of each periodic review of its selection and appointment
    of a

    bank or a qualifying money market fund that it conducts under CASS 7.13.8 R, its

    considerations and conclusions. The firm must make the record on the date it completes
    the

    review and must keep it from that date until five years after the firm ceases
    to use that

    particular person for the purposes of depositing client money under CASS 7.13.3
    R.

    (3) A firm must make a record of each periodic review that it conducts under CASS
    7.13.22

    R, its considerations and conclusions. The firm must make the record on the date
    it

    completes out the review and must keep it for five years from that date.

    CASS 7.13.26 R Qualifying money market funds

    Where a firm deposits client money with a qualifying money market fund, the firm''s
    holding of

    those units or shares in that fund will be subject to any applicable requirements
    of the custody

    rules.

    [Note: recital 4 to the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.27 G A firm that places client money in a qualifying money market fund
    should ensure that it has the

    permissions required to invest in and hold units in that fund and must comply
    with the rules that

    are relevant for those activities.

    CASS 7.13.28 R (1) A firm must inform a client that money placed with a qualifying
    money market fund will

    not be held in accordance with the requirements for holding client money.

    (2) A firm must ensure that, having provided the information to the client under
    (1), the client

    gives its explicit consent to the placement of their money in a qualifying money
    market fund.

    [Note: article 4(2) third sub-paragraph to the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.13.29A A firm may comply with CASS 7.13.28 R(1) by informing the client
    that the units or shares in the

    G qualifying money market fund will be held as safe custody assets.

    CASS 7.13.30 R Segregation in different currency

    A firm may segregate client money in a different currency from that in which it
    was received or

    in which the firm is liable to the relevant client. If it does so the firm must
    ensure that the

    amount held is adjusted each day to an amount at least equal to the original currency
    amount

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (or the currency in which the firm has its liability to its clients, if different),
    translated at the

    previous day''s closing spot exchange rate.

    CASS 7.13.31 R Mixed remittance

    Except in the circumstances described in CASS 7.13.72 R (1)(a), where a firm using
    the normal

    approach receives a mixed remittance it should:

    (1) in accordance with CASS 7.13.6 R, take necessary steps to ensure the mixed
    remittance

    is paid directly into a client bank account; and

    (2) promptly and, in any event no later than one business day after the payment
    of the

    mixed remittance into the client bank account has cleared, pay the money that
    is not client

    money out of the client bank account.

    CASS 7.13.32 R Physical receipts of client money

    Where a firm receives client money in the form of cash, a cheque or other payable
    order, it

    must:

    (1) pay the money in accordance with CASS 7.13.6 R, promptly, and no later than
    on the

    business day after it receives the money into a client bank account, unless either:

    (a) the money is received by a business line for which the firm uses the alternative

    approach, in which case the money must be paid into the firm''s own bank account

    promptly, and no later than on the business day after it receives the money; or

    (b) the firm is unable to meet the requirement in (1) because of restrictions
    under the

    regulatory system or law regarding the receipt and processing of money, in which
    case

    the money must be paid in accordance with CASS 7.13.6 R as soon as possible;

    (2) if the firm holds the money in the meantime before paying it in accordance
    with CASS

    7.13.6 R (or in the case of (1)(a), into its own bank account), hold it in a secure
    location in

    line with Principle 10; and

    (3) in any case, record the receipt of the money in the firm''s books and records
    in line with

    CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations).

    CASS 7.13.33 R Where a firm receives client money in the form of a cheque that
    is dated with a future date,

    unless the firm returns the cheque it must:

    (1) pay the money in accordance with CASS 7.13.6 R, promptly, and no later than
    the date

    on the cheque if the date is a business day or the next business day after the
    date on the

    cheque;

    (2) in the meantime, hold it in a secure location in accordance with Principle
    10; and

    (3) record the receipt of the money in the firm''s books and records in accordance
    with CASS

    7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations).

    CASS 7.13.34 R Appointed representatives, tied agents, field representatives and
    other

    agents

    A firm must ensure that client money received by its appointed representatives,
    tied agents,

    field representatives or other agents is:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (1) received directly into a client bank account of the firm, where this would
    have been

    required if such client money had been received by the firm otherwise than through
    its

    appointed representatives, tied agents, field representatives or other agents
    (see CASS

    7.13.6 R and CASS 7.13.7 G); or

    (2) if it is received in the form of a cheque or other payable order:

    (a) paid into a client bank account of the firm promptly and, in any event, no
    later than

    the next business day after receipt; or

    (b) forwarded to the firm or, in the case of a field representative, forwarded
    to a specified

    business address of the firm, to ensure that the money arrives at the specified
    business

    address promptly and, in any event, no later than the close of the third business
    day.

    CASS 7.13.35 G Under CASS 7.13.34 R (2)(b), client money received on business
    day one should be forwarded

    to the firm or specified business address of the firm promptly and, in any event,
    no later than

    the next business day after receipt (business day two) in order for it to reach
    that firm or

    specified business address by the close of the third business day. Procedures
    requiring the

    client money in the form of a cheque to be sent to the firm or the specified business
    address of

    the firm by first class post and, in any event, no later than the next business
    day after receipt,

    would fulfil CASS 7.13.34 R (2)(b).

    CASS 7.13.36 R Allocation of client money receipts

    (1) A firm must allocate any client money it receives to an individual client
    promptly and, in

    any case, no later than ten business days following the receipt (or where subsequent
    to the

    receipt of money it has identified that the money, or part of it, is client money
    under CASS

    7.13.37 R, no later than ten business days following that identification).

    (2) Pending a firm''s allocation of a client money receipt to an individual client
    under (1), it

    must record the received client money in its books and records as "unallocated
    client

    money".

    CASS 7.13.37 R If a firm receives money (either in a client bank account or an
    account of its own) which it is

    unable to immediately identify as client money or its own money, it must:

    (1) take all necessary steps to identify the money as either client money or its
    own money;

    (2) if it considers it reasonably prudent to do so, given the risk that client
    money may not be

    adequately protected if it is not treated as such, treat the entire balance of
    money as client

    money and record the money in its books and records as "unidentified client money"
    while it

    performs the necessary steps under (1).

    CASS 7.13.38 G If a firm is unable to identify money that it has received as either
    client money or its own money

    under CASS 7.13.37 R, it should consider whether it would be appropriate to return
    the money

    to the person who sent it or to the source from where it was received (for example,
    the banking

    institution).

    CASS 7.13.38A Money due to a client from a firm

    R

    CASS 7.13.39R and CASS 7.13.40G do not apply to a firm following a primary pooling
    event.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.38B CASS 7A.2.10AR and CASS 7A.2.10BG (Money due to a client from a
    firm after a primary

    G pooling event) apply to a firm following a primary pooling event in respect
    of money due to a

    client from a firm.

    CASS 7.13.39 R Pursuant to the client money segregation requirements, a firm that
    is operating the normal

    approach and is liable to pay money to a client must promptly, and in any event
    no later than

    one business day after the money is due and payable, pay the money:

    (1) to, or to the order of, the client; or

    (2) into a client bank account.

    CASS 7.13.40 G Where the firm has payment instructions from the client the firm
    should pay the money to the

    order of the client, rather than into a client bank account.

    CASS 7.13.40A Prudent segregation

    R

    (1) Subject to paragraph (2), CASS 7.13.41R to CASS 7.13.49R do not apply to a
    firm

    following a primary pooling event.

    (2) If, at the time of a primary pooling event, a firm has retained money in a
    client bank

    account for the purposes of CASS 7.13.41R, that money remains client money for
    the

    purposes of the client money rules and the client money distribution and transfer
    rules.

    CASS 7.13.41 R If it is prudent to do so to prevent a shortfall in client money
    on the occurrence of a primary

    pooling event, a firm may pay money of its own into a client bank account and
    subsequently

    retain that money in the client bank account (prudent segregation). Money that
    the firm retains

    in a client bank account under this rule is client money for the purposes of the
    client money

    rules and the client money distribution and transfer rules.

    CASS 7.13.42 G A firm must make and retain an up-to-date record of all payments
    made under CASS 7.13.41

    R. (See further CASS 7.13.50 R to CASS 7.13.53 R: the prudent segregation record.)

    CASS 7.13.43 R If a firm intends to pays its own money into a client bank account
    under CASS 7.13.41 R it must

    establish a written policy that is approved by its governing body (and retain
    such policy for a

    period of at least five years after the date it ceases to retain such money in
    a client bank

    account under CASS 7.13.41 R) detailing:

    (1) the specific anticipated risks in relation to which it would be prudent for
    the firm to make

    such payments into a client bank account;

    (2) why the firm considers that the use of such a payment is a reasonable means
    of

    protecting client money against each of the risks set out in the policy; and

    (3) the method that the firm will use to calculate the amount required to address
    each risk

    set out in the policy.

    CASS 7.13.44 R The firm may amend its written policy to reflect changes in the
    specific anticipated risks in

    relation to which it would be prudent for the firm to make payments into a client
    bank account

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    under CASS 7.13.41 R.

    CASS 7.13.45 R The firm''s written policy must not conflict with the client money
    rules or the client money

    distribution and transfer rules. If there is a conflict, the client money rules
    and the client money

    distribution and transfer rules will prevail.

    CASS 7.13.46 G In the event the firm faces a risk not contemplated under its current
    policy it will not be

    prevented from prudently segregating money as client money in accordance with
    these rules

    but the policy must be created or amended, as applicable, as soon as reasonably
    practicable.

    CASS 7.13.47 G Examples of the types of risks that a firm may wish to provide
    protection for under CASS

    7.13.41 R include systems failures and business that is conducted on non-business
    days where

    the firm would be unable to pay any anticipated shortfall into its client bank
    accounts.

    CASS 7.13.48 R To the extent that the firm no longer considers it prudent to retain
    money in its client bank

    account pursuant to CASS 7.13.41 R in order to ensure that client money is protected,
    the firm

    may cease to treat that money as client money.

    CASS 7.13.49 R Any money that the firm ceases to treat as client money pursuant
    to CASS 7.13.48 R must be

    withdrawn from its client bank account as an excess under CASS 7.15.29 R as part
    of its next

    reconciliation.

    CASS 7.13.49A Prudent segregation record

    R

    (1) Subject to paragraph (2), CASS 7.13.50R to CASS 7.13.52G do not apply to a
    firm

    following a primary pooling event.

    (2) Where a firm holds a prudent segregation record under CASS 7.13.53R following
    a

    primary pooling event, the prudent segregation record must continue to satisfy
    the

    requirements set out in CASS 7.13.51R.

    CASS 7.13.50 R A firm must create and keep up-to-date records so that the amount
    of money paid into client

    bank accounts and retained as client money pursuant to CASS 7.13.41 R or withdrawn

    pursuant to CASS 7.13.49 R, and the reasons for such payment, retention and withdrawal
    can

    be easily ascertained (the prudent segregation record).

    CASS 7.13.51 R The prudent segregation record must record:

    (1) the outcome of the firm''s calculation of its prudent segregation;

    (2) the amounts paid into or withdrawn from a client bank account pursuant to
    CASS

    7.13.41 R or CASS 7.13.49 R;

    (3) why each payment or withdrawal is made;

    (4) in respect of the firm''s written policy required by CASS 7.13.43 R the firm
    must record,

    as applicable, either:

    (a) that the payment or withdrawal is made in accordance with that policy; or

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (b) that the policy will be created or amended to include the reasons for this
    payment or

    withdrawal;

    (5) that the money was paid by the firm in accordance with CASS 7.13.41 R or withdrawn
    by

    the firm in accordance with CASS 7.13.49 R; and

    (6) the up-to-date total amount of client money held pursuant to CASS 7.13.41
    R.

    CASS 7.13.52 G Firms are reminded that payments and records made in accordance
    with CASS 7.13.51 R

    should not be used as a substitute for a firm keeping accurate and timely records
    in accordance

    with CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations) and requirements under
    SYSC 4.1.1 R

    (General requirements) and SYSC 6.1.1 R (Compliance).

    CASS 7.13.53 R The prudent segregation record must be retained for five years
    after the firm ceases to retain

    money as client money pursuant to CASS 7.13.41 R.

    CASS 7.13.53A The alternative approach to client money segregation

    R

    (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), CASS 7.13.59R, CASS 7.13.62R(3), CASS

    7.13.62R(4) and CASS 7.13.63R to CASS 7.13.67R do not apply to a firm following
    its

    failure.

    (2) If, at the time of a primary pooling event, a firm has retained money in a
    client bank

    account for the purposes of alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation
    under

    CASS 7.13.65R, that money remains client money for the purposes of the client
    money

    rules and the client money distribution and transfer rules.

    (3) Where a firm holds an alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation record
    under

    CASS 7.13.68R following a primary pooling event, the alternative approach mandatory

    prudent segregation record must continue to satisfy the requirements set out in
    CASS

    7.13.67R.

    CASS 7.13.54 G (1) In certain circumstances, use of the normal approach for a
    particular business line of a

    firm could lead to significant operational risks to client money protection. These
    may include

    a business line under which clients'' transactions are complex, numerous, closely
    related to

    the firm''s proprietary business and/or involve a number of currencies and time
    zones. In

    such circumstances, subject to meeting the relevant criteria and fulfilling the
    relevant

    notification and audit requirements, a firm may use the alternative approach to
    segregating

    client money for that business line.

    (2) Under the alternative approach, client money is received into and paid out
    of a firm''s own

    bank account. A firm that adopts the alternative approach to segregating client
    money

    should (in line with CASS 7.15.16 R (2)) carry out an internal client money reconciliation
    on

    each business day (''T0'') and calculate how much money it either needs to withdraw
    from, or

    place in from its own bank account or its client bank account as a result of any
    discrepancy

    arising between its client money requirement and its client money resource as
    at the close

    of business on the previous business day (''T-1'').

    (3) The alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation required under CASS
    7.13.65

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    R is designed to address the risks that:

    (a) client money in a firm''s own bank account may not be available to be pooled
    for

    distribution to clients on the occurrence of a primary pooling event; and

    (b) at the time of a primary pooling event the firm may not have segregated in
    its client

    bank account a sufficient amount of client money to meet its client money requirement.

    CASS 7.13.55 R A firm that wishes to adopt the alternative approach for a particular
    business line must first

    establish, and document in writing, its reasons for concluding, that:

    (1) adopting the normal approach would lead to greater operational risks to client
    money

    protection compared to the alternative approach;

    (2) adopting the alternative approach (including complying with the requirements
    for

    alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation under CASS 7.13.65 R), would
    not

    result in undue operational risk to client money protection; and

    (3) the firm has systems and controls that are adequate to enable it to operate
    the

    alternative approach effectively and in compliance with Principle 10 (Clients''
    assets).

    CASS 7.13.56 R A firm must retain any documents created under CASS 7.13.55 R in
    relation to a particular

    business line for a period of at least five years after the date it ceases to
    use the alternative

    approach in connection with that business line.

    CASS 7.13.57 R At least three months before adopting the alternative approach
    for a particular business line, a

    firm must:

    (1) inform the FCA in writing that it intends to adopt the alternative approach
    for that

    particular business line; and

    (2) if requested by the FCA, make any documents it created under CASS 7.13.55
    R

    available to the FCA for inspection.

    CASS 7.13.58 R (1) In addition to the requirement under CASS 7.13.57 R, before
    adopting the alternative

    approach, a firm must send a written report to the FCA prepared by an independent
    auditor

    of the firm in line with a reasonable assurance engagement, stating the matters
    set out in

    (2).

    (2) The written report in (1) must state whether, in the auditor''s opinion:

    (a) the firm''s systems and controls are suitably designed to enable it to comply
    with

    CASS 7.13.62 R to CASS 7.13.65 R; and

    (b) the firm''s calculation of its alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation

    amount under CASS 7.13.65 R is suitably designed to enable the firm to comply
    with

    CASS 7.13.65 R.

    CASS 7.13.59 R (1) A firm that uses the alternative approach must review, at least
    on an annual basis and

    with no more than one year between each review, whether its reasons for adopting
    the

    alternative approach for a particular business line, as documented under CASS
    7.13.55 R,

    continue to be valid.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (2) If, following the review in (1), a firm finds that its reasons for adopting
    the alternative

    approach are no longer valid for a particular business line, it must stop using
    the alternative

    approach for that business line as soon as reasonably practicable, and in any
    event within

    six months of the conclusion of its review in (1).

    CASS 7.13.60 R A firm that uses the alternative approach must not materially change
    how it will calculate and

    maintain the alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation amount under CASS
    7.13.65

    R unless:

    (1) an auditor of the firm has prepared a report that complies with the requirements
    in CASS

    7.13.58 R (2)(b) in respect of the firm''s proposed changes; and

    (2) the firm provides a copy of the report prepared by the auditor under (a) to
    the FCA

    before implementing the change.

    CASS 7.13.61 G A firm is reminded that, under SUP 3.4.2 R, it must take reasonable
    steps to ensure that its

    auditor has the required skill, resources and experience to perform its function.

    CASS 7.13.62 R A firm that uses the alternative approach for a particular business
    line must, on each business

    day (''T0''):

    (1) receive any money from and pay any money to (or, in either case, on behalf
    of) clients

    into and out of its own bank accounts;

    (2) perform the necessary reconciliations of records and accounts required under
    CASS

    7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations);

    (3) adjust the balances held in its client bank account (by effecting transfers
    between its own

    bank account and its client bank account) to address any difference arising between
    its

    client money requirement and its client money resource as at the close of business
    on the

    previous business day (''T-1''), so that the correct amount reflected in the reconciliations

    under (2) is segregated in its client bank account; and

    (4) subject to CASS 7.13.63R below, keep segregated in its client bank account
    the balance

    held under (3) until it has performed a reconciliation on the following business
    day (''T+1'')

    and as a result of that reconciliation is undertaking further adjustments under
    (3).

    CASS 7.13.63 R During the period between the adjustment in CASS 7.13.62 R (3)
    and the completion of the

    next reconciliations in CASS 7.13.62 R (2), a firm that uses the alternative approach
    for a

    particular business line may:

    (1) increase the balance held in its client bank account by making intra-day transfers
    (during

    T0) from its own bank account to its client bank account before the completion
    of the

    internal client money reconciliation under CASS 7.13.62 R (2) (that is expected
    sometime

    later on T0) only if:

    (a) the firm reasonably expects that the client money requirement for the previous

    business day (T-1) will increase above the client money resource currently (during
    T0)

    held in its client bank account; and

    (b) such reasonable expectations are based on the working calculation of the client

    money requirement relating to the previous business day (T-1) that the firm has
    already

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    determined on that business day (during T0) (as part of the process of completing
    its

    internal client money reconciliation); or

    (2) decrease the balance held in its client bank account by making intra-day transfers

    (during T0) from its client bank account to its own bank account before the completion
    of the

    internal client money reconciliation under CASS 7.13.62 R (2) (that is expected
    sometime

    later on T0) only if:

    (a) the firm reasonably expects that the client money requirement for the previous

    business day (T-1) will decrease below the client money resource currently held
    (during

    T0) in its client bank account; and

    (b) such reasonable expectations are based on the working calculation of the client

    money requirement relating to the previous business day (T-1) that the firm has
    already

    determined on that business day (during T0) (as part of the process of completing
    its

    internal client money reconciliation).

    However, in doing so, a firm must act prudently and should take appropriate steps
    to manage

    the risk of not having segregated an amount that appropriately reflects its actual
    client money

    requirement at any given time.

    CASS 7.13.64 G It is anticipated that CASS 7.13.63 R may be used by firms which
    maintain client bank accounts

    in a number of different time zones and making adjustments to the balances of
    those client

    bank accounts is dependent on meeting cut off times for money transfers in those
    time zones.

    CASS 7.13.65 R (1) A firm that uses the alternative approach must, in addition
    to CASS 7.13.62 R, pay an

    amount (determined in accordance with this rule) of its own money into its client
    bank

    account and subsequently retain that money in its client bank account (alternative
    approach

    mandatory prudent segregation). The amount segregated by a firm in its client
    bank account

    under this rule is client money for the purposes of the client money rules and
    the client

    money distribution and transfer rules.

    (2) The amount required to be segregated under this rule must be an amount that
    a firm

    reasonably determines would be sufficient, at the time it makes the determination,
    to protect

    client money against the risk that at any time in the following three months the
    following

    categories of client money may not have been fully segregated in its client bank
    account or

    may not be (or become) available for pooling under CASS 7A.2.4R (1), were a primary

    pooling event to occur:

    (a) client money that is received and held by the firm in its own bank account
    during the

    period between:

    (i) the firm''s adjustment of client bank account balances under CASS 7.13.62
    R (3)

    on a particular business day; and

    (ii) the firm''s subsequent adjustments under CASS 7.13.62 R (3) on the following

    business day; and

    (b) money received and held by the firm in its own bank account which the firm
    does not

    initially identify as part of its client money requirement, but which subsequently
    does

    become part of its client money requirement;

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    with the effect that the firm''s alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation
    under this

    rule will reduce, as far as possible, any shortfall that might have been produced
    as a result

    of (a) or (b) on the occurrence of a primary pooling event.

    (3)

    (a) Subject to (c), in reaching its determination under (2) of the amount of money
    that

    would be sufficient to address the risks referred to in (2) for the forthcoming
    three

    months, a firm must take into account the following in respect of each business
    line for

    which it uses the alternative approach, and for at least the previous three months:

    (i) the firm''s client money requirement over the course of that prior period
    (excluding

    any amount that was required to be segregated under this rule during that prior

    period for the purposes of alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation);

    (ii) the daily adjustment payments that the firm made into its client bank account

    under CASS 7.13.62 R (3) during that prior period; and

    (iii) the amount of money received by the firm in its own bank account which it
    did not

    initially identify as part of its client money requirement, but which subsequently,
    and

    during that prior period, became part of its client money requirement;

    as shown in its internal records.

    (b) In reaching its determination under (2) a firm must also take into account,
    but at all

    times having regard to the requirement under (2), any impact that particular events,
    the

    seasonal nature of each relevant business line, or any other aspect of those business

    lines may have on:

    (i) the firm''s client money requirement during the forthcoming three months for
    which

    the amount of alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation required under

    this rule is being determined;

    (ii) the daily adjustment payments that the firm is likely to make into its client
    bank

    account under CASS 7.13.62 R (3) in that same period; and

    (iii) the amount of unidentified receipts of money that the firm is likely to
    receive into

    its own bank account and which will subsequently, in that same period, become
    part

    of its client money requirement.

    (c) If, at the time of its determination under (2), the firm has not been trading
    for three

    months in a business line for which it is using the alternative approach, then
    it must use

    the records that are available to it and must also factor in reasonable forecasts,
    as

    required under (b), to establish a three-month reference period.

    (4)

    (a) A firm must, at regular intervals that are at least quarterly, repeat and
    complete the

    combined process of:

    (i) determining the amount that it is required to segregate for the purposes of

    alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation under (2) and (3);

    (ii) making necessary adjustments to its records to reflect any changes to its
    client

    money requirement (in accordance with CASS 7.16.16 R (3) and CASS 7.16.17 R

    (2)); and

    (iii) paying any additional amounts of its own money into its client bank account
    to

    increase the firm''s alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation or

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    withdrawing any excess amounts from its client bank account to decrease the firm''s

    alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation after it has adjusted its records

    under (ii).

    (b) The combined process of (a)(i) to (iii) must take no longer than ten business
    days.

    (c) To the extent that a firm''s compliance with (a)(i) and (ii) results in there
    being an

    excess in the firm''s client bank account, the firm may cease to treat that money
    as client

    money.

    (5) A firm must ensure that the individual responsible for CASS oversight under
    CASS

    1A.3.1 R, CASS 1A.3.1A R or CASS 1A.3.1C R (as appropriate) reviews the adequacy
    of

    the amount of the firm''s alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation maintained

    under this rule at least annually.

    CASS 7.13.66 R A firm must create and keep up-to-date records so that any amount
    of money that is, pursuant

    to CASS 7.13.65 R:

    (1) paid into a client bank account and retained as client money; or

    (2) withdrawn from a client bank account;

    can be easily ascertained (the alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation
    record).

    CASS 7.13.67 R The alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation record under
    CASS 7.13.66 R must

    record:

    (1) the date of the first determination under CASS 7.13.65 R (2) and each subsequent

    review undertaken under CASS 7.13.65 R (4), and the total amount that the firm
    determined

    was required to be segregated under CASS 7.13.65 R (2) as at that date;

    (2) the date of any payment of the firm''s own money into a client bank account,
    or

    withdrawal of any excess from a client bank account under CASS 7.13.65 R, and
    for each

    such occasion:

    (a) the amount of the payment or withdrawal;

    (b) the fact that the money was paid or withdrawn by the firm in accordance with
    CASS

    7.13.65 R; and

    (c) as at that date, the total amount actually segregated by the firm under CASS
    7.13.65

    R.

    CASS 7.13.68 R The alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation record must
    be retained for five years

    after the firm ceases to segregate any money in accordance with CASS 7.13.65 R.

    CASS 7.13.69 G Nothing in CASS 7.13.54 G to CASS 7.13.68 R prevents a firm from
    also making use of the

    prudent segregation rule in CASS 7.13.41 R.

    CASS 7.13.70 G Use of the normal approach in relation to certain regulated clearing

    arrangements

    CASS 7.13.72 R sets out the circumstances under which a firm, that would otherwise
    be

    required to comply with the requirement in CASS 7.13.6 R to receive client money
    directly into

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    a client bank account, must receive (or is permitted to receive) client money
    into its own bank

    account.

    CASS 7.13.71 R A firm that is also a clearing member that is using the normal
    approach in connection with

    regulated clearing arrangements must use reasonable endeavours to ensure it is
    not required

    under its arrangements with an authorised central counterparty to receive mixed
    remittances

    from or pay mixed remittances to the authorised central counterparty through a
    single bank

    account.

    CASS 7.13.72 R (1) If, notwithstanding its reasonable endeavours in accordance
    with CASS 7.13.71 R, the

    firm is required under its arrangements with an authorised central counterparty
    to:

    (a) receive mixed remittances from the authorised central counterparty into a
    single bank

    account and pay mixed remittances to the authorised central counterparty from
    that bank

    account; or

    (b) pay mixed remittances to the authorised central counterparty using a single
    bank

    account;

    then such arrangements for client money are permitted if the firm complies, as
    applicable, with

    (2) and CASS 7.13.73 R.

    (2)

    (a) In either or both of the circumstances described in (1):

    (i) the firm must pay any mixed remittances to the authorised central counterparty

    from its own bank account; and

    (ii) the firm is permitted to pay any remittances to the authorised central counterparty

    that consist only of client money from that same bank account.

    (aa) In the circumstances described in (1)(a), the firm is permitted to receive
    any

    remittances that consist only of client money from the authorised central counterparty

    into the same bank account that it uses under (2)(a), if it complies with (b).

    (b) Where, in the circumstances described in (1)(a), a mixed remittance or a remittance

    that consists only of client money from an authorised central counterparty is
    received

    into a firm''s own account, the firm must transfer any client money element of
    the

    remittance to its client bank account promptly and, in any event, no later than
    the next

    business day after receipt.

    CASS 7.13.72A (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), CASS 7.13.73R to CASS 7.13.75R
    do not apply to a

    R firm following a primary pooling event.

    (2) If, at the time of a primary pooling event, a firm has retained money in a
    client bank

    account for the purposes of clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation
    under

    CASS 7.13.73R, that money remains client money for the purposes of the client
    money

    rules and the client money distribution and transfer rules.

    (3) Where a firm holds a clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation record
    under

    CASS 7.13.76R following a primary pooling event, the clearing arrangement mandatory

    prudent segregation record must continue to satisfy the requirements set out in
    CASS

    7.13.75R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.73 R (1) Where the circumstances described in CASS 7.13.72 R (1)(a)
    apply to a firm it must pay

    an amount (determined in accordance with this rule) of its own money into its
    client bank

    account and retain that money in its client bank account (clearing arrangement
    mandatory

    prudent segregation). The amount segregated by a firm in its client bank account
    under this

    rule will be client money for the purposes of the client money rules and the client
    money

    distribution and transfer rules.

    (2) The amount required to be segregated under this rule must be an amount that
    a firm

    reasonably determines would be sufficient, at the time it makes the determination,
    to protect

    client money against the risk that at any time in the following three months client
    money

    received from the authorised central counterparty and held by the firm in its
    own bank

    account following receipt of these monies underCASS 7.13.72 R (1)(a) and until
    their

    transfer in accordance with CASS 7.13.72 R (2)(b) may not have been fully segregated
    in its

    client bank account or may not be (or become) available for pooling under CASS
    7A.2.4R

    (1), were a primary pooling event to occur with the effect that the firm''s clearing

    arrangement mandatory prudent segregation under this rule will reduce, as far
    as possible,

    any shortfall that might have been produced as a result of this risk on the occurrence
    of a

    primary pooling event.

    (3)

    (a) Subject to (c), in reaching its determination under (2) of the amount of money
    that

    would be sufficient to address the risks referred to in (2) for the forthcoming
    three

    months, a firm must take into account the following for at least the previous
    three

    months:

    (i) the firm''s client money requirement over the course of that prior period
    (excluding

    any amount that was required to be segregated under this rule during that prior

    period for the purposes of clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation);

    and

    (ii) the payments that the firm made into its client bank account under CASS 7.13.72

    R (2)(b) during that prior period;

    as shown in its internal records.

    (b) In reaching its determination under (2) a firm must also take into account,
    at all times

    having regard to the requirement under (2), any impact that particular events,
    the

    seasonal nature of each relevant business line, or any other aspect of those business

    line(s) may have on:

    (i) the firm''s client money requirement during the forthcoming three months for
    which

    the amount of clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation required under

    this rule is being determined; and

    (ii) the payments that the firm is likely to make into its client bank account
    under

    CASS 7.13.72 R (2)(b).

    (c) If, at the time of its determination under (2), the firm has not been trading
    for three

    months in a business line for which it is using the normal approach in connection
    with

    regulated clearing arrangements, then it must use the records that are available
    to it and

    must also factor in reasonable forecasts, as required under (b), to make up a
    threemonth reference period.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (4)

    (a) A firm must, at regular intervals that are at least quarterly, repeat and
    complete the

    combined process of:

    (i) determining the amount that it is required to segregate for the purposes of
    clearing

    arrangement mandatory prudent segregation under (2) and (3);

    (ii) making necessary adjustments to its records to reflect any changes to its
    client

    money requirement in accordance with CASS 7.16.16 R (3) and CASS 7.16.17 R (1);

    and

    (iii) paying any additional amounts of its own money into its client bank account
    to

    increase the firm''s clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation or

    withdrawing any excess amounts from its client bank account to decrease the firm''s

    clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation after it has adjusted its records

    under (ii).

    (b) The combined process of (a)(i) to (iii) must take no longer than ten business
    days.

    (c) To the extent that a firm''s compliance with (a)(i) and (ii) results in there
    being an

    excess in the firm''s client bank account, the firm may cease to treat that money
    as client

    money.

    (5) A firm must ensure that the individual responsible for CASS oversight under
    CASS

    1A.3.1 R, CASS 1A.3.1A R or CASS 1A.3.1C R (as appropriate) reviews the adequacy
    of

    the amount of the firm''s clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation maintained

    under this rule at least annually.

    CASS 7.13.74 R Clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation record

    A firm must create and keep up-to-date records so that any amount of money that
    is, pursuant

    to CASS 7.13.73 R:

    (1) paid into a client bank account and retained as client money; or

    (2) withdrawn from a client bank account;

    can be easily ascertained (the clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation
    record).

    CASS 7.13.75 R The clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation record under
    CASS 7.13.74 R must

    record:

    (1) the date of the first determination under CASS 7.13.73 R (2) and each subsequent

    review undertaken under CASS 7.13.73 R (4), and the total amount that the firm
    determined

    was required to be segregated under CASS 7.13.73 R (2) as at that date;

    (2) the date of any payment of the firm''s own money into a client bank account,
    or

    withdrawal of any excess from a client bank account under CASS 7.13.73 R (4)(a)(iii),
    and

    for each such occasion:

    (a) the amount of the payment or withdrawal;

    (b) the fact that the money was paid or withdrawn by the firm in accordance with
    CASS

    7.13.73 R; and

    (c) as at that date, the total amount actually segregated by the firm under CASS
    7.13.73

    R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.13.76 R The clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation record must
    be retained for five

    years after the firm ceases to segregate any money in accordance with CASS 7.13.73
    R.

    CASS 7.13.77 G Nothing in CASS 7.13.73 R to CASS 7.13.76 R prevents a firm from
    making use of the prudent

    segregation rule in CASS 7.13.41 R.

    CASS 7.13.78 G The obligation to use reasonable endeavours referred to in CASS
    7.13.71 R is a continuing

    obligation. Firms should at least on an annual basis, whether it is possible for
    payments of

    client money between the firm and the authorised central counterparties to be
    made separately

    from house monies and for such payments to be received into and made from its
    client bank

    accounts.

    CASS 7.13.79 G Where a firm operates a sub-pool in accordance with CASS 7.19 (Clearing
    member client

    money sub-pools), the references to client bank accounts in CASS 7.13.70 G to
    CASS 7.13.78

    G should be read as client bank accounts pertaining to the relevant sub-pool.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.14 Client money held by a third party

    CASS 7.14.1 G This section sets out the requirements a firm must comply with when
    it allows another person to

    hold client money, other than under CASS 7.13.3 R, without discharging its fiduciary
    duty to

    that client. Such circumstances arise when, for example, a firm passes client
    money to a

    clearing house in the form of margin for the firm''s obligations to the clearing
    house that are

    referable to transactions undertaken by the firm for the relevant clients. They
    may also arise

    when a firm passes client money to an intermediate broker for contingent liability
    investments in

    the form of initial or variation margin on behalf of a client. In these circumstances,
    the firm

    remains responsible for that client equity balance held at the intermediate broker
    until the

    contract is terminated and all of that client''s positions at that broker closed.
    Similarly, this

    section applies where a firm allows a broker to hold client money in respect of
    the firm''s client''s

    non-margined transactions, again without the firm discharging its fiduciary duty
    to that client. In

    all cases, if a firm wishes to discharge itself from its fiduciary duty, it should
    do so in

    accordance with the rule regarding the discharge of a firm''s fiduciary duty to
    the client (CASS

    7.11.34 R).

    CASS 7.14.2 R A firm may allow another person, such as an exchange, a clearing
    house or an intermediate

    broker, to hold client money, but only if:

    (1) the firm allows that person to hold the client money:

    (a) for the purpose of one or more transactions for a client through or with that
    person; or

    (b) to meet a client''s obligation to provide collateral for a transaction (for
    example, an

    initial margin requirement for a contingent liability investment); and

    (2) in the case of a retail client, that client has been notified that the firm
    may allow the other

    person to hold its client money.

    CASS 7.14.3 G Client money that a firm allows another person to hold under CASS
    7.14.2 R:

    (1) should only be held for transactions which are likely to occur (and for which
    the other

    person needs to receive client money) or have recently settled (and such that
    the other

    person has received client money); and

    (2) should be recorded in client transaction accounts by that other person.

    CASS 7.14.4 G Apart from client money held by a firm in an individual client account
    or an omnibus client

    account at an authorised central counterparty, a firm should not hold excess client
    money in its

    client transaction accounts.

    CASS 7.14.5 G Client money arising from, or in connection with, safe custody assets

    (1) Money arising from, or in connection with, the holding of a safe custody assets
    by a firm

    which is due to clients should, unless treated otherwise under the client money
    rules, be

    treated as client money by the firm.

    (2) Firms are reminded of the guidance in CASS 6.1.2 G.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.14.6 R If a firm has deposited safe custody assets with a third party under
    CASS 6.3 and client money

    arises from, or in connection with, those safe custody assets then the firm must
    ensure that the

    third party either deposits the money in a client bank account of the firm or
    records it in a client

    transaction account for the benefit of the firm clients as appropriate.

    CASS 7.14.7 G Firms are reminded of the guidance in CASS 7.14.4 G which is applicable
    to client transaction

    accounts.

    CASS 7.14.8 G If the third party holding the safe custody assets under CASS 7.14.6
    R is a bank with which the

    firm is permitted to deposit client money under CASS 7.13.3 R, then the client
    bank account

    referred to in CASS 7.14.6 R may be an account with that bank.

    CASS 7.14.9 G Firms are reminded of the requirements under CASS 7.18 for acknowledgement
    letters, which

    must be complied with before using client bank accounts and client transaction
    accounts.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.15 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 7.15.1 G (1) This section sets out the requirements a firm must meet when
    keeping records and

    accounts of the client money it holds.

    (2) Where a firm establishes one or more sub-pools, the provisions of CASS 7.15
    (Records,

    accounts and reconciliations) shall be read as applying separately to the firm''s
    general pool

    and each sub-pool in line with CASS 7.19.3 R and CASS 7.19.4 R.

    CASS 7.15.2 R A firm must keep such records and accounts as are necessary to enable
    it, at any time and

    without delay, to distinguish client money held for one client from client money
    held for any

    other client, and from its own money.

    [Note: article 2(1)(a) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.15.3 R A firm must maintain its records and accounts in a way that ensures
    their accuracy, and in

    particular their correspondence to the client money held for clients and that
    they may be used

    as an audit trail.

    [Note: article 2(1)(b) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.15.4 G (1) The requirements in CASS 7.15.2R to CASS 7.15.3R are for a firm
    to keep internal

    records and accounts of client money. Therefore, any records falling under those

    requirements should be maintained by the firm and should be separate to any records
    the

    firm may have obtained from any third parties, such as those with or through whom
    it may

    have deposited, or otherwise allowed to hold, client money.

    (2) Where a firm complies with CASS 7.15 as a whole (to the extent applicable
    to that firm)

    this will be sufficient to comply with the specific duty in CASS 7.15.3R to maintain
    its records

    and accounts in a way that ensures that they can be used as an audit trail.

    CASS 7.15.5 R Record keeping

    (1) A firm must maintain records so that it is able to promptly determine the
    total amount of

    client money it should be holding for each of its clients.

    (2) A firm must ensure that its records are sufficient to show and explain its
    transactions and

    commitments for its client money.

    (3) Unless otherwise stated, a firm must ensure that any record made under the
    this chapter

    is retained for a period of five years starting from the later of:

    (a) the date it was created; and

    (b) (if it has been modified since the date it was created), the date it was most
    recently

    modified.

    CASS 7.15.6 G Unless required sooner under another rule in this chapter, in complying
    with CASS 7.15.5 R (1)

    a firm should ensure it is able to determine the total amount of client money
    it should be holding

    for each client within two business days of having taken a decision to do so or
    at the request of

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    the FCA.

    CASS 7.15.7 R For each internal client money reconciliation and external client
    money reconciliation the firm

    conducts, it must ensure that it records:

    (1) the date it carried out the relevant process;

    (2) the actions the firm took in carrying out the relevant process; and

    (3) the outcome of its calculation of its client money requirement and client
    money resource.

    CASS 7.15.8 G Policies and procedures

    Firms are reminded that they must, under SYSC 6.1.1 R, establish, implement and
    maintain

    adequate policies and procedures sufficient to ensure compliance of the firm with
    the rules

    under this chapter. This should include, for example, establishing and maintaining
    policies and

    procedures concerning:

    (1) the frequency and method of the reconciliations the firm is required to carry
    out under

    this section;

    (2) the resolution of reconciliation discrepancies under this section; and

    (3) the frequency at which the firm is required to review its arrangements in
    compliance with

    this chapter.

    CASS 7.15.9 R Receipts of client money

    A firm must maintain appropriate records that account for all receipts of client
    money in the form

    of cash, cheque or other payable order that are not yet deposited in a client
    bank account (see

    CASS 7.13.32 R and CASS 7.13.33 R).

    CASS 7.15.10 G Firms following one of the standard methods of internal client
    money reconciliation in CASS

    7.16 are also reminded that they must, as part of their internal client money
    reconciliation, take

    into account all receipts of client money in the form of cash, cheque or other
    payable order that

    are not yet deposited in a client bank account (see CASS 7.13.32 R and CASS 7.13.33
    R).

    CASS 7.15.11 R Payments made to discharge fiduciary duty

    If a firm draws a cheque, or other payable order, to discharge its fiduciary duty
    to its clients (see

    CASS 7.11.40 R), it must continue to record its obligation to its clients until
    the cheque, or other

    payable order, is presented and paid by the bank.

    CASS 7.15.12 R Internal client money reconciliations

    An internal client money reconciliation requires a firm to carry out a reconciliation
    of its internal

    records and accounts of the amount of client money that the firm holds for each
    client with its

    internal records and accounts of the client money the firm should hold in client
    bank accounts

    or has placed in client transaction accounts.

    CASS 7.15.13 R In carrying out an internal client money reconciliation, a firm
    must use the values contained in

    its internal records and ledgers (for example, its cash book or other internal
    accounting records)

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    rather than the values contained in the records it has obtained from banks and
    other third

    parties with whom it has placed client money (for example, bank statements).

    CASS 7.15.14 G An internal client money reconciliation should:

    (1) be one of the steps a firm takes to arrange adequate protection for clients''
    assets when

    the firm is responsible for them (see Principle 10 (Clients'' assets), as it relates
    to client

    money);

    (2) be one of the steps a firm takes to satisfy its obligations under CASS 7.12.2
    R and

    CASS 7.15.3 R and, where relevant, SYSC 4.1.1R (1) and SYSC 6.1.1 R, to ensure
    the

    accuracy of the firm''s records and accounts;

    (3) for the normal approach to segregating client money (CASS 7.13.6 R), check
    whether

    the amount of client money recorded in the firm''s records as being segregated
    in client bank

    accounts meets the firm''s obligations to its clients under the client money rules
    on a daily

    basis; and

    (4) for the alternative approach to segregating client money (CASS 7.13.62 R),
    calculate the

    amount of client money to be segregated in client bank accounts which meets the
    firm''s

    obligations to its clients under the client money rules on a daily basis.

    CASS 7.15.15 R (1) Subject to paragraph (4), a firm must perform an internal client
    money reconciliation:

    (a) each business day; and

    (b) based on the records of the firm as at the close of business on the previous
    business

    day.

    (2) When performing an internal client money reconciliation, a firm must, subject
    to (3),

    follow one of the standard methods of internal client money reconciliation in
    CASS 7.16.

    (3) A firm proposing to follow a non-standard method of internal client money
    reconciliation

    must comply with the requirements in CASS 7.15.17 R to CASS 7.15.19 G.

    (4) Following a primary pooling event, and in addition to any obligations of a
    special

    administrator under regulation 10H of the IBSA Regulations:

    (a) a firm must perform an internal client money reconciliation that relates to
    the time of

    the primary pooling event as soon as reasonably practicable after the primary
    pooling

    event; and

    (b) the firm must perform further internal client money reconciliations as regularly
    as

    required under paragraph (5), based on the records of the firm as at the close
    of

    business on the business day before the day on which the reconciliation takes
    place.

    (5) A firm must determine when and how often to perform an internal client money

    reconciliation under paragraph (4)(b) so as to ensure that:

    (a) the firm remains in compliance with CASS 7.15.2R, CASS 7.15.3R and CASS

    7.15.5R(1) and (2) (Record keeping); and

    (b) the correct amounts of client money are returned to clients or transferred
    on behalf of

    clients under the client money distribution and transfer rules.

    CASS 7.15.15A (1) The reference point for the internal client money reconciliation
    under CASS

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    G 7.15.15R(4)(a) should be the precise point in time at which the primary pooling
    event

    occurred.

    (2) When a firm decides whether it is necessary at any particular point in time
    to perform an

    internal client money reconciliation under CASS 7.15.15R(4)(b), it should have
    particular

    regard to the need to maintain its books and accounts in order to ensure that:

    (a) each notional pool of client money formed under CASS 7A.2.4R(1) and (1A) (Pooling

    and distribution or transfer) is correctly composed and maintained, and is treated

    separately;

    (b) client money that is required under CASS 7A.2.4R(3) (Pooling and distribution
    or

    transfer) and CASS 7A.2.7-AR (Client money received after a primary pooling event)
    to

    be treated as outside of any notional pool is treated accordingly; and

    (c) where applicable, clients’ entitlements to their client money are calculated
    in

    accordance with CASS 7A.2.5R(-2)(b) (Client money entitlements).

    (4) Depending on the circumstances of the firm and the scale, frequency and nature
    of

    activity after a primary pooling event that affects client money, a firm may conclude
    that it is

    necessary to continue performing internal client money reconciliations each business
    day

    for a period of time after the primary pooling event.

    CASS 7.15.16 R (1) A firm which has adopted the normal approach to segregating
    client money (see CASS

    7.13.6 R) must use the internal client money reconciliation to check whether its
    client money

    resource, as at the close of business on the previous business day, was equal
    to its client

    money requirement at the close of business on that previous day.

    (2) A firm that adopts the alternative approach to segregating client money (see
    CASS

    7.13.54 G) must use the internal client money reconciliation to ensure that its
    client money

    resource as at the close of business on any day it carries out an internal client
    money

    reconciliation is equal to its client money requirement at the close of business
    on the

    previous day.

    CASS 7.15.17 R Non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation

    A non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation is a method of internal
    client

    money reconciliation which does not meet the requirements in CASS 7.16 (The standard

    methods of internal client money reconciliation).

    CASS 7.15.18 R (1) Before using a non-standard method of internal client money
    reconciliation, a firm must:

    (a) establish and document in writing its reasons for concluding that the method
    of

    internal client money reconciliation it proposes to use will:

    (i) (for the normal approach to segregating client money) check whether the amount

    of client money recorded in the firm''s records as being segregated in client
    bank

    accounts meets the firm''s obligation to its clients under the client money rules
    on a

    daily basis; or

    (ii) (for the alternative approach to segregating client money) calculate the
    amount of

    client money to be segregated in client bank accounts which meets the firm''s

    obligations to its clients under the client money rules on a daily basis;

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (b) notify the FCA of its intentions to use a non-standard method of internal
    client money

    reconciliation; and

    (c) send a written report to the FCA prepared by an independent auditor of the
    firm in

    line with a reasonable assurance engagement and stating the matters set out in
    (2).

    (2) The written report in (1)(c) must state whether in the auditor''s opinion:

    (a) the method of internal client money reconciliation which the firm will use
    is suitably

    designed to enable it to (as applicable):

    (i) (for the normal approach to segregating client money) check whether the amount

    of client money recorded in the firm''s records as being segregated in client
    bank

    accounts meets the firm''s obligation to its clients under the client money rules
    on a

    daily basis; or

    (ii) (for the alternative approach to segregating client money) calculate the
    amount of

    client money to be segregated in client bank accounts which meets the firm''s

    obligations to its clients under the client money rules on a daily basis; and

    (b) the firm''s systems and controls are suitably designed to enable it to carry
    out the

    method of internal client money reconciliation the firm will use.

    (3) A firm using a non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation
    must not

    materially change its method of undertaking internal client money reconciliations
    unless:

    (a) the firm has established and documented in writing it reasons for concluding
    that the

    changed methodology will meet the requirements in (1)(a)(i) and (ii), as applicable;

    (b) an auditor of the firm has prepared a report that complies with the requirements
    in

    (1)(c) and (2) in respect of the firm''s proposed changes; and

    (c) the firm provides a copy of the report prepared by the auditor under (2) to
    the FCA

    before implementing the change .

    CASS 7.15.19 G A firm is reminded that, under SUP 3.4.2 R, it must take reasonable
    steps to ensure that its

    auditor has the required skill, resources and experience to perform its function.

    CASS 7.15.20 R External client money reconciliations

    A firm must conduct, on a regular basis, reconciliations between its internal
    records and

    accounts and those of any third parties which hold client money.

    [Note: article 2(1)(c) of the MiFID Delegated Directive]

    CASS 7.15.21 G The purpose of an external client money reconciliation is to ensure
    the accuracy of a firm''s

    internal records and accounts against those of any third parties by whom client
    money is held.

    CASS 7.15.21A Frequency of external client money reconciliations

    R

    CASS 7.15.22R to 7.15.26R do not apply to a firm following a primary pooling event.

    CASS 7.15.21B CASS 7.15.26AR applies to a firm following a primary pooling event.

    G

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.15.22 R A firm must perform an external client money reconciliation:

    (1) as regularly as is necessary but without allowing more than one month to pass
    between

    each external client money reconciliation; and

    (2) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the external client
    money

    reconciliation relates.

    CASS 7.15.23 R When determining the frequency at which it will undertake external
    client money reconciliations,

    a firm must have regard to:

    (1) the frequency, number and value of transactions which the firm undertakes
    in respect of

    client money; and

    (2) the risks to which the client money is exposed, such as the nature, volume
    and

    complexity of the firm''s business and where and with whom client money is held.

    CASS 7.15.24 R (1) A firm must make and retain records sufficient to show and
    explain any decision it has

    taken under CASS 7.15.23 R when determining the frequency of its external client
    money

    reconciliation. Subject to (2), any such records must be retained indefinitely.

    (2) If any decision under CASS 7.15.23 R is superseded by a subsequent decision
    under

    that rule then the record of that earlier decision retained in accordance with
    (1) need only be

    retained for a further period of five years from the subsequent decision.

    CASS 7.15.25 G In most circumstances, firms which undertake transactions on a
    daily basis should conduct an

    external client money reconciliation each business day.

    CASS 7.15.26 R (1) Subject to (3), a firm must review the frequency it conducts
    its external client money

    reconciliations at least annually to ensure that it continues to comply with CASS
    7.15.22 R

    and has given due consideration to the matters in CASS 7.15.23 R.

    (2) For each review a firm undertakes under (1), it must record the date and the
    actions it

    took in reviewing the frequency of its external client money reconciliations.

    (3) A firm need not carry out a review under (1) if it is conducting external
    client money

    reconciliations each business day.

    CASS 7.15.26A Frequency of external reconciliations after a primary pooling event

    R

    Following a primary pooling event, and in addition to any obligations of a special
    administrator

    under regulation 10H of the IBSA Regulations:

    (1) a firm must perform an external client money reconciliation that relates to
    the time of the

    primary pooling event as soon as reasonably practicable after the primary pooling
    event,

    based on the next available statements or other form of confirmation after the
    primary

    pooling event from:

    (a) the banks with which the firm holds a client bank account; and

    (b) the persons with which the firm holds a client transaction account; and

    (2) the firm must perform further external client money reconciliations on a regular
    basis:

    (a) with a suitable frequency to ensure that the correct amounts of client money
    are

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    returned to clients or transferred on behalf of clients under the client money
    distribution

    and transfer rules; and

    (b) as soon as reasonably practicable after the date to which the external client
    money

    reconciliation relates.

    CASS 7.15.26B The reference point for the external client money reconciliation
    under CASS 7.15.26AR(1)

    G should be the precise point in time at which the primary pooling event occurred.

    CASS 7.15.26C When determining the frequency with which it will undertake external
    client money

    R reconciliations under CASS 7.15.26AR(2) after a primary pooling event, a firm
    must have

    regard to:

    (1) the frequency, number and value of transactions which the firm undertakes
    in respect of

    client money;

    (2) the risks to which the client money is exposed, such as the nature, volume
    and

    complexity of the firm’s business and where and with whom client money is held;
    and

    (3) the need to be able to verify that:

    (a) client money within each notional pool formed under CASS 7A.2.4R(1) and (1A)

    (Pooling and distribution or transfer), and client money that is required under
    CASS

    7A.2.4R(3) (Pooling and distribution or transfer) and CASS 7A.2.7-AR (Client money

    received after a primary pooling event) to be treated as outside of any notional
    pool, has

    not been incorrectly distributed, transferred or dissipated; and

    (b) the proceeds of any payments and transactions that settle after the primary
    pooling

    event and which involve client money, including interest payments and other amounts

    included in the client money resource, have been received correctly.

    CASS 7.15.27 R Method of external client money reconciliations

    An external client money reconciliation requires a firm to:

    (1) compare:

    (a) the balance, currency by currency, on each client bank account recorded by
    the firm,

    as set out in the most recent statement or other form of confirmation issued by
    the bank

    with which those accounts are held; and

    (b) the balance, currency by currency, on each client transaction account as recorded
    by

    the firm, as set out in the most recent statement or other form of confirmation
    issued by

    the person with whom the account is held; and

    (2) promptly identify and resolve any discrepancies between those balances under
    CASS

    7.15.31 R and CASS 7.15.32 R.

    CASS 7.15.28 R A firm must ensure it includes the following items within its external
    client money reconciliation:

    (1) any client''s approved collateral a firm holds which secures an individual
    negative client

    equity balance (see CASS 7.16.32 R); and

    (2) any of its own approved collateral a firm holds which is used to meet the
    total margin

    transaction requirement in CASS 7.16.33 R.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.15.29 R Reconciliation discrepancies

    When a discrepancy arises between a firm''s client money resource and its client
    money

    requirement identified by a firm''s internal client money reconciliations, the
    firm must determine

    the reason for the discrepancy and, subject to CASS 7.15.29AR, ensure that:

    (1) any shortfall is paid into a client bank account by the close of business
    on the day that

    the reconciliation is performed; or

    (2) any excess is withdrawn from a client bank account within the same time period.

    CASS 7.15.29A A firm that has failed is not required to make a payment or withdrawal
    under CASS 7.15.29R(1)

    R or CASS 7.15.29R(2) respectively in so far as the legal procedure for the firm’s
    failure restricts

    the firm from doing so.

    CASS 7.15.30 G Where the discrepancy identified under CASS 7.15.29 R has arisen
    as a result of a breach of

    the client money segregation requirements, the firm should ensure it takes sufficient
    steps to

    avoid a reoccurrence of that breach (see Principle 10 (Clients'' assets), as it
    relates to client

    money, CASS 7.15.3 R and, where relevant, SYSC 4.1.1R (1) and SYSC 6.1.1 R).

    CASS 7.15.31 R If any discrepancy is identified by an external client money reconciliation,
    the firm must

    investigate the reason for the discrepancy and take all reasonable steps to resolve
    it without

    undue delay, unless the discrepancy arises solely as a result of timing differences
    between the

    accounting systems of the party providing the statement or confirmation and that
    of the firm.

    CASS 7.15.32 R While a firm is unable to immediately resolve a discrepancy identified
    by an external client

    money reconciliation, and one record or set of records examined by the firm during
    its external

    client money reconciliation indicates that there is a need to have a greater amount
    of client

    money or, if appropriate, approved collateral than is the case, the firm must
    assume, until the

    matter is finally resolved, that that record or set of records is accurate and,
    subject to CASS

    7.15.32AR, pay its own money into a relevant account.

    CASS 7.15.32A A firm that has failed is not required to pay its own money into
    a relevant account under CASS

    R 7.15.32R in so far as the legal procedure for the firm’s failure restricts the
    firm from doing so.

    CASS 7.15.32B (1) CASS 7.15.29AR and CASS 7.15.32AR recognise that a failed firm
    is required to

    G investigate discrepancies, but the extent to which it is able to resolve discrepancies
    may be

    limited by insolvency law, for example.

    (2) CASS 7.15.29AR and CASS 7.15.32AR would not prevent a failed firm from making
    any

    transfers required under regulation 10H(3) or (4) of the IBSA Regulations.

    CASS 7.15.33 R Notification requirements

    A firm must inform the FCA in writing without delay if:

    (1) its internal records and accounts of client money are materially out of date,
    inaccurate or

    invalid so that the firm is no longer able to comply with the requirements in
    CASS 7.15.2 R,

    CASS 7.15.3 R or CASS 7.15.5 R (1);

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (2) it will be unable to, or materially fails to, pay any shortfall into a client
    bank account or

    withdraw any excess from a client bank account so that the firm is unable to comply
    with

    CASS 7.15.29 R after having carried out an internal client money reconciliation;

    (3) it will be unable to, or materially fails to, identify and resolve any discrepancies
    under

    CASS 7.15.31 R to CASS 7.15.32 R after having carried out an external client money

    reconciliation;

    (4) it will be unable to, or materially fails to, conduct an internal client money
    reconciliation in

    compliance with CASS 7.15.12 R and CASS 7.15.15 R;

    (5) it will be unable to, or materially fails to, conduct an external client money
    reconciliation

    in compliance with CASS 7.15.20 R to CASS 7.15.28 R; and

    (6) it becomes aware that, at any time in the preceding 12 months, the amount
    of client

    money segregated in its client bank accounts materially differed from the total
    aggregate

    amount of client money the firm was required to segregate in client bank accounts
    under the

    client money segregation requirements.

    CASS 7.15.34 G Annual audit of compliance with the client money rules

    Firms are reminded that the auditor of the firm has to confirm in the report submitted
    to the FCA

    under SUP 3.10 (Duties of auditors: notification and report on client assets)
    that the firm has

    maintained systems adequate to enable it to comply with the client money rules.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.16 The standard methods of internal client money reconciliation

    CASS 7.16.1 G (1) Firms are required to carry out an internal client money reconciliation
    each business day

    (CASS 7.15.12 R and CASS 7.15.15R(1)) or as required by CASS 7.15.15R(4) after
    a

    primary pooling event. This section sets out methods of reconciliation that are
    appropriate

    for these purposes (the standard methods of internal client money reconciliation).

    (2) Where a firm establishes one or more sub-pools, the provisions of CASS 7.16
    (The

    standard methods of internal client money reconciliation) shall be read as applying
    to the

    firm''s general pool and each sub-pool individually, in line with CASS 7.19.3
    R and CASS

    7.19.4 R.

    CASS 7.16.2 G (1) A non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation
    is a method of internal

    client money reconciliation which does not meet the requirements of this section.

    (2) Where a firm uses a non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation
    it is

    reminded that it must comply with the requirements in CASS 7.15.18 R.

    CASS 7.16.3 G Regardless of whether a firm is following one of the standard methods
    of internal client money

    reconciliation or a non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation,
    it is reminded

    that it must maintain its records so that it is able to promptly calculate the
    total amount of client

    money it should be holding for each client (see CASS 7.15.15 R (1)).

    CASS 7.16.4 G Firms are reminded that the internal client money reconciliation
    should achieve the purposes

    set out in CASS 7.15.14 G.

    CASS 7.16.5 G (1) A firm that adopts the normal approach to segregating client
    money (CASS 7.13.6 R) will

    be using the methods in this section to check whether it has correctly segregated
    client

    money in its client bank accounts.

    (2) A firm that adopts the alternative approach to segregating client money (CASS
    7.13.54

    G) will be using the methods in this section to calculate how much money it needs
    to

    withdraw from, or place in, client bank accounts as a result of any discrepancy
    arising

    between its client money requirement and its client money resource at the close
    of business

    on the previous business day.

    CASS 7.16.6 G Unless otherwise stated, firms are reminded that they are required
    to receive all client money

    receipts directly into a client bank account (see CASS 7.13.6 R).

    CASS 7.16.7 G A firm that receives client money in the form of cash, a cheque
    or other payable order is

    reminded that it must pay that money (eg, into a client bank account) no later
    than on the

    business day after it receives the money (see CASS 7.13.32 R). Once deposited
    into a client

    bank account, that receipt of client money should form part of the firm''s client
    money resource

    (see CASS 7.16.8 R). In calculating its client money requirement, a firm will
    need to take into

    account any client money received as cash, cheques or payment orders but not yet
    deposited

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    into a client bank account (see CASS 7.16.25 R (3) and CASS 7.16.26 G).

    CASS 7.16.8 R Client money resource

    The client money resource is the aggregate balance on the firm''s client bank
    accounts.

    CASS 7.16.9 G (1) A firm should ensure that the amount it reflects in its internal
    client money reconciliation

    as its client money resource is equal to the aggregate balance on its client bank
    accounts.

    For example, if:

    (a) a firm holds client money received as cash, cheques or payment orders but
    not yet

    deposited in a client bank account (in accordance with CASS 7.13.32 R); and

    (b) that firm records all receipts from clients, whether or not yet deposited
    with a bank, in

    its cashbook (see CASS 7.16.26 G (1)(a));

    its client money resource should not include the cash, cheques or payment orders
    received

    but not yet deposited in a client bank account.

    (2) The guidance in (1) is consistent with a firm''s obligations to maintain its
    internal records

    in an accurate way, particularly their correspondence to the client money held
    for clients.

    CASS 7.16.10 R Client money requirement

    Subject to CASS 7.16.12 R, the client money requirement must be calculated by
    one, but not

    both, of the following of two methods:

    (1) the individual client balance method (CASS 7.16.16 R); or

    (2) the net negative add-back method (CASS 7.16.17 R).

    CASS 7.16.11 R The net negative add-back method may only be used, under this section,
    by a CASS 7 asset

    management firm or a CASS 7 loan-based crowdfunding firm and only if such firms
    do not

    undertake any margined transactions for, or on behalf of, their clients.

    CASS 7.16.12 R A CASS 7 loan-based crowdfunding firm must not use the individual
    client balance method

    under this section.

    CASS 7.16.13 G (1) The client money requirement should represent the total amount
    of client money a firm is

    required to have segregated in client bank accounts under the client money rules.

    (2) CASS 7.16.11 R does not prevent a firm from adopting a net negative add-back
    method

    as part of a non-standard method of internal client money reconciliation.

    (3) CASS 7.16.12 R does not prevent a CASS loan-based crowdfunding firm from adopting

    the individual client balance method as part of a non-standard method of internal
    client

    money reconciliation.

    (4) If a firm uses the individual client balance method in respect of some of
    its business lines

    and the net negative add-back method in respect of others it will be conducting
    a nonstandard method of internal client money reconciliation.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.16.14 G (1) The individual client balance method (CASS 7.16.16 R) may be
    applied by any firm

    except a CASS 7 loan-based crowdfunding firm. This method requires a firm to calculate
    the

    total amount of client money it should be segregating in client bank accounts
    by reference to

    how much the firm should be holding in total (ie, across all its client bank accounts
    and

    businesses) for each of its individual clients for:

    (a) non-margined transactions (CASS 7.16.16 R (1) and CASS 7.16.21 R);

    (b) margined transactions (CASS 7.16.16 R (2) and CASS 7.16.32 R); and

    (c) certain other matters (CASS 7.16.16 R (3) and CASS 7.16.25 R).

    (2)

    (a) CASS 7.16.22 E is an evidential provision which sets out a method firms should
    use

    for calculating how much they should be holding in total for each individual client
    for nonmargined transactions.

    (b) The calculation in CASS 7.16.22 E permits a firm to calculate either one individual

    client balance across all its products and business lines for each client or a
    number of

    individual client balances for each client equal to the number of products or
    business

    lines operated by the firm in connection with that client (see CASS 7.16.22 E
    (1)).

    (c) The calculation referred to in (2)(b) may also be applied by different types
    of firms

    and, as a result, each firm will need to apply the calculation in way which recognises
    the

    business model under which that firm operates.

    CASS 7.16.15 G The net negative add-back method (CASS 7.16.17 R) is available
    to CASS 7 asset

    management firms and CASS 7 loan-based crowdfunding firms, many of whom may operate

    internal ledger systems on a bank account by bank account, not client-by-client,
    basis. This

    method allows a firm to calculate the total amount of client money it is required
    to have

    segregated in client bank accounts by reference to:

    (1) the balances in each client bank account (see CASS 7.16.17 R (1) and CASS
    7.16.18 G

    (2));

    (2) whether any individual client''s net position in a specific client bank account
    is negative

    (see CASS 7.16.17 R (2) and CASS 7.16.18 G (2)); and

    (3) certain other matters (see CASS 7.16.17 R (2) and CASS 7.16.25 R).

    CASS 7.16.16 R Client money requirement calculation: individual client balance
    method

    Subject to CASS 7.16.25 R and CASS 7.16.37 R, under this method the client money

    requirement must be calculated by taking the sum of, for all clients and across
    all products and

    accounts:

    (1) the individual client balances calculated under CASS 7.16.21 R, excluding:

    (a) individual client balances which are negative (ie, debtors); and

    (b) clients'' equity balances;

    (2) the total margined transaction requirement (calculated under CASS 7.16.32
    R); and

    (3) any amounts that have been segregated as client money according to the firm''s
    records

    under any of the following: CASS 7.13.51 R (1) (prudent segregation record), CASS
    7.13.66

    R (alternative approach mandatory prudent segregation record) and/or CASS 7.13.74
    R

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (clearing arrangement mandatory prudent segregation record).

    CASS 7.16.17 R Client money requirement calculation: net negative add-back method

    Subject to CASS 7.16.25 R, under this method the client money requirement must
    be

    calculated by taking the sum of, for each client bank account:

    (1) the amount which the firm''s internal records show as held on that account;
    and

    (2) an amount that offsets each negative net amount which the firm''s internal
    records show

    attributed to that account for an individual client.

    CASS 7.16.18 G (1) A firm which utilises the net negative add-back method is reminded
    that it must do so in

    a way which allows it to maintain its records so that, at any time, the firm is
    able to promptly

    determine the total amount of client money it should be holding for each client
    (see CASS

    7.15.5 R (1)).

    (2) For the purposes of CASS 7.16.17 R, a firm should be able to readily use the
    figures

    previously recorded in its internal records and ledgers (for example, its cashbook
    or other

    internal accounting records) as at the close of business on the previous business
    day

    without undertaking any additional steps to determine the balances in the firm''s
    client bank

    accounts.

    CASS 7.16.19 G (1) A firm which utilises the net negative add-back method may
    calculate its client money

    requirement and client money resource on a bank account by bank account basis;

    (2) For the purposes of CASS 7.16.17 R, a firm should take into account any amounts
    that

    have been segregated as client money according to the firm''s records under either
    or both

    CASS 7.13.50 R (prudent segregation record) and CASS 7.13.66 R (alternative approach

    mandatory prudent segregation record).

    CASS 7.16.20 G Non-margined transactions (eg, securities): individual client balance

    The sum of positive individual client balances for each client should represent
    the total amount

    of all money the firm holds, has received or is obligated to have received or
    be holding as client

    money in a client bank account for that client for non-margined transactions.

    CASS 7.16.21 R A firm must calculate a client''s individual client balances in
    a way which captures the total

    amount of all money the firm should be holding as client money in a client bank
    account for that

    client for non-margined transactions under the client money rules.

    CASS 7.16.22 E (1) A firm may calculate either:

    (a) one individual client balance for each client, based on the total of the firm''s
    holdings

    for that client; or

    (b) a number of individual client balances for each client, equal to the number
    of

    products or business lines the firm operates for that client and each balance
    based on

    the total of the firm''s holdings for that client in respect of the particular
    product or

    business line.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (2) Each individual client balance for a client should be calculated in accordance
    with this

    table:

    Individual client balance calculation

    Free money (sums held for a client free of sale or A

    purchase (eg, see (3)(a)) and

    sale proceeds due to the client:

    (a) for principal deals when the client B

    has delivered the designated

    investments; and

    (b) for agency deals, when:

    (i) the sale C1

    proceeds have

    been received

    by the firm and

    the client has

    delivered the

    designated

    investments; or

    (ii) the firm holds C2

    the designated

    investments for

    the client; and

    the cost of purchases:

    (c) for principal deals, paid for by the D

    client when the firm has not

    delivered the designated

    investments to the client; and

    (d) for agency deals, paid for by the

    client when:

    (i) the firm has not E1

    remitted the

    money to, or to

    the order of, the

    counterparty; or

    (ii) the designated E2

    investments

    have been

    received by the

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    firm but have

    not been

    delivered to the

    client;

    Less

    money owed by the client for unpaid purchases by, F

    or for, the client if delivery of those designated

    investments has been made to the client; and

    proceeds remitted to the client for sales transactions G

    by, or for, the client if the client has not delivered the

    designated investments.

    Individual client balance ''X'' = (A+B+C1+C2+D+E1+E2)-F-G X

    (3) When calculating an individual client balance for each client, a firm should
    also:

    (a) ensure it includes:

    (i) client money consisting of dividends received and interest earned and allocated

    (see CASS 7.11.32 R);

    (ii) client money consisting of dividends (actual or payments in lieu), stock
    lending

    fees and other payments received and allocated (see CASS 6.1.2 G);

    (iii) money the firm appropriates and segregates as client money to cover an

    unresolved shortfall in safe custody assets it identifies in its internal records
    which is

    attributable to an individual client (see CASS 6.6.54R (2)); and

    (iv) money the firm segregates as client money instead of an individual client''s
    safe

    custody asset until such time as the relevant delivery versus payment transaction

    settles under CASS 6.1.12R (2); and

    (b) deduct any amounts due and payable by the client to the firm (see CASS 7.11.25
    R).

    (4) Compliance with (1), (2) and (3) may be relied on as tending to establish
    compliance

    with CASS 7.16.21 R.

    CASS 7.16.23 R A firm must calculate an individual client balance using the contract
    value of any client

    purchases or sales, being the value to which the client would be contractual entitled
    to receive

    or contractually obligated to pay.

    CASS 7.16.24 G If a firm calculates each individual client balance on a product-by-product
    or business line-bybusiness line basis under CASS 7.16.22 E (1)(b), the result
    should be that the firm does not net

    client positions across all products and accounts.

    CASS 7.16.25 R Other requirements for calculating the client money requirement

    When calculating the client money requirement under either of the methods in CASS
    7.16.10 R,

    a firm must:

    (1) include any unallocated client money (see CASS 7.13.36 R) and unidentified
    receipts of

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    money it considers prudent to segregate as client money (see CASS 7.13.37 R);

    (2) include any money the firm appropriates and holds as client money to cover
    an

    unresolved shortfall in safe custody assets identified in its internal records
    which is not

    attributable, or cannot be attributed to, an individual client (see CASS 6.6.49
    R, CASS

    6.6.50 R and CASS 6.6.54 R);

    (3) take into account any client money received as cash, cheques or payment orders
    but not

    yet deposited into a client bank account under CASS 7.13.32 R (see also CASS 7.15.9
    R);

    (4) if it has drawn any cheques or other payable orders, to discharge its fiduciary
    duty to its

    clients and continue to treat the sum concerned as forming part of its client
    money

    requirement until the cheque or order is presented and paid by the bank (see CASS
    7.11.40

    R); and

    (5) ensure it has taken into account all client money the firm should be holding
    in connection

    with clients'' non-margined transactions.

    CASS 7.16.26 G (1) Under CASS 7.16.25 R (3), where a firm holds client money received
    as cash, cheques

    or payment orders but not yet deposited in a client bank account under CASS 7.13.32
    R, it

    may:

    (a) include these balances when calculating its client money requirement (eg,
    where the

    firm records all receipts from clients, whether or not yet deposited with a bank,
    in its

    cashbook); or

    (b) exclude these balances when calculating its client money requirement (eg,
    where the

    firm only records client receipts to its cashbook once deposited with a bank).

    (2) In line with (1)(a), the firm will need to ensure that, before finalising
    the calculation of its

    client money requirement within this section, it deducts these balances, to ensure
    that they

    do not give rise to a discrepancy between the firm''s client money requirement
    and client

    money resource (see CASS 7.15.29 R).

    (3) In line with (1)(b), although the balances concerned do not form part of the
    firm''s client

    money requirement, the firm must continue to account for all receipts of client
    money as

    cash, cheques or payment orders but not yet deposited in a client bank account
    in its

    records and accounts (see CASS 7.13.32 R and CASS 7.15.9 R).

    CASS 7.16.27 G (1) In accordance with CASS 7.16.25 R (5), where a firm has allowed
    another person to

    hold client money in connection with a client''s non-margined transaction (eg,
    in a client

    transaction account under CASS 7.14 (Client money held by a third party)), the
    firm should

    include these balances when calculating its client money requirement.

    (2) If a firm is utilising the individual client balance method (CASS 7.16.16
    R) to calculate its

    client money requirement, CASS 7.16.21 R requires the firm to include the sums
    its holds

    for each client that are placed with another person in connection with a client''s
    nonmargined transaction when calculating a client''s individual client balance
    (eg, see CASS

    7.16.22 E and items C1 and E2).

    (3) Under (1) and (2), the firm will need to ensure that, before finalising the
    calculation of its

    client money requirement within this section, it deducts positive balances held
    for clients

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    adding back negative balances attributable to clients'' non-margined transactions
    in client

    transaction accounts, to ensure that they do not give rise to a discrepancy between
    the

    firm''s client money requirement and client money resource (see CASS 7.15.29 R).

    (4) Under (1), (2) and (3), in determining the balances of client money a firm
    has allowed

    another person to hold in connection with a client''s non-margined transaction
    or the

    balances held for clients'' non-margined transactions in client transaction accounts,
    a firm

    should use the values contained in its internal records and ledgers (see CASS
    7.15.13 R).

    CASS 7.16.28 R Margined transactions (eg, derivatives): equity balances

    Subject to CASS 7.16.30 R, a client''s equity balance is the amount which the
    firm would be

    liable to pay to the client (or the client to the firm) under the client money
    rules for margined

    transactions if each of the open positions were liquidated at the closing or settlement
    prices

    published by the relevant exchange or other appropriate pricing source and the
    account with

    the firm were closed. This notional balance should include any unrealised losses
    or profits

    associated with that client''s open positions, and any margin the firm has received
    from the

    client in connection with those positions.

    CASS 7.16.29 R Subject to CASS 7.16.30 R, a firm''s equity balance is the amount
    which the firm would be liable

    to pay to the exchange, clearing house, intermediate broker or OTC counterparty
    (or viceversa) for the firm''s margined transactions if each of the open positions
    of those of the firm''s

    clients that are entitled to protection under the client money rules were liquidated
    at the closing

    or settlement prices published by the relevant exchange or other appropriate pricing
    source and

    the firm''s client transaction accounts with that exchange, clearing house, intermediate
    broker or

    OTC counterparty were closed. This notional balance should include any unrealised
    losses or

    profits associated with the open positions the firm holds for clients and any
    margin the firm

    holds for clients in the relevant client transaction accounts.

    CASS 7.16.30 R The terms ''client''s equity balance'' and ''firm''s equity balance''
    refer to cash values and do not

    include non-cash collateral or other designated investments (including approved
    collateral) the

    firm holds for a margined transaction.

    CASS 7.16.31 G Margined transactions (eg, derivatives): margined transaction

    requirement

    The margined transaction requirement should represent the total amount of client
    money a firm

    is required under the client money rules to segregate in client bank accounts
    for margined

    transactions. The calculation in CASS 7.16.33 R is designed to ensure that an
    amount of client

    money is held in client bank accounts which equals at least the difference between
    the equity

    the firm holds at exchanges, clearing houses, intermediate brokers and OTC counterparties
    for

    margined transactions for clients entitled to protection under the client money
    rules, and the

    amount due to clients under the client money rules for those same margined transactions.
    With

    this calculation, a firm''s margined transaction requirement should represent,
    if positions were

    unwound, the firm''s gross liabilities to clients entitled to protection under
    the client money rules

    for margined transactions.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.16.32 R The total margined transaction requirement is:

    (1) the sum of each of the client''s equity balances which are positive; less

    (2) the proportion of any individual negative client equity balance which is secured
    by client

    approved collateral; and

    (3) the net aggregate of the firm''s equity balance (negative balances being deducted
    from

    positive balances) on client transaction accounts for customers with exchanges,
    clearing

    houses, intermediate brokers and OTC counterparties.

    CASS 7.16.33 R (1) To meet the total margin transaction requirement, a firm may
    appropriate and use its

    own approved collateral, provided it meets the requirements in (2).

    (2) The firm must hold the approved collateral in a way which ensures that, in
    accordance

    with CASS 7A.2.3A R, the approved collateral will be liquidated on the occurrence
    of a

    primary pooling event and the proceeds paid into a client bank account, and in
    so doing:

    (a) ensure the approved collateral is clearly identifiable as separate from the
    firm''s own

    property and is recorded by the firm in its records as being held for its clients;

    (b) keep a record of the actions the firm has taken under this rule which includes
    a

    description of the terms on which the firm holds the approved collateral, identifies
    that

    the approved collateral is held for the benefit of its clients and specifies the
    approved

    collateral that the firm has appropriated for the purposes of this rule; and

    (c) update the record made under (b) whenever the firm ceases to appropriate and
    use

    approved collateral under this rule.

    CASS 7.16.34 G Where CASS 7.16.33 R applies, the firm will be reducing the requirement
    arising from CASS

    7.16.16 R (2) and, as such, simultaneously reducing its overall client money requirement
    (ie,

    the amount of money the firm is required to segregate in client bank accounts).

    CASS 7.16.35 R If a firm''s total margined transaction requirement is negative,
    the firm must treat it as zero for

    the purposes of calculating its client money requirement.

    CASS 7.16.36 R LME bond arrangements

    A firm with a Part 30 exemption order which also operates an LME bond arrangement
    for the

    benefit of US-resident investors must exclude the client equity balances for transactions

    undertaken on the LME on behalf of those US-resident investors from the calculation
    of the

    margined transaction requirement, to the extent those transactions are provided
    for by an LME

    bond arrangement (see CASS 12.2.3 G).

    CASS 7.16.37 R Reduced client money requirement option

    Where appropriate, a firm may:

    (1) when, in respect of a client, there is a positive individual client balance
    and a negative

    client equity balance, offset the credit against the debit and, therefore, have
    a reduced

    individual client balance in CASS 7.16.21 R for that client; and

    (2) when, in respect of a client, there is a negative individual client balance
    and a positive

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    client equity balance, offset the credit against the debit and, therefore, have
    a reduced client

    equity balance (CASS 7.16.28 R) for that client.

    CASS 7.16.38 G The effect of CASS 7.16.37 R is to allow a firm to offset, on a
    client-by-client basis, a negative

    amount with a positive amount arising out of the calculations in CASS 7.16.21
    R and CASS

    7.16.28 R and, therefore, reduce its overall client money requirement.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.17 Statutory trust

    CASS 7.17.1 G Section 137B(1) of the Act (Miscellaneous ancillary matters) provides
    that rules may make

    provision which result in client money being held by a firm on trust (England
    and Wales and

    Northern Ireland) or as agent (Scotland only). This section creates a fiduciary
    relationship

    between the firm and its client under which client money is in the legal ownership
    of the firm but

    remains in the beneficial ownership of the client. In the event of failure of
    the firm, costs relating

    to the distribution of client money may have to be borne by the trust.

    CASS 7.17.2 R Requirement

    Subject to CASS 7.17.3 R in respect of a trustee firm, a firm receives and holds
    client money as

    trustee on the following terms:

    (1) for the purposes of, and on the terms of, the client money rules and the client
    money

    distribution and transfer rules;

    (2)

    (a) where a firm maintains only a general pool of client money, subject to (4),
    for the

    clients (other than clients which are insurance undertakings when acting as such
    with

    respect to client money received in the course of insurance distribution activity
    and that

    was opted in to this chapter) for whom that money is held, according to their
    respective

    interests in it;

    (b) where a firm has established one or more pools of client money, subject to
    (4):

    (i) the general pool is held for all the clients of the firm for whom the firm
    receives or

    holds client money (other than clients which are insurance undertakings when acting

    in regard to client money received during insurance distribution activity and
    that was

    opted in to this chapter) according to their respective interests; and

    (ii) each sub-pool is for the clients of the firm who are identified as beneficiaries
    of the

    sub-pool in question, in accordance with CASS 7.19.6 R (2), according to their

    respective interests in it;

    (3) after all valid claims in (2) have been met, for clients which are insurance
    undertakings

    with respect of client money received in the course of insurance distribution
    activity

    according to their respective interests in it;

    (4) for the payment of the costs properly attributable to the distribution of
    the client money in

    (2) if such distribution takes place following the failure of the firm; and

    (5) after all valid claims and costs under (2) to (4) have been met, for the firm
    itself.

    CASS 7.17.3 R A trustee firm which is subject to the client money rules by virtue
    of CASS 7.10.1 R (2) receives

    and holds client money as trustee on the terms in CASS 7.17.2 R, subject to its
    obligations to

    hold client money as trustee under the relevant instrument of trust.

    CASS 7.17.4 G If a trustee firm holds client money, the firm should follow the
    provisions in CASS 7.10.33 R to

    CASS 7.10.40 G.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.17.5 G The statutory trust under CASS 7.17.2 R does not permit a firm,
    in its capacity as trustee, to

    use client money to advance credit to the firm''s clients, itself, or any other
    person. For example,

    if a firm wishes to undertake a transaction for a client in advance of receiving
    client money from

    that client to fund that transaction, it should not advance credit to that client
    or itself using other

    clients'' client money (ie, it should not ''pre-fund'' the transaction using other
    clients'' client

    money).

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.18 Acknowledgment letters

    CASS 7.18.1 G Purpose

    The main purposes of an acknowledgement letter are:

    (1) to put the bank, exchange, clearing house, intermediate broker, OTC counterparty
    or

    other person (as the case may be) on notice of a firm''s clients'' interests in
    client money that

    has been deposited with, or has been allowed to be held by, such person;

    (2) to ensure that the client bank account or client transaction account has been
    opened in

    the correct form (eg, whether the client bank account is being correctly opened
    as a general

    client bank account, a designated client bank account or a designated client fund
    account),

    and is distinguished from any account containing money that belongs to the firm;
    and

    (3) to ensure that the bank, exchange, clearing house, intermediate broker, OTC

    counterparty or other person (as the case may be) understands and agrees that
    it will not

    have any recourse or right against money standing to the credit of the client
    bank account or

    client transaction account, in respect of any sum owed to such person, or to any
    other third

    person, on any other account.

    CASS 7.18.2 R Client bank account acknowledgment letters

    (1) For each client bank account, a firm must, in accordance with CASS 7.18.6
    R, complete

    and sign a client bank account acknowledgement letter clearly identifying the
    client bank

    account, and send it to the bank with whom the client bank account is, or will
    be, opened,

    requesting the bank to acknowledge and agree to the terms of the letter by countersigning
    it

    and returning it to the firm.

    (2) Subject to CASS 7.18.14 R and CASS 7.18.15 R, a firm must not hold or receive
    any

    client money in or into a client bank account unless it has received a duly countersigned

    client bank account acknowledgement letter from the relevant bank that has not
    been

    inappropriately redrafted (see CASS 7.18.8 R) and clearly identifies the client
    bank account.

    CASS 7.18.3 R Client transaction account acknowledgement letters

    (1) This rule does not apply to a firm to which CASS 7.18.4 R (1) applies.

    (2) For each client transaction account, a firm must, in accordance with CASS
    7.18.6 R,

    complete and sign a client transaction account acknowledgement letter clearly
    identifying

    the client transaction account. That letter must be sent to the person with whom
    the client

    transaction account is, or will be, opened, requesting such person to acknowledge
    and

    agree to the terms of the letter by countersigning it and returning it to the
    firm.

    (3) Subject to CASS 7.18.14 R and CASS 7.18.15 R, a firm must not allow the relevant

    person to hold any client money in a client transaction account maintained by
    that person for

    the firm, unless the firm has received a duly countersigned client transaction
    account

    acknowledgement letter from that person that has not been inappropriately redrafted
    (see

    CASS 7.18.8 R) and that clearly identifies the client transaction account.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.18.4 R Authorised central counterparty acknowledgment letters

    (1) A firm which places client money at an authorised central counterparty in
    connection with

    a regulated clearing arrangement must, in accordance with CASS 7.18.6 R, complete
    and

    sign an authorised central counterparty acknowledgement letter clearly identifying
    the

    relevant client transaction account. That letter must be sent to the authorised
    central

    counterparty with whom the client transaction account is, or will be, opened,
    requesting such

    authorised central counterparty to acknowledge receipt of the letter by countersigning
    it and

    returning it to the firm.

    (2) A firm which has complied with CASS 7.18.4 R (1) may allow the authorised
    central

    counterparty to hold client money on the relevant client transaction account,
    whether or not

    the authorised central counterparty has countersigned and returned the authorised
    central

    counterparty acknowledgement letter it received from the firm.

    CASS 7.18.5 G Acknowledgement letters in general

    In drafting acknowledgement letters under CASS 7.18.2 R, CASS 7.18.3 R or CASS
    7.18.4 R,

    a firm is required to use the relevant template in CASS 7 Annex 2 R, CASS 7 Annex
    3 R or

    CASS 7 Annex 4 R, respectively.

    CASS 7.18.6 R When completing an acknowledgment letter under CASS 7.18.2 R (1),
    CASS 7.18.3 R (1) or

    CASS 7.18.4 R (1), a firm:

    (1) must not amend any of the acknowledgement letter fixed text;

    (2) subject to (3), must ensure the acknowledgement letter variable text is removed,

    included or amended as appropriate; and

    (3) must not amend any of the acknowledgement letter variable text in a way that
    would

    alter or otherwise change the meaning of the acknowledgement letter fixed text.

    CASS 7.18.7 G CASS 7 Annex 5 G contains guidance on using the template acknowledgment
    letters, including

    when and how firms should amend the acknowledgement letter variable text that
    is in square

    brackets.

    CASS 7.18.8 R (1) If, on countersigning and returning the acknowledgement letter
    to a firm, the relevant

    person has also:

    (a) made amendments to any of the acknowledgement letter fixed text; or

    (b) made amendments to any of the acknowledgement letter variable text in a way
    that

    would alter or otherwise change the meaning of the acknowledgement letter fixed
    text;

    the acknowledgement letter will have been inappropriately redrafted for the purposes
    of

    CASS 7.18.2 R (2) or CASS 7.18.3 R (3) (as applicable).

    (2) For the purposes of CASS 7.18.2 R (2) or CASS 7.18.3 R (3), amendments made
    to the

    acknowledgement letter variable text in the acknowledgement letter returned to
    a firm by the

    relevant person, will not have the result that the letter has been inappropriately
    redrafted if

    those amendments do not affect the meaning of the acknowledgement letter fixed
    text, have

    been specifically agreed with the firm and do not cause the acknowledgement letter
    to be

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    inaccurate.

    CASS 7.18.9 R A firm must use reasonable endeavours to ensure that any individual
    that has countersigned an

    acknowledgement letter that has been returned to the firm was authorised to countersign
    the

    letter on behalf of the relevant person.

    CASS 7.18.10 R (1) A firm must retain each countersigned client bank account acknowledgement
    letter and

    client transaction account acknowledgement letter it receives, from the date of
    receipt until

    the expiry of five years from the date on which the last client bank account or
    client

    transaction account to which the acknowledgement letter relates is closed.

    (2) A firm must retain a copy of each authorised central counterparty acknowledgment
    letter

    it sends to an authorised central counterparty under CASS 7.18.4 R (1), from the
    date it was

    sent until the expiry of five years from the date the last client transaction
    account to which

    the acknowledgement letter relates is closed.

    CASS 7.18.11 R A firm must also retain any other documentation or evidence it
    believes is necessary to

    demonstrate that it has complied with each of the applicable requirements in this
    section (such

    as any evidence it has obtained to ensure that the individual that has countersigned
    an

    acknowledgment letter returned to the firm was authorised to countersign the letter
    on behalf of

    the relevant person).

    CASS 7.18.12 R (1) This rule applies to:

    (a) any countersigned client bank account acknowledgement letter or client transaction

    account acknowledgement letter received by a firm under CASS 7.18.2 R (2) or CASS

    7.18.3 R (3) respectively; and

    (b) any authorised central counterparty acknowledgement letter sent by a firm
    under

    CASS 7.18.4 R (1), whether or not it has been countersigned by the relevant authorised

    central counterparty and received by the firm.

    (2) A firm must, periodically (at least annually, and whenever it is aware that
    something

    referred to in an acknowledgement letter has changed) review each of its acknowledgement

    letters to ensure that they all remain accurate.

    (3) Whenever a firm finds an inaccuracy in an acknowledgement letter, it must
    promptly

    draw up a replacement acknowledgement letter under CASS 7.18.2 R or CASS 7.18.3
    R or

    CASS 7.18.4 R, as applicable, and, if it is an acknowledgement letter required
    to be sent

    under CASS 7.18.2 R, CASS 7.18.3 R, ensure that the new acknowledgement letter
    is duly

    countersigned and returned by the relevant person.

    CASS 7.18.13 G Under CASS 7.18.12 R, a firm should draw up and send out a replacement
    acknowledgement

    letter whenever:

    (1) there has been a change in any of the parties'' names or addresses as set
    out in the

    letter; or

    (2) the firm becomes aware of an error or misspelling in the drafting of the letter.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.18.14 R If a firm''s client bank account or client transaction account
    is transferred to another person, the

    firm must promptly draw up a new acknowledgement letter under CASS 7.18.2 R, CASS
    7.18.3

    R or CASS 7.18.4 R, as applicable, and, if it is an acknowledgement letter required
    to be sent

    under CASS 7.18.2 R or CASS 7.18.3 R, ensure that the new acknowledgement letter
    is duly

    countersigned and returned by the relevant person within 20 business days of the
    firm sending

    it to that person.

    CASS 7.18.15 R If a firm opens a client bank account after a primary pooling event,
    the firm must:

    (1) promptly draw up and send out a new acknowledgement letter under CASS 7.18.2
    R;

    (2) not hold or receive any client money in or into the client bank account unless
    it has sent

    the acknowledgement letter to the relevant person; and

    (3) if the firm has not received a duly countersigned acknowledgement letter that
    has not

    been inappropriately redrafted (see CASS 7.18.8 R) within 20 business days of
    the firm

    sending the acknowledgement letter, withdraw all money standing to the credit
    of the

    account and deposit it in a client bank account with another bank as soon as possible.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7.19 Clearing member client money sub-pools

    CASS 7.19.1 G (1) Under CASS 7.17.2R(2), a firm acts as trustee for all client
    money received or held by it

    for the benefit of the clients for whom that client money is held, according to
    their respective

    interests in it.

    (2) A firm that is also a clearing member of an authorised central counterparty
    may wish to

    segregate client money specifically for the benefit of a group of clients who
    have chosen to

    clear positions through a net margined omnibus client account maintained by the
    firm with

    that authorised central counterparty, where that segregation might facilitate
    the porting of

    client positions recorded in that net margined omnibus client account. To segregate
    client

    money (that would otherwise be held in the general pool) for a specific group
    of clients

    clearing positions through a particular net margined omnibus client account, a
    clearing

    member firm may, in accordance with these rules, create a sub-pool of client money.

    (3) Upon the occurrence of a primary pooling event, the client money for:

    (a) the general pool, should be distributed in accordance with CASS 7A to the
    clients for

    whom the firm receives or holds client money in that general pool; and

    (b) a sub-pool, should either be:

    (i) transferred to facilitate porting; or

    (ii) distributed to the clients who are beneficiaries of that sub-pool, according
    to their

    respective interests under CASS 7A.2.4R (2)(a).

    (4) All client money is received or held by the firm as trustee for the clients
    of the firm.

    However, a clearing member of an authorised central counterparty who clears client

    positions through a net margined omnibus client account may organise its affairs
    (with the

    consent of the relevant clients) in such a way that those clients need not share
    in the

    general pool of client money following a primary pooling event, save to the extent
    that such

    clients otherwise have an interest in the general pool.

    CASS 7.19.2 R Where a firm creates a sub-pool for a particular net margined omnibus
    client account, it must

    not clear positions through that omnibus client account for clients who are not
    beneficiaries of

    that sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.3 R Internal controls

    A firm wishing to establish a sub-pool must establish and maintain adequate internal
    controls

    necessary to comply with the firm''s obligations under CASS 7 for the general
    pool and each

    sub-pool that it may establish.

    CASS 7.19.4 R Records

    Where a firm establishes one or more sub-pools, CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and

    reconciliations) shall be read as applying separately to the firm''s general pool
    and each subpool.

    CASS 7.19.5 A firm that establishes one or more sub-pools must establish and maintain
    adequate internal

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    G controls and records in accordance with CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and reconciliations)
    to

    conduct internal and external reconciliations for each sub-pool and the general
    pool individually.

    CASS 7.19.6 R (1) The records maintained for a sub-pool under CASS 7.19.4 R must
    identify all the client

    beneficiaries of that sub-pool.

    (2) The beneficiaries of each sub-pool are those clients:

    (a) from whom the firm has received a signed sub-pool disclosure document in

    accordance with CASS 7.19.11 R;

    (b) for whom the firm maintains, previously maintained or is in the process of

    establishing a margined transaction(s) in the relevant net margined omnibus client

    account at the authorised central counterparty; and

    (c) to whom any client equity balance or other client money is required to be
    segregated

    for the client by the firm in respect of the margined transactions under (2)(b)
    from that

    sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.7 R (1) For each sub-pool that the firm establishes, it must maintain
    a record of:

    (a) the name of the sub-pool;

    (b) the particular net margined omnibus client account at an authorised central

    counterparty to which the sub-pool relates;

    (c) each client bank account and each client transaction account (other than the
    net

    margined omnibus client account) maintained for the sub-pool, including the unique

    identifying reference or descriptor under CASS 7.19.13 R (2); and

    (d) the applicable sub-pool disclosure document for the sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.8 R The firm must maintain an up-to-date list of all the sub-pools it
    has created.

    CASS 7.19.9 R Sub-pool disclosure document

    (1) A firm wishing to establish a sub-pool must prepare a sub-pool disclosure
    document for

    each sub-pool.

    (2) The sub-pool disclosure document for each sub-pool must:

    (a) identify the sub-pool by name, as stated in its records under CASS 7.19.7
    R, the net

    margined omnibus client account and the authorised central counterparty to which
    the

    sub-pool disclosure document relates;

    (b) contain a statement that the client consents to the firm receiving and holding
    the

    client''s client money in the sub-pool;

    (c) contain a statement that, in the event of the failure of the firm, the firm
    is directed by

    the client to use any client money held by the firm in the sub-pool to facilitate
    the porting

    of the positions recorded in that net margined omnibus client account; and

    (d) a statement reminding the client that, in the event of the failure of the
    firm, if porting is

    not effected or if porting is effected but any money in the sub-pool is not used
    to facilitate

    porting, the client beneficiaries of the sub-pool will be entitled to a distribution
    of any

    client money held for that sub-pool in line with CASS 7A. However, the client

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    beneficiaries will not have a claim on any other pool of client money, except
    to the extent

    that the client is a beneficiary of another pool.

    CASS 7.19.10 G In preparing a sub-pool disclosure document under CASS 7.19.9 R
    (1), a firm may use the

    template in CASS 7 Annex 6.

    CASS 7.19.11 R (1) Before receiving or holding client money for a client for a
    sub-pool, a firm must:

    (a) provide to the client a copy of the sub-pool disclosure document applicable
    to that

    sub-pool; and

    (b) obtain a signed copy of that sub-pool disclosure document from the client.

    (2) A firm must provide the beneficiary of a sub-pool with a copy of its signed
    sub-pool

    disclosure document applicable to that sub-pool upon the beneficiary''s request.

    CASS 7.19.12 R Segregation and operation of sub-pools

    Where a firm establishes one or more sub-pools, CASS 7.13 (Segregation of client
    money) is to

    be read as applying separately to the firm''s general pool and each sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.13 R (1) A firm must not hold client money for a sub-pool in a client
    bank account or a client

    transaction account used for holding client money for any other sub-pool or the
    general

    pool.

    (2) A firm that establishes a sub-pool must ensure that the name of each client
    bank

    account and each client transaction account (other than the net margined omnibus
    client

    account) maintained for that sub-pool includes a unique identifying reference
    or descriptor

    that enables the account to be identified with that sub-pool.

    (3) Where a client of the firm is a beneficiary of the general pool and wishes
    to become a

    beneficiary of a sub-pool, the client in question shall become a beneficiary of
    the relevant

    sub-pool when :

    (a) the firm has obtained the signed sub-pool disclosure document from that client
    in

    accordance with CASS 7.19.11 R (1); and

    (b) the firm has either:

    (i) transferred the relevant amount of client money for that client from a client
    bank

    account maintained for the general pool to a client bank account maintained for
    the

    relevant sub-pool; or

    (ii) if the firm is not making a transfer of client money from the general pool,
    when it

    has received that client''s money in a client bank account maintained for the
    relevant

    sub-pool.

    (4) Where a client of the firm is a beneficiary of the general pool and wishes
    to become a

    beneficiary of a sub-pool, the firm must ensure that it does not transfer client
    money from a

    client bank account maintained for the general pool to a client bank account maintained
    for

    a sub-pool in accordance with CASS 7.19.13 R (3)(b)(i), unless the amount of client
    money

    held for the general pool is sufficient, immediately after that transfer, to satisfy
    the firm''s

    client money obligations to the remaining beneficiaries of the general pool.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (5) A client of the firm who is a beneficiary of a sub-pool ceases to be a beneficiary
    of that

    sub-pool when:

    (a) the firm has settled the amount owing to that client for all of the margined

    transactions cleared through the related net margined omnibus client account and
    no

    longer holds any client money for that client in that sub-pool, and so CASS 7.19.6
    R

    (2)(b) and CASS 7.19.6 R (2)(c) no longer apply for that client; or

    (b) the firm has complied with (i) or (ii), and in either case (iii):

    (i) the firm has received a written instruction from the client stating that the
    client no

    longer wishes to have its positions cleared through the net margined omnibus client

    account or its client money held in that sub-pool, or the firm has notified the
    client

    under CASS 7.19.18 R that it is making a material change to a sub-pool; or

    (ii) the firm has closed or moved that client''s positions to an account other
    than the

    net margined omnibus client account referable to that sub-pool; and

    (iii) the firm has either transferred the relevant amount of client money for
    that client

    from a client bank account maintained for the relevant sub-pool to a client bank

    account maintained by the firm for the general pool (or, if applicable, another
    subpool), or transferred the amount owing to that client for all of the margined

    transactions cleared through the related net margined omnibus client account and
    no

    longer holds any client money for that client in that sub-pool.

    (6) In relation to the transfer of client money under CASS 7.19.13 R (5)(b)(iii),
    a firm must

    ensure that it does not transfer client money from a client bank account maintained
    for a

    sub-pool, unless the amount of client money held for the sub-pool is sufficient,
    immediately

    after that transfer, to satisfy the firm''s client money obligations to the remaining
    beneficiaries

    of that sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.14 R Save to the extent permitted under CASS 7.13.70 G a firm that receives
    client money to be

    credited in part to the general pool or one sub-pool and in part to another sub-pool
    must:

    (1) take the necessary steps to ensure that the full sum is paid directly into
    a client bank

    account maintained for the general pool; and

    (2) promptly, and in any event no later than one business day after receipt, pay
    the money

    that is not client money for the general pool out of that client bank account
    and into a client

    bank account maintained for the appropriate sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.15 G (1) If a primary pooling event occurs before client money is transferred
    from a client bank

    account maintained for the general pool to a client bank account maintained for
    the

    appropriate sub-pool in accordance with CASS 7.19.14 R (2), the amount in question
    will

    not form part of that sub-pool, including for the purposes of CASS 7A.2.4R (1).

    (2) If a primary pooling event occurs before client money is transferred from
    a client bank

    account maintained for a sub-pool to a client bank account maintained for the
    general pool

    or another sub-pool in accordance with CASS 7.19.13 R (5), the amount in question
    will not

    form part of the general pool or that other sub-pool, including for the purposes
    of CASS

    7A.2.4R (1), but will remain part of the original sub-pool.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.19.16 R A client for whom a firm receives or holds client money for a sub-pool
    has no claim to or interest

    in client money received or held for the general pool or any other sub-pool unless:

    (1) that client is a beneficiary of that other sub-pool; or

    (2) the firm receives or holds client money for that client for other business
    which does not

    relate to any sub-pool (and thus the client is a beneficiary of the firm''s general
    pool).

    CASS 7.19.17 R A client for whom a firm receives or holds client money in more
    than one pool as described in

    CASS 7.19.16 R (1) and/or CASS 7.19.16 R (2) has an interest in a distribution
    from each such

    pool, and each interest is separate and distinct.

    CASS 7.19.18 R Material changes to sub-pools

    Before making a material change to a sub-pool, a firm must:

    (1) notify the then current beneficiaries of that sub-pool in writing, not less
    than two months

    before the date on which the firm intends the change to take effect; and

    (2) include in the notification an explanation of the consequences for the beneficiaries
    of the

    proposed change and the options available to them, such as the option of a beneficiary
    of

    the affected sub-pool to cease to be a beneficiary of that sub-pool and to become
    a

    beneficiary of the firm''s general pool or, if applicable, another sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.19 G A firm should keep in mind its obligations under CASS 7.19.11 R
    (1)(b) (before receiving or

    holding client money for a client in a sub-pool, a firm must obtain a signed copy
    of the sub-pool

    disclosure document from the client) when making a material change to a sub-pool.
    A firm is

    also reminded of the conditions under CASS 7.19.13 R (5)(b) (when a client of
    the firm who is a

    beneficiary of a sub-pool ceases to be a beneficiary of that sub-pool) if a material
    change

    proposed to a sub-pool results in a client ceasing to be a beneficiary of that
    sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.20 G The FCA would normally consider the dissolution of a sub-pool,
    such that the firm no longer

    operates the sub-pool or no longer uses the relevant net margined omnibus client
    account or

    transfers the business to another authorised central counterparty, to be examples
    of material

    changes to a sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.21 R Before materially changing a sub-pool, a firm must provide a copy
    of the notice provided to

    clients under CASS 7.19.18 R R to the FCA not less than two months before the
    date on which

    the firm intends the change to take place.

    CASS 7.19.22 R Notifications

    A firm that wishes to establish a sub-pool of client money must notify the FCA
    in writing not less

    than two months before the date on which the firm intends to receive or hold client
    money for

    that sub-pool.

    CASS 7.19.23 R Upon request, a firm must deliver to the FCA a copy of the sub-pool
    disclosure document for

    any sub-pool established by the firm.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.19.24 R A firm must inform the FCA in writing, without delay, if it has
    not complied, or is unable to

    comply with the requirements in CASS 7.19.11 R or the requirements in CASS 7.19.18
    R.

    CASS 7.19.25 R Record-keeping

    The records maintained under this section, including the sub-pool disclosure documents,
    are a

    record of the firm that must be kept in a durable medium for at least five years
    following the

    date on which client money was last held by the firm for a sub-pool to which those
    records or

    the sub-pool disclosure document applied.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7 Annex 2 Client bank account acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 2 [letterhead of firm subject to CASS 7.18.2 R , including full name
    and address of firm]

    R [name and address of bank]

    [date]

    Client Money Acknowledgment Letter (pursuant to the rules of the Financial Conduct

    Authority)

    We refer to the following [current/deposit account[s]] [and/or] [money market
    deposit[s]] which

    [name of CASS firm], regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (Firm Reference
    Number

    [FRN]), ("us", "we" or "our") [has opened or will open] [and/or] [has deposited
    or will deposit]

    with [name of bank] ("you" or "your"):

    [insert the account title[s], the account unique identifier[s] (for example, as
    relevant, sort code

    and account number, deposit number or reference code) and (if applicable) any
    abbreviated

    name of the account[s] as reflected in the bank''s systems]

    ([collectively,] the "Client Bank Account[s]").

    In relation to [each of] the Client Bank Account[s] identified above you acknowledge
    that we

    have notified you that:

    (a) we are under an obligation to keep money we hold belonging to our clients
    separate

    from our own money;

    (b) we have opened, or will open, the Client Bank Account for the purpose of depositing

    money with you on behalf of our clients; and

    (c) we hold all money standing to the credit of the Client Bank Account in our
    capacity as

    trustee under the laws applicable to us.

    In relation to [each of] the Client Bank Account[s] above you agree that:

    (d) you do not have any recourse or right against money in the Client Bank Account
    in

    respect of any sum owed to you, or owed to any third party, on any other account
    (including

    any account we use for our own money), and this means for example that you do
    not have

    any right to combine the Client Bank Account with any other account and any right
    of set-off

    or counterclaim against money in the Client Bank Account;

    (e) you will title, or have titled, the Client Bank Account as stated above and
    that such title is

    different to the title of any other account containing money that belongs to us
    or to any third

    party; and

    (f) you are required to release on demand all money standing to the credit of
    the Client Bank

    Account upon proper notice and instruction from us or a liquidator, receiver,
    administrator,

    or trustee (or similar person) appointed for us in bankruptcy (or similar procedure),
    in any

    relevant jurisdiction, except for:

    1.

    (1) any properly incurred charges or liabilities owed to you on, and arising from
    the

    operation of, the Client Bank Account; and

    (2) until the fixed term expires, any amounts held for the time being under a
    fixed term

    deposit arrangement which cannot be terminated before the expiry of the fixed
    term,

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    provided that you have a contractual right to retain such money under (1) or (2)
    and that this

    right is notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (c) above and without breach of your
    agreement to

    paragraph (d) above.

    We acknowledge that:

    (g) you are not responsible for ensuring compliance by us with our own obligations,

    including as trustee, in respect of the Client Bank Account[s].

    You and we agree that:

    (h) the terms of this letter shall remain binding upon the parties, their successors
    and

    assigns, and, for the avoidance of doubt, regardless of any change in name of
    any party;

    (i) this letter supersedes and replaces any previous agreement between the parties
    in

    connection with the Client Bank Account[s], to the extent that such previous agreement
    is

    inconsistent with this letter;

    (j) in the event of any conflict between this letter and any other agreement between
    the

    parties in connection with the Client Bank Account[s], this letter agreement shall
    prevail;

    (k) no variation to the terms of this letter shall be effective unless it is in
    writing, signed by

    the parties and permitted under the rules of the Financial Conduct Authority;

    (l) this letter shall be governed by the laws of [insert appropriate jurisdiction]
    [firms may

    optionally use this space to insert additional wording to record an intention
    to exclude any

    rules of private international law that could lead to the application of the substantive
    law of

    another jurisdiction]; and

    (m) the courts of [insert same jurisdiction as previous] shall have non-exclusive
    jurisdiction

    to settle any dispute or claim arising out of or in connection with this letter
    or its subject

    matter or formation (including non-contractual disputes or claims).

    Please sign and return the enclosed copy of this letter as soon as possible. We
    remind you

    that, pursuant to the rules of the Financial Conduct Authority, we are not allowed
    to use the

    Client Bank Account[s] to deposit any money belonging to our clients with you
    until you have

    acknowledged and agreed to the terms of this letter.

    For and on behalf of [name of CASS firm]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    [Signed by [name of third party administrator] on behalf of [CASS firm]]

    Print Name:

    Title:

    ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED:

    For and on behalf of [name of bank]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    Contact Information: [insert signatory''s phone number and email address]

    Date:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7 Annex 3 Client transaction account acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 3 [letterhead of firm subject to CASS 7.18.3 R , including full name
    and address of firm]

    R [name and address of counterparty]

    [date]

    Client Money Acknowledgment Letter (pursuant to the rules of the Financial Conduct

    Authority)

    We refer to the following transaction account[s] which [name of CASS firm], regulated
    by the

    Financial Conduct Authority (Firm Reference Number [FRN]), ("us", "we" or "our")
    has opened

    or will open with [name of counterparty] ("you" or "your"):

    [insert the account title[s], the account unique identifier[s] (for example, as
    relevant, account

    number, reference code or pool ID) and (if applicable) any abbreviated name of
    the account[s]

    as reflected in the counterparty''s systems]

    ([collectively,] the "Client Transaction Account[s]").

    In relation to [each of] the Client Transaction Account[s] identified above you
    acknowledge that

    we have notified you that:

    (a) we are under an obligation to keep money we hold belonging to our clients
    separate

    from our own money;

    (b) we have opened, or will open, the Client Transaction Account for the purpose
    of placing

    money with you on behalf of our clients in connection with carrying out one or
    more

    transactions with or through you; and

    (c) you are instructed to promptly credit to this Client Transaction Account any
    money you

    receive in respect of any transaction that we have notified to you as being carried
    out on

    behalf of our clients.

    In relation to [each of] the Client Transaction Account[s] identified above you
    agree that:

    (d) all money standing to the credit of the Client Transaction Account is payable
    to us in our

    capacity as trustee under the laws applicable to us[, except where, in accordance
    with your

    default management procedures in respect of a default by us, you transfer money
    credited

    to the Client Transaction Account to anyone other than us in accordance with the
    “EMIR

    Indirect Clearing Default Management Obligations” (as defined at the time of such
    default in

    the Financial Conduct Authority’s Handbook of Rules and Guidance)] [and/or] [
    the “MiFIR

    Indirect Clearing Default Management Obligations” (as defined at the time of such
    default in

    the Financial Conduct Authority’s Handbook of Rules and Guidance)]];

    (e) you do not have any recourse or right against money credited to the Client
    Transaction

    Account in respect of any sum owed to you, or owed to any third party, on any
    other account

    (including any account we use for our own money), and this means for example that
    you do

    not have any right to combine the Client Transaction Account with any other account
    and

    any right of set-off or counterclaim against money in the Client Transaction Account;
    and

    (f) you will title, or have titled, the Client Transaction Account as stated above
    and that such

    title is different to the title of any other account containing money that is
    payable to us in a

    capacity other than as trustee or that is payable to any third party.

    You and we agree that:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (g) the terms of this letter shall remain binding upon the parties, their successors
    and

    assigns, and, for the avoidance of doubt, regardless of any change in name of
    any party;

    (h) this letter supersedes and replaces any previous agreement between the parties
    in

    connection with the Client Transaction Account[s], to the extent that such previous

    agreement is inconsistent with this letter;

    (i) in the event of any conflict between this letter and any other agreement between
    the

    parties in connection with the Client Transaction Account[s], this letter agreement
    shall

    prevail;

    (j) no variation to the terms of this letter shall be effective unless it is in
    writing, signed by the

    parties and permitted under the rules of the Financial Conduct Authority;

    (k) this letter shall be governed by the laws of [insert appropriate jurisdiction]
    [firms may

    optionally use this space to insert additional wording to record an intention
    to exclude any

    rules of private international law that could lead to the application of the substantive
    law of

    another jurisdiction]; and

    (l) the courts of [insert same jurisdiction as previous] shall have non-exclusive
    jurisdiction to

    settle any dispute or claim arising out of or in connection with this letter or
    its subject matter

    or formation (including non-contractual disputes or claims).

    Please sign and return the enclosed copy of this letter as soon as possible. We
    remind you

    that, pursuant to the rules of the Financial Conduct Authority, we are not allowed
    to permit you

    to hold any money belonging to our clients on the Client Transaction Account[s]
    until you have

    acknowledged and agreed to the terms of this letter.

    For and on behalf of [name of CASS firm]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED:

    For and on behalf of [name of counterparty]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    Contact Information: [insert signatory''s phone number and email address]

    Date:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7 Annex 4 Authorised central counterparty acknowledgment letter
    template

    CASS 7 Annex 4 [letterhead of firm subject to CASS 7.18.4 R , including full name
    and address of authorised

    R central counterparty]

    [name and address of counterparty]

    [date]

    Client Money Acknowledgment Letter (pursuant to the rules of the Financial Conduct

    Authority)

    We refer to the following transaction account[s] which [name of CASS firm], regulated
    by the

    Financial Conduct Authority (Firm Reference Number [FRN]), ("us", "we" or "our")
    has opened

    or will open with [name of authorised Central counterparty] ("you" or "your"):

    [insert the account title[s], the account unique identifier[s] (for example, as
    relevant, account

    number, reference code or pool ID) and (if applicable) any abbreviated name of
    the account[s]

    as reflected in the authorised central counterparty''s systems]

    ([collectively,] the "Client Transaction Account[s]").

    In relation to [each of] the Client Transaction Account[s] identified above we
    are writing to put

    you on notice that:

    (a) we are under an obligation to keep money we hold belonging to our clients
    separate

    from our own money;

    (b) we have opened, or will open, the Client Transaction Account for the purpose
    of placing

    money with you on behalf of our clients in connection with carrying out one or
    more

    transactions with or through you;

    (c) you are instructed to promptly credit to this Client Transaction Account any
    money you

    receive in respect of any transaction that we have notified to you as being carried
    out on

    behalf of our clients;

    (d) all money standing to the credit of the Client Transaction Account is payable
    to us in our

    capacity as trustee under the laws applicable to us, except where, as a part of
    your default

    management process in respect of a default by us, you transfer money credited
    to the Client

    Transaction Account to anyone other than us in accordance with article 48 of Regulation

    (EU) No 648/2012 of 4 July 2012;

    (e) you do not have any recourse or right against money credited to the Client
    Transaction

    Account in respect of any sum owed to you, or owed to any third party, on any
    other account

    (including any account we use for our own money), and this means for example that
    you do

    not have any right to combine the Client Transaction Account with any other account
    and

    any right of set-off or counterclaim against money in the Client Transaction Account;
    and

    (f) we understand the title of the Client Transaction Account is, or will be,
    as stated above

    and that such title is different to the title of any other account containing
    money that is

    payable to us in a capacity other than as trustee or is payable to any third party.

    [Please confirm your receipt of this letter by signing and returning the enclosed
    copy of this

    letter as soon as possible.]

    For and on behalf of [name of CASS firm]

    x___________________________

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    [RECEIPT CONFIRMED:

    For and on behalf of [name of counterparty]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    Contact Information: [insert signatory''s phone number and email address]

    Date:]

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7 Annex 5 Guidance notes for acknowledgement letters (CASS 7.18)

    CASS 7 Annex 5 Introduction

    G 1 This annex contains guidance on the use of the templates for acknowledgement
    letters in

    CASS 7 Annex 2, CASS 7 Annex 3 and CASS 7 Annex 4.

    2 Unless stated otherwise, a reference to ''counterparty'' in this annex is:

    1.

    (a) in the context of a client bank account acknowledgement letter (and CASS 7
    Annex

    2), to the relevant bank;

    (b) in the context of a client transaction account acknowledgement letter (and
    CASS 7

    Annex 3), to the relevant exchange, clearing house, intermediate broker, OTC

    counterparty or other person (as the case may be); and

    (c) in the context of an authorised central counterparty acknowledgement letter
    (and

    CASS 7 Annex 4), to the relevant authorised central counterparty.

    General

    1. 3 Under CASS 7.18.2 R (2) and CASS 7.18.3 R (3), firms are required to have
    in place a

    duly signed and countersigned acknowledgment letter for a client bank account
    or client

    transaction account (respectively) before they are allowed to hold or receive
    client money in

    or into the client bank account, or allow the relevant person to hold any client
    money on the

    client transaction account (respectively).

    2. 4 However, a firm may place client money at an authorised central counterparty
    in

    connection with a regulated clearing arrangement if it has provided the relevant
    authorised

    central counterparty with a signed and completed authorised central counterparty

    acknowledgement letter (see CASS 7.8.3 R).

    3. 5 For each client bank account or client transaction account, a firm is required
    to

    complete, sign and send to the counterparty an acknowledgment letter identifying
    that

    account and in the form set out in CASS 7 Annex 2 (Client bank account acknowledgment

    letter template), CASS 7 Annex 3 (Client transaction account acknowledgment letter

    template) or CASS 7 Annex 4 (Authorised central counterparty acknowledgment letter),
    as

    appropriate.

    4. 6 When completing an acknowledgment letter using the appropriate template,
    a firm is

    reminded that it must not amend any of the text which is not in square brackets

    (acknowledgment letter fixed text). A firm should also not amend the non-italicised
    text that

    is in square brackets. It may remove or include square bracketed text from the
    letter, or

    replace bracketed and italicised text with the necessary wording, in either case
    as

    appropriate. The notes below give further guidance on this.

    Clear identification of relevant accounts

    7 A firm is reminded that for each client bank account or client transaction account
    it needs

    to have in place an acknowledgement letter. Accordingly, it is important that
    it is clear to

    which account or accounts each acknowledgement letter relates. As a result, the
    templates

    in CASS 7 Annex 2, CASS 7 Annex 3 and CASS 7 Annex 4 require that the

    acknowledgement letter include the full title and at least one unique identifier,
    such as a sort

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    code and account number, deposit number, reference code or pool ID, for each client
    bank

    account or client transaction account to which the letter relates.

    8 The title and unique identifiers included in an acknowledgement letter for a
    client bank

    account or client transaction account should be the same as those reflected in
    both the

    records of the firm and the relevant counterparty, as appropriate, for that account.
    Where a

    counterparty''s systems are not able to reflect the full title of an account,
    that title may be

    abbreviated to accommodate that system, provided that:

    1.

    (a) the account may continue to be appropriately identified in accordance with
    the

    requirements of CASS 7 (eg, ''designated'' may be shortened to ''des'', ''designated
    fund''

    may be shortened to ''des fnd'', ''segregated'' may be shortened to ''seg'', ''account''
    may be

    shortened to ''acct'', etc); and

    (b) when completing an acknowledgement letter, such letter must include both the
    long

    and short versions of the account title.

    9 A firm should ensure that all relevant account information is contained in the
    space

    provided in the body of the acknowledgement letter. Nothing should be appended
    to an

    acknowledgement letter.

    10 In the space provided in the template letters for setting out the account title
    and unique

    identifiers for each relevant account/deposit, a firm may include the required
    information in

    the format of the following table:

    Full account title Unique identifier Title reflected in [name of

    bank] systems

    [Investment Firm Client [00-00-00 12345678] [INV FIRM CLIENT A/C]

    Bank Account]

    11 Where an acknowledgement letter is intended to cover a range of client bank
    accounts or

    client transaction accounts, some of which may not exist as at the date the

    acknowledgement letter is countersigned by the relevant person (or, in the case
    of an

    authorised central counterparty acknowledgement letter, the date it is sent by
    the firm to the

    relevant authorised central counterparty), a firm should set out in the space
    provided in the

    body of the acknowledgement letter that it is intended to apply to all present
    and future

    accounts which: (a) are titled in a specified way (eg, with the word ''client''
    in their title); and

    (b) which possess a common unique identifier or which may be clearly identified
    by a range

    of unique identifiers (eg, all accounts numbered between XXXX1111 and ZZZZ9999).
    For

    example, in the space provided in the template letter in CASS 7 Annex 2 which
    allows a firm

    to include the account title and a unique identifier for each relevant account,
    a firm should

    include a statement to the following effect:

    1.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Any account open at present or to be opened in the future which contains the term

    [''client''][insert appropriate abbreviation of the term ''client'' as agreed
    and to be

    reflected in the Bank''s systems] in its title and which may be identified with
    [the

    following [insert common unique identifier]][an account number from and

    including [XXXX1111] to and including [ZZZZ9999]][clearly identify range of

    unique identifiers].

    Signature and countersignatures

    1. 12 A firm should ensure that each acknowledgement letter is signed and countersigned

    by all relevant parties and individuals (including where a firm or its counterparty
    may require

    more than one signatory).

    2. 13 An acknowledgement letter that is signed or countersigned electronically
    should not,

    for that reason alone, result in a breach of the rules in CASS 7.19 . However,
    where

    electronic signatures are used, a firm should consider whether, under CASS 7.13.8
    R and

    taking into account the governing law and choice of competent jurisdiction, it
    needs to

    ensure that the electronic signature and the certification by any person of such
    signature

    would be admissible as evidence in any legal proceedings in the relevant jurisdiction
    in

    relation to any question as to the authenticity or integrity of the letter.

    Completing an acknowledgment letter

    14 A firm should use at least the same level of care and diligence when completing
    an

    acknowledgement letter as it would in managing its own commercial agreements.

    15 A firm should ensure that each acknowledgement letter is legible (eg, any handwritten

    details should be easy to read), produced on the firm''s own letter-headed paper,
    dated and

    addressed to the correct legal entity (eg, where the counterparty belongs to a
    group of

    companies).

    16 A firm should also ensure each acknowledgement letter includes all the required

    information (such as account names and numbers, the parties'' full names, addresses
    and

    contact information, and each signatory''s printed name and title).

    17 A firm should similarly ensure that no square brackets remain in the text of
    each

    acknowledgement letter (ie, after having removed or included square bracketed
    text, as

    appropriate, or having replaced square bracketed and italicised text with the
    required

    information as indicated in the templates in CASS 7 Annex 2, CASS 7 Annex 3 and
    CASS 7

    Annex 4) and that each page of the acknowledgement letter is numbered.

    18 A firm should complete an acknowledgement letter so that no part of the letter
    can be

    easily altered (eg, the letter should be signed in ink rather than pencil).

    19 In respect of a client bank account acknowledgement letter''s governing law
    and choice of

    competent jurisdiction (see paragraphs (l) and (m) of the template in CASS 7 Annex
    2R) or

    a client transaction account acknowledgement letter''s governing law and choice
    of

    competent jurisdiction (see paragraphs (k) and (l) of the template in CASS 7 Annex
    3 R), the

    letter should reflect a firm''s agreement with its counterparty that the laws
    of a particular

    jurisdiction will govern the acknowledgement letter and that the courts of that
    same

    jurisdiction will have non-exclusive jurisdiction to settle any disputes arising
    out of, or in

    connection with, the acknowledgement letter, its subject matter or formation.

    20 If a firm does not, in any client bank account acknowledgement letter or client
    transaction

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    account acknowledgement letter, utilise the governing law and choice of competent

    jurisdiction that is the same as either or both:

    1.

    (a) the law and the jurisdiction under which either the firm or the relevant counterparty

    are organised; and

    (b) that specified in the underlying agreement/s (eg, banking, custody or clearing

    services agreement) with the relevant counterparty;

    then the firm should consider whether it is at risk of breaching either CASS 7.18.6
    R (3) or,

    in the case of a client bank account acknowledgement letter, CASS 7.13.8 R .

    21 The FCA recognises that some firms and their counterparties may wish to clarify
    through

    additional words in the governing law provision (see paragraph (l) of the template
    in CASS 7

    Annex 2 and paragraph (k) of the template in CASS 7 Annex 3) that they are agreeing
    that

    the substantive law of the governing jurisdiction shall apply and that their intention
    is that a

    court should not decide to apply the substantive provisions of some other law
    instead of the

    parties'' chosen governing law (a ''renvoi''). Where this is the case firms are
    permitted to

    insert additional text that seeks to provide increased legal certainty in the
    space provided.

    There is no restriction as to what additional words may be used (eg, additional
    words such

    as "without regard to the principles of choice of law" may be appropriate in the

    circumstances), but a firm should at all times have regard to the need to comply
    with CASS

    7.18.6 R (3) . However, for the majority of firms the FCA does not expect additional
    wording

    for the governing law provision to be necessary. This is likely to be the case
    where only a

    court that is subject to ''Rome I'' (Regulation (EC) No 593/2008 of the European
    Parliament

    and of the Council of 17 June 2008) is likely to accept jurisdiction over a dispute
    arising out

    of or in connection with the relevant acknowledgement letter.

    Authorised signatories

    1. 22 A firm is required, under CASS 7.18.9 R , to use reasonable endeavours to
    ensure

    that any individual that has countersigned an acknowledgement letter returned
    to the firm

    was authorised to countersign the letter on behalf of the relevant counterparty.

    2. 23 If an individual that has countersigned an acknowledgement letter does not
    provide

    the firm with sufficient evidence of his/her authority to do so then the firm
    is expected to

    make appropriate enquires to satisfy itself of that individual''s authority.

    3. 24 Evidence of an individual''s authority to countersign an acknowledgement
    letter may

    include a copy of the counterparty''s list of authorised signatories, a duly executed
    power of

    attorney, use of a company seal or bank stamp, and/or material verifying the title
    or position

    of the individual countersigning the acknowledgement letter.

    4. 25 A firm should ensure it obtains at least the same level of assurance over
    the authority

    of an individual to countersign the acknowledgement letter as the firm would seek
    when

    managing its own commercial arrangements.

    Third party administrators

    1. 26 If a firm uses a third party administrator (''TPA'') to carry out the administrative
    tasks of

    drafting, sending and processing a client bank account acknowledgement letter,
    the text

    "[Signed by [Name of Third Party Administrator] on behalf of [CASS Firm]]" should
    be

    inserted to confirm that the acknowledgement letter was signed by the TPA on behalf
    of the

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    firm.

    2. 27 In these circumstances, the firm should first provide the TPA with the requisite

    authority (such as a power of attorney) before the TPA will be able to sign the
    client bank

    account acknowledgement letter on the firm''s behalf. A firm should also ensure
    that the

    acknowledgement letter continues to be drafted on letter-headed paper belonging
    to the

    firm.

    Designated client bank accounts and designated client fund accounts

    1. 28 A firm must ensure that each of its client bank accounts follows the naming

    conventions prescribed in the Glossary. This includes ensuring that (i) all client
    bank

    accounts include the term ''client'' in their title; and (ii) all designated client
    bank accounts or

    designated client fund accounts include, as appropriate, the terms ''designated''
    or

    ''designated fund'' in their title, or in each case an appropriate abbreviation
    in circumstances

    where this is permitted by the Glossary definition.

    2. 29 All references to the term "Client Bank Account[s]" in a client bank account

    acknowledgement letter should also be made consistently in either the singular
    or plural, as

    appropriate.

    Indirect clearing arrangements

    1. 30 For use with client transaction accounts maintained with a clearing member
    who

    facilitates indirect clearing through a regulated clearing arrangement, the square-bracketed

    text in paragraph (d) of the template letter in CASS 7 Annex 3 should remain in
    the letter,

    and, depending on the instruments being indirectly cleared using those client
    transaction

    accounts, should include the reference to either or both the EMIR indirect clearing
    default

    management obligations and the MiFIR indirect clearing default management obligations.

    2. 31 All references to the term "Client Transaction Account[s]" in a client transaction

    account acknowledgement letter should be made consistently in either the singular
    or plural,

    as appropriate.

    Direct clearing arrangements

    1. 32 For use with client transaction accounts maintained with an authorised central

    counterparty in respect of a regulated clearing arrangement, a firm may identify
    whether

    each account is an omnibus client account or an individual client account in the
    space

    provided in the body of the template letter in CASS 7 Annex 4. For example, if
    using the

    table mentioned in paragraph 10 above, a firm may include an additional column
    in which

    for each account it includes the reference "Individual Client Account" or "Omnibus
    Client

    Account", as appropriate.

    2. 33 All references to the term "Client Transaction Account[s]" in an authorised
    central

    counterparty acknowledgement letter should be made consistently in either the
    singular or

    plural, as appropriate.

    Money market deposits

    1. 34 The client bank account acknowledgement letter in CASS 7 Annex 2 may be
    used with

    money market deposits identified as being client money.

    2. 35 A firm should ensure that client money placed in a money market deposit
    is clearly

    identified as client money (see CASS 7.13.15 G ).

    3. 36 Before a firm places client money in a money market deposit, it must have
    a client

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    bank account acknowledgement letter for that deposit. If the unique identifier
    which will be

    associated with a money market deposit consisting of client money is unable to
    be included

    in a client bank account acknowledgement letter before it is duly countersigned
    and returned

    to the firm, a firm should set out in the body of the letter: (a) the title and
    other account

    information for the client bank account from which the deposits will be placed
    with the bank;

    and (b) how the firm will notify the bank that a money market deposit placed with
    it consists

    of client money (eg, by the inclusion of the words ''Client Money Deposit'').
    For example, in

    the space provided in the template letter in CASS 7 Annex 2 which allows a firm
    to include

    the account title and a unique identifier for each relevant account/deposit, a
    firm should

    include a statement to the following effect:

    1.

    [[CASS Firm] money market deposits placed from [title of relevant [client bank

    account], [sort code], [account number]] and identified with the reference ''[Client

    Money Deposit]'' as being client money)]

    4. 37 A firm which operates the alternative approach to client money segregation
    (see

    CASS 7.13.62 R ) might not make deposits of client money in a money market deposit
    from

    another client bank account. In these circumstances, the firm need only include
    in the body

    of the letter how the firm will notify the bank that a money market deposit placed
    with it

    consists of client money. For example, the relevant space in the template letter
    in CASS 7

    Annex 2 may set out that:

    1.

    [[CASS firm] money market deposits identified with the reference ''[Client Money

    Deposit]'' as being client money]

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7 Annex 6 Sub-pool disclosure document

    CASS 7 Annex 6 [letterhead of firm, including full name and address of firm, firm
    reference number]

    G [addressee - client participating in specified sub-pool]

    [date]

    Sub-pool disclosure document (under the rules of the Financial Conduct Authority)

    1. 1. The sub-pool to which this sub-pool disclosure document relates is designated
    in the

    firm''s records as:

    1. [insert name of sub-pool in firm''s records]

    2. (for the purposes of this document, the "sub-pool")

    2. 2. The net margined omnibus client account relating to the sub-pool is held
    at [insert

    name of authorised CCP] and is designated as:

    1.

    [insert the account title, the account unique identifier and (if applicable) any
    abbreviated

    name of the account as reflected in the authorised CCP''s systems]

    2. (for the purposes of this document, the "omnibus client account").

    3. 3. The purpose of this letter is to:

    (a) provide you with information relating to the sub-pool [operated or to be operated]
    by

    [insert name of CASS firm] in relation to the omnibus client account held by the
    firm at

    [insert name of authorised CCP];

    (b) obtain your consent to holding your money in the sub-pool; and

    (c) confirm your direction that upon the failure of [insert name of CASS firm],
    we are to

    use any client money held by the firm in the sub-pool to facilitate porting.

    4. 4. [name of CASS firm] will hold any client money that we receive from you
    in relation to

    the cleared transactions that we maintain for you in the omnibus client account
    in client bank

    accounts that we open in relation to the sub-pool, or we will allow the CCP to
    hold this client

    money in the omnibus client account.

    5. 5. In the event of the failure of the [insert name of CASS firm], you hereby
    direct the

    [insert name of CASS firm] to use any client money held by the [insert name of
    CASS firm]

    in the sub-pool to facilitate the porting of the positions recorded in the omnibus
    client

    account.

    6. 6. In the event of the failure of [insert name of CASS firm], if porting is
    not effected, or if

    porting is effected but any money in the sub-pool is not used to facilitate porting,
    you and

    the other beneficiaries of the sub-pool will be entitled to a distribution from
    any client money

    held in respect of this sub-pool, in accordance with the client money distribution
    rules in

    CASS 7A. Save to the extent that [insert name of CASS firm] holds any other client
    money

    for you in the context of any other business or sub-pool, you will not be entitled
    to a

    distribution of any other client money held by [insert name of CASS firm].

    7. 7. You hereby consent to the firm receiving and holding your money as client
    money as

    part of [sub-pool specified above or specify name of sub-pool]. Until you sign
    and return this

    letter the firm will not hold money for you in the sub-pool and you will not be
    a beneficiary of

    the sub-pool.

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    8. 8. This letter shall be governed by the laws of [England and Wales/Scotland/Northern

    Ireland /insert appropriate jurisdiction].

    If you are in agreement with the foregoing terms, please sign and return the enclosed
    copy of

    this letter as soon as possible. You should retain a copy of this letter for your
    records.

    [insert name of CASS firm]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED:

    [insert name of client]

    x___________________________

    Authorised Signatory

    Print Name:

    Title:

    Contact Information: [insert signatory''s phone number and email address]

    Date:

    CASS 7 Client money rules www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer

    CASS 7.10 Application and purpose

    CASS 7.11 Treatment of client money

    CASS 7.12 Organisational requirements: client money

    CASS 7.13 Segregation of client money

    CASS 7.14 Client money held by a third party

    CASS 7.15 Records, accounts and reconciliations

    CASS 7.16 The standard methods of internal client money reconciliation

    CASS 7.17 Statutory trust

    CASS 7.18 Acknowledgment letters

    CASS 7.19 Clearing member client money sub-pools

    CASS 7 Annex 2 Client bank account acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 3 Client transaction account acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 4 Authorised central counterparty acknowledgment letter template

    CASS 7 Annex 5 Guidance notes for acknowledgement letters (CASS 7.18)

    CASS 7 Annex 6 Sub-pool disclosure document

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and

    transfer

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7A.1 Application and purpose

    CASS 7A.1.1 R Application

    Subject to CASS 7A.1.1A R, this chapter (the client money distribution and transfer
    rules)

    applies to a firm that holds client money which is subject to the client money
    rules when a

    pooling event occurs.

    CASS 7A.1.1A R The client money distribution and transfer rules do not apply to
    any client money held by a

    trustee firm under CASS 7.10.34R to CASS 7.10.40G.

    CASS 7A.1.1B G As a result of CASS 7A.1.1A R, the client money distribution and
    transfer rules relating to

    primary pooling events and secondary pooling events will not affect any client
    money held by a

    firm in its capacity as trustee firm. Instead, the treatment of that client money
    will be determined

    by the terms of the relevant instrument of trust or by applicable law. However,
    the client money

    distribution and transfer rules do apply to a firm for any client money that it
    holds other than in

    that capacity which is subject to the client money rules.

    CASS 7A.1.2 G Purpose

    The client money distribution and transfer rules set out the required treatment
    of client money

    on the occurrence of a pooling event so that where:

    (1) for example, a firm fails (but also in other situations where a primary pooling
    event

    occurs), the rules in CASS 7A.2 (Primary pooling events) facilitate the return
    or transfer of

    client money; and

    (2) a person at which the firm holds client money fails, the rules in CASS 7A.3
    (Secondary

    pooling events) allocate any loss of client money among certain of the firm’s
    clients.

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7A.2 Primary pooling events

    CASS 7A.2.2 R Failure of the authorised firm: primary pooling event

    A primary pooling event occurs:

    (1) on the failure of the firm;

    (2) on the vesting of assets in a trustee in accordance with an ''assets requirement''
    imposed

    under section 55P(1)(b) or (c) (as the case may be) of the Act;

    (3) on the coming into force of a requirement or requirements which, either separately
    or in

    combination:

    (a) is or are for all client money held by the firm; and

    (b) require the firm to take steps to cease holding all client money; or

    (4) when the firm notifies the FCA, in accordance with CASS 7.15.33 R (Notification

    requirements), that it is unable correctly to identify and allocate in its records
    all valid claims

    arising as a result of a secondary pooling event.

    CASS 7A.2.3 R CASS 7A.2.2R (4) does not apply so long as:

    (1) the firm is taking steps, in consultation with the FCA, to establish those
    records; and

    (2) there are reasonable grounds to conclude that the records will be capable
    of rectification

    within a reasonable period.

    CASS 7A.2.3A R If a primary pooling event occurs in circumstances where the firm
    had, before the primary

    pooling event, reduced its margined transaction requirement by utilising approved
    collateral

    under CASS 7.16.33 R , it must immediately liquidate this approved collateral
    and place the

    proceeds in a client bank account that relates to the relevant notional pool under
    CASS

    7A.2.4R(1) (Pooling and distribution or transfer)

    CASS 7A.2.3B R CASS 7A.2.7-AR (Client money received after the failure of the
    firm) does not apply to the

    proceeds under CASS 7A.2.3A R.

    CASS 7A.2.3C G The proceeds of the assets realised under CASS 7A.2.3A R:

    (1) will form part of the relevant notional pool of client money (see CASS 7A.2.4R(1A)(a)(i)

    (Pooling and distribution or transfer); and

    (2) must be distributed or transferred on behalf of clients in accordance with
    this chapter.

    CASS 7A.2.3D G Client money reconciliations after a primary pooling event

    (1) If a special administrator has been appointed to the firm under the IBSA Regulations

    then they will be required to carry out a reconciliation under regulation 10H
    of the IBSA

    Regulations.

    (2) Notwithstanding regulation 10H of the IBSA Regulations, CASS 7.15 has application
    to a

    firm after a primary pooling event, meaning, for example, that ongoing compliant
    recordkeeping is required (see CASS 7.15.15R(4) (Internal client money reconciliations)
    and

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.15.26AR (Frequency of external reconciliations after a primary pooling
    event)).

    CASS 7A.2.4 R Pooling and distribution or transfer

    If a primary pooling event occurs, then:

    (1)

    (a) in respect of a sub-pool, the following is treated as a single notional pool
    of client

    money for the beneficiaries of that pool:

    (i) any client money held in a client bank account of the firm relating to that
    sub-pool;

    and

    (ii) any client money held in a client transaction account of the firm relating
    to that

    sub-pool, except for client money held in a client transaction account at an authorised

    central counterparty or a clearing member which is, in either case, held as part
    of a

    regulated clearing arrangement;

    (b) in respect of the general pool, the following is treated as a single notional
    pool of

    client money for the beneficiaries of the general pool:

    (i) any client money held in any client bank account of the firm;

    (ii) any client money held in a client transaction account of the firm, except
    for client

    money held in a client transaction account at an authorised central counterparty,
    or a

    clearing member which is, in either case, held as part of a regulated clearing

    arrangement; and

    (iii) any client money identifiable in any other account held by the firm into
    which

    client money has been received;

    except, in each case, for client money relating to a sub-pool which falls under
    subparagraphs (1)(a)(i) or (ii); and

    (1A)

    (a) a notional pool under paragraph (1) shall also include any client money that
    is:

    (i) transferred by the firm under regulation 10H(3) of the IBSA Regulations to
    a client

    bank account that is included in that pool under paragraph (1);

    (ii) paid under CASS 7A.2.3AR into a client bank account that is included in that
    pool

    under paragraph (1);

    (iii) paid under CASS 7A.2.4R(3)(b) or CASS 7A.2.4R(3)(d) into a client bank account

    or client transaction account that is included in that pool under paragraph (1);

    (iv) (subject to sub-paragraph (b)) otherwise received after the primary pooling
    event

    into a client transaction account that is included in that pool under paragraph
    (1)

    where the receipt is in relation to a margined transaction that the firm had entered

    into through the use of that client transaction account and which had not closed
    out

    before primary pooling event; and

    (v) paid under CASS 7.15.29R(1) (Reconciliation discrepancies) after the primary

    pooling event into a client bank account that is included in that pool under paragraph

    (1); and

    (b) the firm must not transfer any client money in a notional pool under sub-paragraphs

    (1)(a) or (b) to a client transaction account except where necessary to comply
    with subCASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk
    September 2025

    CASS

    paragraph (2)(b);

    (c) a notional pool under paragraph (1) shall cease to include client money from
    the point

    at which it is:

    (i) transferred by the firm under regulation 10H(4) of the IBSA Regulations from
    a

    client bank account that is included in that pool under paragraph (1); or

    (ii) paid out after the primary pooling event from a client transaction account
    that is

    included in that pool under paragraph (1) where the payment is in relation to
    a

    margined transaction that the firm had entered into through the use of that client

    transaction account and which had not closed out before primary pooling event.

    (2) the firm must, as soon as reasonably practicable:

    (a) (subject to paragraphs (4) and (5)) distribute client money comprising a notional
    pool

    in accordance with CASS 7.17.2 R , so that each client who is a beneficiary of
    that pool

    receives a sum which is rateable to the client money entitlement calculated in

    accordance with CASS 7A.2.5R (Client money entitlements); or

    (b) (where applicable) transfer client money comprising a sub-pool to effect or
    facilitate

    porting of positions held for the clients who are beneficiaries of that sub-pool;
    and

    (3) if, in connection with a regulated clearing arrangement, client money is remitted
    directly

    to the firm either from an authorised central counterparty or from a clearing
    member as part

    of that person’s default management procedures, then, as soon as reasonably practicable:

    (a) any such remittance in respect of a client transaction account that is an
    individual

    client account does not form a part of any notional pool under CASS 7A.2.4R(1)
    and

    must be distributed to the relevant client subject to CASS 7.17.2R (4) ;

    (b) subject to sub-paragraphs (3)(c) and (d), any such remittance in respect of
    a client

    transaction account that is an omnibus client account must form part of the notional
    pool

    under CASS 7A.2.4R(1)(b) and be subject to distribution in accordance with CASS

    7A.2.4R(2)(a);

    (c) any such remittance in respect of a client transaction account that is an
    omnibus

    client account must be distributed to the relevant clients for whom that omnibus
    client

    account is held if:

    (i) no client money in excess of the amount recorded in that omnibus client account
    is

    held by the firm as margin in relation to the positions recorded in that omnibus
    client

    account; and

    (ii) the amount of such remittance attributable to each client of the omnibus
    client

    account is readily apparent from information provided to the firm by the authorised

    central counterparty or, in the case of indirect clients, the clearing member;

    in which case the amount of such remittance does not form a part of any notional
    pool

    under CASS 7A.2.4R(1) and must be distributed to each such client in accordance
    with

    the information provided by the authorised central counterparty or clearing member

    subject to CASS 7.17.2R (4) ; and

    (d) any such remittance in respect of a client transaction account that is a net
    margined

    omnibus client account in respect of which the firm maintains a sub-pool must
    form part

    of such sub-pool under CASS 7A.2.4R(1)(a) to be distributed in accordance with
    CASS

    7A.2.4R (2)(a); and

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (4) as an alternative to distributing a client’s client money in a notional pool
    to the relevant

    client under CASS 7A.2.4R(2)(a) and in respect of client money that that is not
    required to

    be transferred under CASS 7A.2.4R(2)(b), a firm (Firm A) may on its own initiative
    transfer

    some or all of that client’s client money in the relevant notional pool to any
    other person

    (Firm B) for safekeeping on behalf of the client provided that:

    (a) as a consequence of any such transfer, Firm A does not distribute to any other
    client

    whose client money is in that notional pool, or transfer on behalf of any such
    other client

    to another person, an amount of money that would be less than that which such
    other

    client was entitled to have distributed or transferred under this rule;

    (b) unless Firm A is able to rely on regulation 10B(3)(b) of the IBSA Regulations
    for the

    transfer to Firm B to have effect without the consent of the client, either:

    (i) Firm A has the specific consent of the client to the transfer to Firm B; or

    (ii)

    (A) there is a written agreement between Firm A and the client which provides

    that Firm A may transfer the client’s client money to another person; and

    (B) Firm A can lawfully rely on that provision to achieve the transfer under this

    rule;

    (c) Firm A has, in advance of the transfer under this rule, either:

    (i) obtained a contractual undertaking from Firm B that the money transferred
    will be

    held by Firm B as client money in accordance with the client money rules; or

    (ii) where the client money rules do not apply to Firm B, or where they do apply
    but

    Firm B is able to hold the money transferred other than as client money, satisfied

    itself, having exercised all due skill care and diligence in its assessment, that
    Firm B

    will apply adequate measures to protect the money transferred;

    (d) where regulation 10C(3) of the IBSA Regulations does not apply, Firm A has,
    in

    advance of the transfer under this rule, obtained a contractual undertaking from
    Firm B

    that Firm B will return the money to the client at the client’s request; and

    (e) Firm A has, in advance of the transfer under this rule, obtained a contractual

    undertaking from Firm B that Firm B will notify the client, within 14 days of
    the transfer of

    that client’s balance having commenced:

    (i) of the applicable regulatory regime under which the money will be held by
    Firm B;

    (ii) either:

    (A) of any relevant compensation scheme limits that may apply in respect of Firm

    B’s handling of the transferred money; or

    (B) of the fact that Firm B does not participate in a relevant compensation

    scheme, if that is the case; and

    (iii) where regulation 10C(3) of the IBSA Regulations does not apply, that the
    client

    has the option of having its money returned to it by Firm B; and

    (5)

    (a) subject to (b), as a further alternative to distributing a client’s client
    money in a

    notional pool to the relevant client under CASS 7A.2.4R(2)(a) and in respect of
    client

    money that is not required to be transferred under CASS 7A.2.4R(2)(b), a firm
    may

    transfer all of that client’s client money in the relevant notional pool to a
    dormant asset

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    fund operator under the applicable provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets
    Act 2022

    and in accordance with CASS 7.11.57AR; and

    (b) as a consequence of any such transfer to a dormant asset fund operator, the
    firm

    must not distribute to any other client whose client money is in that notional
    pool, or

    transfer on behalf of any such other client to another person, an amount of money
    that

    would be less than that which such other client was entitled to have distributed
    or

    transferred under this rule.'
  display: CASS 6.2.3
- id: 7A.2.4
  chapter: 7A
  type: null
  title: C Under CASS 7A.2.4R(1)(b)(i) a firm should include the balances of client
    money referred to at
  summary: null
  risk_ids: []
  default_control_ids: []
  applicability_conditions: null
  text: 'G CASS 7.13.40AR(2), CASS 7.13.53AR(2) and CASS 7.13.72AR(2) in the relevant
    pool.

    CASS 7A.2.4A G (1) Under EMIR, where a firm that is a clearing member of an authorised
    central

    counterparty defaults, the authorised central counterparty may:

    (a) port client positions where possible; and

    (b) after the completion of the default management process:

    (i) return any balance due directly to those clients for whom the positions are
    held, if

    they are known to the authorised central counterparty; or

    (ii) remit any balance to the firm for the account of its clients if the clients
    are not

    known to the authorised central counterparty.

    (1A) Under the EMIR L2 Regulation or the MiFIR indirect clearing RTS, where a
    firm acting

    in connection with a regulated clearing arrangement for a client (who is also
    an indirect

    client) defaults, the clearing member with whom the firm has placed client money
    of the

    indirect client, may, in accordance with the EMIR indirect clearing default management

    obligations or MiFIR indirect clearing default management obligations:

    (a) transfer the positions and assets either to another clearing member of the
    relevant

    authorised central counterparty or to another firm willing to act for the indirect
    client; or

    (b) liquidate the assets and positions of the indirect clients and remit all monies
    due to

    the indirect clients.

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (1B) For the avoidance of doubt, ''relevant clients'' in the case of CASS 7A.2.4R
    (3)(a) and

    CASS 7A.2.4R (3)(c) includes a client who is also an indirect client.

    (2) Where any balance remitted from an authorised central counterparty or, in
    the case of

    indirect clients, a clearing member, to a firm is client money, CASS 7A.2.4R (3)
    provides for

    the distribution of remittances from either an individual client account or an
    omnibus client

    account.

    (3) Remittances received by the firm falling within CASS 7A.2.4R (3)(a) and CASS
    7A.2.4R

    (3)(c) should not be pooled with client money held in any client bank account
    operated by

    the firm at the time of the primary pooling event. Those remittances should be
    segregated

    and promptly distributed to each client on whose behalf the remittance was received.

    (4) For the avoidance of doubt, in respect of a regulated clearing arrangement,
    any client

    money remitted by the authorised central counterparty or, in the case of indirect
    clients, the

    clearing member, to the firm pursuant to CASS 7A.2.4R (3) should not be treated
    as client

    money received after the failure of the firm under CASS 7A.2.7-AR (Client money
    received

    after a primary pooling event).

    (5) The firm''s obligation to its client in respect of client money held in a
    sub-pool is

    discharged to the extent that the firm transfers that client money to facilitate
    porting in

    accordance with CASS 7.11.34R (8) .

    CASS 7A.2.4B G (1) The restrictions on transfers of client money at CASS 7A.2.4R(4)
    are each of the type

    referred to at regulation 10B(4) of the IBSA Regulations as “a restriction in
    client money

    rules”.

    (2) Where Firm A has complied with the restrictions at CASS 7A.2.4R(4) for any
    transfers to

    Firm B, any money transferred to Firm B ceases to be client money held by Firm
    A (see

    CASS 7.11.34R(2)(e) (Discharge of fiduciary duty)).

    (3) But any money returned by Firm B to Firm A in the event of a ‘reverse transfer’
    will be

    subject to the client money rules and client money distribution and transfer rules
    as applied

    to Firm A, and should be treated by Firm A in accordance with CASS 7A.2.7-AR (Client

    money received after the failure of the firm).

    CASS 7A.2.5 R Client money entitlements

    (-2)

    (a) Subject to paragraph (-2)(b), each client’s entitlement to client money in
    a notional

    pool is calculated with reference to the client money requirement as shown by
    an internal

    client money reconciliation carried out in accordance with CASS 7.15.15R(4)(a)
    (Internal

    client money reconciliations) as at the primary pooling event.

    (b) If, as at the primary pooling event, the firm had entered in to one or more
    cleared

    margined transactions through the use of a client transaction account at a clearing
    house

    that had not closed out as at the primary pooling event, the client money requirement

    under (-2)(a) must be calculated as follows:

    (i) CASS 7.16.28R does not apply in respect of those cleared margined transactions;

    and

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (ii) subject to CASS 7.16.30R, in respect of those cleared margined transactions
    a

    client’s equity balance is instead the amount which the firm is liable to pay
    to the

    client (or the client to the firm) under the client money rules for margined transactions

    following the close out of those margined transactions. This balance should include

    any cash margin the firm has received from the client in connection with those

    transactions.

    (-1)

    Each client''s client equity balance following any adjustments under paragraph
    (-2) must be

    reduced by:

    (a) any amount paid by:

    (i) an authorised central counterparty to a clearing member other than the firm
    in

    connection with a porting arrangement in accordance with CASS 7.11.34R (6) in

    respect of that client; and

    (ii) a clearing member to another clearing member or firm (other than the firm)
    in

    connection with a transfer in accordance with CASS 7.11.34R (8);

    (b) any amount paid by:

    (i) an authorised central counterparty directly to that client, in accordance
    withCASS

    7.11.34R (7); and

    (ii) a clearing member directly to an indirect client in accordance with CASS
    7.11.34R

    (9); and

    (c) any amount that must be distributed to that client by the firm in accordance
    with

    CASS 7A.2.4R (3)(a) or (c).

    (1) When, in respect of a client who is a beneficiary of a pool and following
    any adjustments

    under paragraph (-2) and reductions under paragraph (-1), there is a positive
    individual

    client balance and a negative client equity balancein relation to that pool, the
    credit for that

    pool must be offset against the debit for that pool reducing the individual client
    balance for

    that client.

    (2) When, in respect of a client who is a beneficiary of a pool and following
    any adjustments

    under paragraph (-2) and reductions under paragraph (-1), there is a negative
    individual

    client balance and a positive client equity balance in relation to that pool,
    the credit for that

    pool must be offset against the debit for that pool reducing the client equity
    balance for that

    client.

    CASS 7A.2.5A G (1)

    (a) The effect of CASS 7A.2.5R(-2)(b) is that the client equity balance for the
    relevant

    cleared margined transaction is with reference to the eventual close out or ‘hindsight’

    value of the transaction, instead of being a notional balance as at the primary
    pooling

    event under CASS 7.16.28R.

    (b) CASS 7A.2.5R(-2)(b) applies in respect of cleared margined transactions that
    a firm

    had entered into for any client, including for indirect clients where the firm
    is itself a client

    of a clearing member.

    (2) In cases where CASS 7A.2.5R(-2)(b) does not apply, the client equity balance
    for a

    margined transaction will be the notional balance as at the primary pooling event
    under

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    CASS 7.16.28R.

    CASS 7A.2.6A R Closing a client money pool

    (1) Before a firm ceases to treat a balance of client money in a notional pool
    as client money

    by transferring it to itself under CASS 7.17.2R(5) it must:

    (a) (subject to paragraph (2)) attempt to distribute the balance to the relevant
    client or

    transfer it to another person for safekeeping on behalf of the client in accordance
    with

    CASS 7A.2.4R (Pooling and distribution or transfer);

    (b) (subject to paragraph (3)) take reasonable steps to notify any client in respect
    of

    whom the firm has evidence that the money may belong, of the firm’s proposed course

    of action;

    (c) where the firm has failed, apply any of the following types of balances of
    client money

    in the notional pool towards any costs incurred in accordance with CASS 7.17.2R(4),

    including any costs incurred under paragraph (1)(d):

    (i) client money allocated to a client for which, following the steps taken by
    the firm to

    satisfy paragraph (1)(b), the client to whom the client money belongs has not

    provided the firm with instructions that would enable the firm to make a distribution
    or

    transfer under paragraph (1)(a); or

    (ii) client money belonging to a client who, in response to a notification made
    under

    paragraph (1)(b), has confirmed to the firm that it disclaims the benefit of the

    statutory trust under CASS 7.17.2R in relation to the client money; or

    (iii) client money that, following the steps taken by the firm to satisfy paragraph
    (1)(b),

    is unallocated to any client in the firm’s records and accounts; and

    (d) immediately before transferring the balances of client money under paragraph
    (1)(c)

    to the firm itself carry out the actions in (i) and (ii) in the following order:

    (i) attempt to transfer them to a dormant asset fund operator under the applicable

    provisions of Part 1 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022 and in accordance with CASS

    7.11.57AR (but this only applies if, prior to a primary pooling event, the firm
    had put

    in place contractual or other arrangements with a dormant asset fund operator
    of the

    sort described at section 23 of the Dormant Assets Act 2022); and

    (ii) apply any remaining balances towards making good any outstanding shortfall
    in

    the notional pool, and subsequently distribute or transfer them in accordance
    with

    CASS 7A.2.4R to or on behalf of clients for whom the firm is able to make such

    distributions or transfers.

    (2) A firm is not required to attempt to return or transfer the balance of client
    money under

    paragraph (1)(a) where the client to whom the balance belongs has confirmed to
    the firm

    that it disclaims the benefit of the statutory trust under CASS 7.17.2R in relation
    to the

    balance client money.

    (3) A firm is not required to notify a client under paragraph (1)(b) where:

    (a) the firm is able to distribute the client money to the relevant client or
    transfer it to

    another person on behalf of the client in accordance with CASS 7A.2.4R (Pooling
    and

    distribution or transfer);

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (b) the client to whom the balance of client money belongs has confirmed to the
    firm that

    it disclaims the benefit of the statutory trust under CASS 7.17.2R in relation
    to the

    balance client money;

    (c) in respect of a client for whom the firm has evidence that they were a retail
    client for

    the purposes of the client money rules at the time of the primary pooling event,
    the

    entitlement of that client in the notional pool is £25 or less when calculated
    under CASS

    7A.2.5R (Client money entitlements); or

    (d) in respect of a client for whom the firm has evidence that they were a professional

    client for the purposes of the client money rules at the time of the primary pooling
    event,

    the entitlement of that client is £100 or less when calculated under CASS 7A.2.5R
    (Client

    money entitlements).

    CASS 7A.2.6B G (1) A firm may propose to cease to treat a balance of money as
    client money under CASS

    7A.2.6AR(1) where the firm is using the procedure under regulation 12C of the
    IBSA

    Regulations to set a ‘hard bar date’ by giving a ‘hard bar date notice’, or another
    similar

    procedure in accordance with the legal procedure for the firm’s failure.

    (2) In any case, a firm should consider the whether its obligations under law
    (including trust

    law) or any agreement permit it to cease to treat a balance of money as client
    money in the

    way in which it proposes to do so.

    (3) Balances of client money under CASS 7A.2.6AR(1)(c)(iii) include any remaining
    amount

    of those that the firm is holding to comply with:

    (a) CASS 7.13.41R (Prudent segregation);

    (b) CASS 7.13.65R(1) (The alternative approach to client money segregation); and

    (c) CASS 7.13.73R(1) (Use of the normal approach in relation to certain regulated

    clearing arrangements).

    CASS 7A.2.6C E (1) Reasonable steps in CASS 7A.2.6AR(1)(b) include the following
    course of conduct:

    (a) determining, as far as reasonably possible, the correct contact details for
    the relevant

    client;

    (b) for a client for whom the firm has evidence that it was a professional client
    for the

    purposes of the client money rules at the time of the primary pooling event:

    (i) writing to the client at the last known address either by post or by electronic
    mail:

    (A) to inform it of the firm’s intention to no longer treat the balance as client

    money;

    (B) to inform it of the consequences of the firm’s proposed course of action in

    relation to the client’s ability to assert an ownership right to that money; and

    (C) to invite the client to submit a claim for the money; and

    (ii) where the client has not responded within 28 days of the communication under

    sub-paragraph (i), attempting to communicate the information in sub-paragraph
    (i) to

    the client on at least one further occasion by any means other than that used
    in (i)

    including by post, electronic mail, telephone or media advertisement; and

    (c) for any other client:

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (i) the same steps as under sub-paragraphs (b)(i) and (b)(ii); and

    (ii) where the client has not responded within 28 days of the second communication

    under sub-paragraph (b)(ii), attempting to communicate the information in subparagraph
    (b)(i) to the client on at least one further occasion by any means other

    than one in respect of which the firm has obtained positive confirmation that
    the client

    is not receiving such communications.

    (2) Compliance with paragraph (1) may be relied on as tending to establish compliance
    with

    CASS 7A.2.6AR(1)(b).

    (3) Contravention of paragraph (1) may be relied on as tending to establish contravention
    of

    CASS 7A.2.6AR(1)(b).

    CASS 7A.2.6D G For the purpose of CASS 7A.2.6CE(1)(a), a firm may use any available
    means to determine the

    correct contact details for the relevant client, including:

    (1) telephoning the client;

    (2) searching internal and/or public records;

    (3) media advertising;

    (4) mortality screening; and

    (5) using credit reference agencies or tracing agents.

    CASS 7A.2.6E R If the firm undertook a tracing exercise for the purposes of CASS
    7.11.50R(3) (Allocated but

    unclaimed client money) before the primary pooling event but had not made the
    charity

    payment under that rule by the time of the primary pooling event then the findings
    of that

    exercise may be relied on for the purposes of CASS 7A.2.6CE(1)(a).

    CASS 7A.2.6F R (1) A firm must make a record of any balance under CASS 7A.2.6AR(1)(c)(i)
    or (ii) which is

    to be applied towards any costs or towards any shortfall in the relevant notional
    pool in

    accordance with CASS 7A.2.6AR(1)(c) or (d) respectively, immediately before taking
    such

    steps.

    (2) The record under paragraph (1) must state:

    (a) the amount of the balance of client money;

    (b) the name and contact details of any client to whom that balance was allocated

    according to the firm’s records at the time of making the record under this rule;
    and

    (c) either:

    (i) the efforts applied by the firm to determine the client’s correct contact
    details under

    CASS 7A.2.6CE(1)(a); or

    (ii) if being relied on under CASS 7A.2.6ER, the efforts applied by the firm to

    determine the client’s correct contact details for the purposes of CASS 7.11.50R(3)

    (Allocated but unclaimed client money).

    (3) A firm must keep the record under (1) indefinitely.'
  display: CASS 7A.2.4
- id: 7A.2.7
  chapter: 7A
  type: null
  title: A Client money received after a primary pooling event
  summary: null
  risk_ids: []
  default_control_ids: []
  applicability_conditions: null
  text: 'CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    R (1) This rule applies in respect of client money received by a firm after a
    primary pooling

    event that does not form part of a notional pool.

    (2) Where the firm is using the normal approach under CASS 7.13.6R (The normal

    approach), client money to which this rule applies must be received into a client
    bank

    account that does not contain any client money forming part of a notional pool
    under CASS

    7A.2.4R(1) (Pooling and distribution or transfer).

    (3)

    (a) This paragraph applies in respect of client money that is received by a firm
    into an

    account other than a client bank account as required under CASS 7.13.62R (The

    alternative approach to client money segregation) or as permitted under CASS 7.13.72R

    (Use of the normal approach in relation to certain regulated clearing arrangements).

    (b) To the extent the firm makes any transfers from its own account to a client
    bank

    account under CASS 7.13.62R(3) (The alternative approach to client money

    segregation) or CASS 7.13.72R(2)(b) (Use of the normal approach in relation to
    certain

    regulated clearing arrangements), such transfers must be made into a client bank

    account that does not contain any client money forming part of a notional pool
    under

    CASS 7A.2.4R(1) (Pooling and distribution or transfer).

    (4) Subject to paragraphs (5) and (6), a firm must promptly return to each relevant
    client all

    client money to which this rule applies.

    (5) To the extent that client money relates to a transaction for a client that
    was concluded

    before the primary pooling event but had not yet settled at the time of the primary
    pooling

    event, the firm may use that client money to settle that transaction.

    (6)

    (a) This paragraph applies where client money which is not received by the firm
    into a

    client transaction account relates to one or more cleared margined transactions
    entered

    into by the firm through the use of a client transaction account at a clearing
    house.

    (b) Where such transactions have not closed out as at the primary pooling event,
    then

    provided that the firm has not failed, it may transfer that client money to a
    client

    transaction account with the relevant clearing house in accordance with CASS 7.14

    (Client money held by a third party) for the purpose of collateralising those
    margined

    transactions.

    CASS 7A.2.7A G A firm may open a client bank account after a primary pooling event
    for the purposes of

    complying with CASS 7A.2.7-AR(2) and CASS 7A.2.10AR(2). If it does so it must
    comply with

    CASS 7.18.15R regarding acknowledgement letters.

    CASS 7A.2.7B G Following a failure, CASS 7.17.2R(4) applies in respect of costs
    properly attributable to the

    return of a client’s client money under CASS 7A.2.7-AR(4).

    CASS 7A.2.9 R If a firm receives a mixed remittance after a primary pooling event
    other than where using the

    alternative approach under CASS 7.13.62R or under a regulated clearing arrangement
    to which

    CASS 7.13.72R applies, it must:

    (1) pay the full sum into a client bank account that meets the requirements of
    CASS 7A.2.7-

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    AR(2); and

    (2) pay the money that is not client money out of that client bank account into
    a firm''s own

    bank account within one business day of the day on which the firm would normally
    expect

    the remittance to be cleared.

    CASS 7A.2.10 G Whenever possible the firm should seek to split a mixed remittance
    before the relevant

    accounts are credited.

    CASS 7A.2.10A Money due to a client from a firm after a primary pooling event

    R

    A firm that is operating the normal approach to segregation under CASS 7.13 (Segregation
    of

    client money) which becomes liable to pay money to a client after a primary pooling
    event must

    promptly, and in any event no later than one business day after the money is due
    and payable,

    pay the money:

    (1) to, or to the order of, the client; or

    (2) into a client bank account that does not contain any client money forming
    part of a

    notional pool under CASS 7A.2.4R(1).

    CASS 7A.2.10B Where the firm has payment instructions from the client, the firm
    should pay the money to the

    G order of the client, rather than into a client bank account.

    CASS 7A.2.11 R Secondary pooling events

    If both a primary pooling event and a secondary pooling event occur, the provisions
    of this

    section relating to a primary pooling event apply.

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 7A.3 Secondary pooling events

    CASS 7A.3.1 R A secondary pooling event occurs on the failure of a person to which
    client money held by the

    firm has been transferred underCASS 7.13.3R (1) to CASS 7.13.3R (3) (Depositing
    client

    money) or CASS 7.14.2 R (Client money held by a third party).

    CASS 7A.3.2 R CASS 7A.3.6 R to CASS 7A.3.12AR do not apply if, on the failure
    of the relevant person:

    (1) there is no secondary pooling shortfall; or

    (2) where there is a secondary pooling shortfall, the firm pays an amount equal
    to the

    amount of client money which would have been held at that person if a secondary
    pooling

    shortfall had not occurred either:

    (a) to its clients in the appropriate amounts such that they are compensated by
    the

    amount of the secondary pooling shortfall that they would otherwise be required
    to bear

    under this section; or

    (b) into a client bank account at an unaffected bank with the effect that any
    shortfall that

    would otherwise arise for the purposes of CASS 7.15 (Records, accounts and

    reconciliations) is avoided.

    CASS 7A.3.4 G When a person to which client money held by the firm has been transferred
    under CASS

    7.13.3R(1) to CASS 7.13.3R(3) (Depositing client money) or CASS 7.14.2R (Client
    money held

    by a third party) fails, and the firm decides not to make good any secondary pooling
    shortfall in

    the amount of client money held at that person (see CASS 7A.3.2R(2)), a secondary
    pooling

    event will occur. The firm should reflect the secondary pooling shortfall that
    arises in the

    general pool (where the firm maintains only a general pool) and, where relevant,
    in a particular

    sub-pool (where the firm maintains both a general pool and one or more sub-pools)
    in its

    records of the entitlement of clients and of money held with third parties under
    CASS 7.15

    (Records, accounts and reconciliations).

    CASS 7A.3.5 G The client money distribution and transfer rules seek to ensure
    that clients who have previously

    specified that they are not willing to accept the risk of the bank that has failed,
    and who

    therefore requested that their client money be placed in a designated client bank
    account at a

    different bank, should not suffer the loss of the bank that has failed.

    CASS 7A.3.6 R Failure of a bank: pooling

    If a secondary pooling event occurs as a result of the failure of a bank where
    one or more

    general client bank accounts are held, and/or where one or more designated client
    bank

    accounts or designated client fund accounts are held, for the general pool or
    a particular subpool, then:

    (1) in relation to every general client bank account of the firm maintained in
    respect of that

    pool, the provisions of CASS 7A.3.8 R, CASS 7A.3.13 R and CASS 7A.3.14 R will
    apply;

    (2) in relation to every designated client bank account held by the firm with
    the failed bank

    for the relevant pool, the provisions of CASS 7A.3.10 R, CASS 7A.3.13 R and CASS

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    7A.3.14 R will apply;

    (3) in relation to each designated client fund account held by the firm with the
    failed bank for

    the relevant pool, the provisions of CASS 7A.3.11 R, CASS 7A.3.13 R and CASS 7A.3.14
    R

    will apply;

    (4) any money held at a bank, other than the bank that has failed, in designated
    client bank

    accounts for the relevant pool, is not pooled with any other client money held
    for that pool or

    any other pool; and

    (5) any money held in a designated client fund account in respect of that pool,
    no part of

    which is held by the bank that has failed, is not pooled with any other client
    money held for

    that pool or any other pool.

    CASS 7A.3.6A G Depending on the person at which the secondary pooling event occurs,
    the types of client bank

    accounts and client transaction accounts that are affected by the secondary pooling
    shortfall,

    and the nature of a firm’s business with a particular client, it is possible that
    the client’s overall

    entitlement to client money held by the firm may be affected by a combination
    of CASS

    7A.3.8R, CASS 7A.3.8AR, CASS 7A.3.10R and CASS 7A.3.11R.

    CASS 7A.3.7A R Failure of an exchange, clearing house, intermediate broker, settlement

    agent or OTC counterparty: pooling

    If a secondary pooling event occurs as a result of the failure of an exchange,
    clearing house,

    intermediate broker, settlement agent or OTC counterparty, then, in relation to
    every general

    client bank account and client transaction account of the firm, CASS 7A.3.8R and
    CASS

    7A.3.13R will apply, and CASS 7A.3.8AR will additionally apply in the case of
    the failure of an

    authorised central counterparty.

    CASS 7A.3.8 R Failure of a bank, intermediate broker, settlement agent, OTC

    counterparty, exchange or clearing house: treatment of general client

    bank accounts and client transaction accounts

    Money Subject to CASS 7A.3.8AR, if a secondary pooling event occurs as a result
    of the failure

    of a bank, intermediate broker, settlement agent, OTC counterparty, exchange or
    clearing

    house, money held in each general client bank account and client transaction account
    of the

    firm for the general pool or a sub-poolmust be treated as pooled and:

    (1) any secondary pooling shortfall in client money held, or which should have
    been held, in

    general client bank accounts and client transaction accounts for the relevant
    pool, that has

    arisen as a result of the failure of the bank, exchange, clearing house, intermediate
    broker,

    settlement agent or OTC counterparty, must be borne by all the clients of that
    pool whose

    client money is held in such general client bank account or client transaction
    account of the

    firm, rateably in accordance with their entitlements;

    (2) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each client of the relevant
    pool by

    the firm, to reflect the requirements in paragraph (1), and the firm''s records
    must be

    amended to reflect the reduced client money entitlement;

    (3) the firm must make and retain a record of each client''s share of the secondary
    pooling

    shortfall until the client is repaid; and

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (4) the firm must use the new client money entitlements, calculated in accordance
    with

    paragraph (2), for the purposes of reconciliations pursuant to CASS 7.15.3 R (Records
    and

    accounts) for that pool.

    CASS 7A.3.8A R If a secondary pooling event occurs as a result of the failure
    of an authorised central

    counterparty:

    (1) any money held in a client transaction account that is an individual client
    account at the

    failed authorised central counterparty is not pooled by the firm with any of its
    other client

    money;

    (2) any money held in a client transaction account that is an omnibus client account
    at the

    failed authorised central counterparty is not pooled by the firm with any of its
    other client

    money provided that:

    (a) no client money in excess of the amount recorded in that omnibus client account
    is

    held by the firm as margin in relation to the positions recorded in that omnibus
    client

    account; and

    (b) the client or clients of the firm to whom the amount recorded in that omnibus
    client

    account relates is or are readily apparent from information provided to the firm
    by the

    authorised central counterparty or, in the case of indirect clients, the clearing
    member;

    (3) any money held in a client transaction account that is a net margined omnibus
    client

    account at the failed authorised central counterparty in respect of which the
    firm maintains a

    sub-pool is not pooled by the firm with any of its other client money;

    (4) the proportion of any secondary pooling shortfall that arises as a result
    of client money

    held, or which should have been held, in an individual client account to which
    paragraph (1)

    applies must be borne by the client whose client money was held in that individual
    client

    account;

    (5) the proportion of any secondary pooling shortfall that arises as a result
    of client money

    held, or which should have been held, in an omnibus client account to which paragraph
    (2)

    applies must either:

    (a) be borne by all the clients whose client money is held in that account, rateably
    in

    accordance with their entitlements; or

    (b) if the firm is required under applicable law to allocate the secondary pooling
    shortfall

    other than as under (a), be allocated as required by applicable law;

    (6) the proportion of any secondary pooling shortfall that arises as a result
    of client money

    held, or which should have been held, in a net margined omnibus client account
    to which

    paragraph (3) applies must be borne by all the clients whose client money is held
    in the

    relevant sub-pool, rateably in accordance with their entitlements;

    (7) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each relevant client
    of the relevant

    pool, to reflect the requirements in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), and the firm’s
    records must

    be amended to reflect the reduced client money entitlement;

    (8) the firm must make and retain a record of each client’s share of the secondary
    pooling

    shortfall until the client is repaid; and

    (9) the firm must use the new client money entitlements calculated under paragraph
    (7) for

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    the purposes of reconciliations pursuant to CASS 7.15.3R (Records and accounts)
    for the

    relevant pool.

    CASS 7A.3.9 G The term "which should have been held" is a reference to the relevant
    failed person’s failure to

    hold the client money at the time of its failure.

    CASS 7A.3.9A G (1) CASS 7A.3.8AR(5)(b) enables a firm to allocate the relevant
    part of a secondary pooling

    shortfall that arises in an omnibus client account under CASS 7A.3.8AR(2) other
    than on a

    “pro rata” basis, where this is required by applicable law.

    (2) This would include, for example, where applicable law requires the firm to
    attribute a

    secondary pooling shortfall only to a particular client or clients.

    CASS 7A.3.10 R Failure of a bank: treatment of designated client bank accounts
    and

    designated client fund accounts

    For each client with a designated client bank account maintained by the firm for
    the general

    pool or a particular sub-pool and held at the failed bank:

    (1) any secondary pooling shortfall in client money held, or which should have
    been held, in

    designated client bank accounts that has arisen as a result of the failure, must
    be borne by

    all the clients of the relevant pool whose client money is held in a designated
    client bank

    account of the firm at the failed bank, rateably in accordance with their client
    money

    entitlements;

    (2) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each of the relevant
    clients of the

    relevant pool by the firm, and the firm''s records must be amended to reflect
    the reduced

    client money entitlement;

    (3) the firm must make and retain a record of each client''s share of the secondary
    pooling

    shortfall at the failed bank until the client is repaid; and

    (4) the firm must use the new client money entitlements, calculated in accordance
    with

    paragraph (2), for the purposes of reconciliations pursuant to CASS 7.15.3 R (Records
    and

    accounts) in respect of the relevant pool.

    CASS 7A.3.11 R Money held by the firm in each designated client fund account for
    the general pool or a

    particular sub-pool with the failed bank must be treated as pooled with any other
    designated

    client fund accounts for the general pool or a particular sub-pool as the case
    may be which

    contain part of the same designated fund and:

    (1) any secondary pooling shortfall in client money held, or which should have
    been held, in

    designated client fund accounts that has arisen as a result of the failure, must
    be borne by

    each of the clients of the relevant pool whose client money is held in that designated
    fund,

    rateably in accordance with their entitlements;

    (2) a new client money entitlement must be calculated for each client of the relevant
    pool by

    the firm, in accordance with paragraph (1), and the firm''s records must be amended
    to

    reflect the reduced client money entitlement;

    (3) the firm must make and retain a record of each client''s share of the secondary
    pooling

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    shortfall at the failed bank until the client is repaid; and

    (4) the firm must use the new client money entitlements, calculated in accordance
    with

    paragraph (2), for the purposes of reconciliations pursuant to CASS 7.15.3 R (Records
    and

    accounts) for the relevant pool.

    CASS 7A.3.12 R A client whose money was held, or which should have been held,
    in a designated client bank

    account with a bank that has failed is not entitled to claim in respect of that
    money against any

    other client bank account or client transaction account of the firm.

    CASS 7A.3.12A A client whose money was held, or which should have been held, in
    a designated client fund

    R account with a bank that has failed is not entitled to claim in respect of that
    money against any

    other client bank account of the firm that is not part of the same designated
    fund or against any

    client transaction account of the firm.

    CASS 7A.3.13 R Client money received after the secondary pooling event

    Client money received by the firm after the failure of a bank, exchange, clearing
    house,

    intermediate broker, settlement agent or OTC counterparty, that would otherwise
    have been

    paid into a client bank account or client transaction account at that bank, exchange,
    clearing

    house, intermediate broker, settlement agent or OTC counterparty, as the case
    may be, for

    either the general pool or a particular sub-pool:

    (1) must not be transferred to the failed person unless specifically instructed
    by the client in

    order to settle an obligation of that client to the failed person; and

    (2) must be, subject to paragraph (1), placed in a client bank account or client
    transaction

    account relating to the general pool or the particular sub-pool as the case may
    be other than

    an account at the failed person.

    CASS 7A.3.14 R If a firm receives a mixed remittance after the secondary pooling
    event which consists of client

    money that would have been paid into a general client bank account, a designated
    client bank

    account or a designated client fund account maintained at the bank that has failed,
    it must:

    (1) pay the full sum into a client bank account other than one operated at the
    bank that has

    failed; and

    (2) pay the money that is not client money out of that client bank account within
    one

    business day of the day on which the firm would normally expect the remittance
    to be

    cleared.

    CASS 7A.3.15 G Whenever possible the firm should seek to split a mixed remittance
    before the relevant

    accounts are credited.

    CASS 7A.3.19 R Notification to the FCA of secondary pooling event

    A firm must notify the FCA as soon as reasonably practical after it becomes aware
    of the failure

    of any bank, exchange, clearing house, intermediate broker, settlement agent,
    OTC

    counterparty or other entity with which it has placed, or whom it has allowed
    to hold, client

    money:

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025

    CASS

    (1) [deleted]

    (2) [deleted]

    (3) whether it intends to make good any secondary pooling shortfall that has arisen
    or may

    arise; and

    (4) the amount of that secondary pooling shortfall, or the expected amount if
    the actual

    amount is not known.

    CASS 7A Client money distribution and transfer www.handbook.fca.org.uk September
    2025


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 8 Mandates

    CASS 8.1 Application

    CASS 8.2 Definition of mandate

    CASS 8.3 Records and internal controls

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 8 Mandates

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 8.1 Application

    CASS 8.1.1 R This chapter (the mandate rules) applies to a firm when it has a
    mandate in the course of, or in

    connection with, the firm''s:

    (1) designated investment business (including MiFID business); or

    (2) insurance distribution activity, except where it relates to a reinsurance
    contract;

    (3) debt management activity.

    CASS 8.1.2A R The mandate rules do not apply to a firm:

    (1) in relation to client money that the firm is holding in accordance with CASS
    5 or CASS 7

    (including client money that the firm has allowed another person to hold or control
    in

    accordance with CASS 7.14.2R) or CASS 11; or

    (2) in relation to custody assets that the firm is holding, or in respect of which
    the firm is

    carrying on safeguarding and administration of assets (without arranging), acting
    as trustee

    or depositary of an AIF or acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS in accordance
    with

    CASS 6; or

    (2A) in relation to custody assets for which a small AIFM is:

    (a) carrying on those excluded custody activities that would amount to safeguarding
    and

    administration of assets (without arranging) but for the exclusion in article
    72AA of the

    RAO; and

    (b) is doing so in accordance with CASS 6; or

    (3) in relation to a client''s assets that the firm is holding or has received
    under an

    arrangement to which CASS 3 applies; or

    (4) when it acts as the operator of a regulated collective investment scheme in
    relation to

    property held for or within the scheme.

    CASS 8.1.2B G (1) CASS 8.1.2A R is not an absolute exemption, but it excludes
    the application of the

    mandate rules in relation to money or assets that a firm has received, is holding,
    or is

    responsible for (as appropriate and in the circumstances described in CASS 8.1.2A
    R).

    (2) This means that, for example in respect of CASS 8.1.2A R (1), a firm holding
    client

    money in accordance with CASS 5 or CASS 7 does not also need to comply with the

    mandate rules in relation to the client money which it actually holds, but the
    mandate rules

    would apply if the firm has a mandate under which it can receive a client''s money
    from

    another person in the course of, or in connection with, the activities set out
    at CASS 8.1.1 R

    (1) and CASS 8.1.1 R (2).

    (3) Similarly, in respect of CASS 8.1.2A R (4), the mandate rules apply to a firm
    that is the

    operator of a regulated collective investment scheme if, for example, it has a
    mandate under

    which it can receive a client''s money from another person for the purposes of
    investing it in

    the scheme.

    CASS 8.1.4 G Purpose

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    The mandate rules require firms to establish and maintain records and internal
    controls to

    prevent the misuse of a mandate.

    CASS 8.1.4A G The mandate rules only apply to a firm that has a mandate, and do
    not affect the duties of any

    other person to whom the firm is able to give the types of instructions referred
    to in CASS

    8.2.1R (4). For example, if a person (A) has accepted a deposit from a client,
    and a firm (B) has

    a mandate in respect of that client''s deposit held by A, the mandate rules only
    apply to B, and

    do not affect the duties of A in relation to the deposit.

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 8.2 Definition of mandate

    CASS 8.2.1 R A mandate is any means that give a firm the ability to control a
    client''s assets or liabilities,

    which meet the conditions in (1) to (5):

    (1) they are obtained by the firm from the client, and with the client''s consent;

    (2) where those means are obtained in the course of, or in connection with, the
    firm''s

    insurance distribution activity, they are in written form at the time they are
    obtained from the

    client;

    (3) they are retained by the firm;

    (4) they put the firm in a position where it is able to give any or all of the
    types of instructions

    described in (a) to (d):

    (a) instructions to another person in relation to the client''s money that is
    credited to an

    account maintained by that other person for the client;

    (b) instructions to another person in relation to any money to which the client
    has an

    entitlement, where that other person is responsible to the client for that entitlement

    (including where that other person is holding client money for the client in accordance

    with CASS 5 or CASS 7);

    (c) instructions to another person in relation to an asset of the client, where
    that other

    person is responsible to the client for holding that asset (including where that
    other

    person is safeguarding and administering investments, acting as trustee or depositary
    of

    an AIF or acting as trustee or depositary of a UK UCITS);

    (d) instructions to another person such that the client incurs a debt or other
    liability to

    that other person or any other person (other than the firm); and

    (5) their circumstances are such that the client''s further involvement would
    not be necessary

    for the firm''s instructions described in 4(a) to 4(d) to be given effect.

    CASS 8.2.2 G The form of a mandate

    A mandate can take any form and need not state that it is a mandate. For example
    it could take

    the form of:

    (1) a standalone document containing certain information conferring authority
    to control a

    client''s assets or liabilities on the firm;

    (2) a specific provision within a document or agreement that also relates to other
    matters; or

    (3) an authority provided by a client orally.

    CASS 8.2.3 G Retention by the firm

    (1) If a firm receives information that puts it in the position described in CASS
    8.2.1 R (4) in

    order to effect transactions immediately on receiving that information, then such
    information

    could only amount to a mandate if the firm retained it (for example by not destroying
    the

    relevant document, electronic record or telephone recording):

    (a) after it uses it to effect those immediate transactions; or

    (b) because those transactions are not, for whatever reason, effected immediately.

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    (2) If a firm receives information that puts it in the position described in CASS
    8.2.1 R (4)

    and the firm retains that information (for example in accordance with its record-keeping

    procedures or in order to effect transactions in the future or over a period of
    time) then such

    information could amount to a mandate.

    CASS 8.2.4 G Ability to give instructions to another person

    The instructions referred to at CASS 8.2.1 R (4) are all instructions given by
    a firm to another

    person who also has a relationship with the firm''s client. For example, the other
    person may be

    the client''s bank, intermediary, custodian or credit card provider. This means,
    for example, that

    any means by which a firm can control a client''s money or assets for which it
    is itself

    responsible to the client (rather than any other person) would not amount to a
    mandate. This

    includes where the firm is holding a client''s money or assets other than in accordance
    with

    CASS 5, CASS 6 or CASS 7 (for example, because of an exemption in those rules).

    CASS 8.2.5 G A mandate in relation to the type of instructions referred to in
    CASS 8.2.1R (4)(a) could include

    a direct debit instruction over a client''s bank account in favour of the firm.
    The fact that the

    instruction was given by the client in the form of a paperless direct debit would
    not prevent it

    from being a mandate.

    CASS 8.2.6 G A mandate in relation to the type of instructions referred to in
    CASS 8.2.1 R (4)(d) could include

    the client''s credit card details.

    CASS 8.2.7 G Conditions on use of mandate and client’s further involvement

    (1) If a firm obtains the means by which it can give the types of instructions
    referred to in

    CASS 8.2.1 R (4), but its use of those means is subject to any limits or conditions,
    then this

    does not necessarily prevent those means from being a mandate. For example, a
    client

    might require that a firm uses a mandate only in connection with transactions
    up to a certain

    value.

    (2) However, if a firm obtains the means by which it can give the types of instructions

    referred to in CASS 8.2.1 R (4), but the firm cannot, in practice, use those means
    without

    the client''s further involvement, then the condition in CASS 8.2.1 R (5) would
    not be met.

    For example, a firm might have the means by which it can give instructions of
    the type

    referred to in CASS 8.2.1 R (4)(a) in relation to an account maintained by another
    person for

    a client, but that other person might require the client''s signature or other
    authorisation

    before it gives effect to those instructions.

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 8.3 Records and internal controls

    CASS 8.3.1 R A firm that has mandates must establish and maintain adequate records
    and internal controls in

    respect of its use of the mandates.

    CASS 8.3.2 R The records and internal controls required by CASS 8.3.1 R must include:

    (1) an up-to-date list of each mandate that the firm has obtained, including a
    record of any

    conditions placed by the client or the firm''s management on the use of the mandate
    and,

    where a mandate was received in non-written form in the course of, or in connection
    with, its

    designated investment business, the details required under CASS 8.3.2C R;

    (2) a record of each transaction entered into under each mandate that the firm
    has;

    (3) internal controls to ensure that each transaction entered into under each
    mandate that

    the firm has is carried out in accordance with any conditions placed by the client
    or the firm''s

    management on the use of the mandate;

    (4) the details of the procedures and internal controls around the giving of instructions
    under

    the mandates that the firm has (such instructions being those referred to in CASS
    8.2.1 R

    (4)); and

    (5) where the firm holds a passbook or similar documents belonging to the client,
    internal

    controls for the safeguarding (including against loss, unauthorised destruction,
    theft, fraud or

    misuse) of any passbook or similar document belonging to the client held by the
    firm.

    CASS 8.3.2A R A firm’s list of mandates

    (1) A firm''s up-to-date list of mandates under CASS 8.3.2 R (1) must be maintained
    in a

    medium that allows the storage of information in a way accessible for future reference
    by

    the FCA or by an auditor preparing a report under SUP 3.10.4 R.

    (2) It must be possible for any corrections or other amendments, and the contents
    of the list

    prior to such corrections and amendments, to be easily ascertained.

    CASS 8.3.2B G A firm may use version control to comply with CASS 8.3.2A R (2).

    CASS 8.3.2C R An entry in a firm''s list of mandates underCASS 8.3.2 R (1) that
    relates to a mandate that was

    received in non-written form (eg in a telephone call) in the course of, or in
    connection with, its

    designated investment business must, as well as the information referred to at
    CASS 8.3.2 R

    (1), include the following details:

    (1) the nature of the mandate (eg debit card details);

    (2) the purpose of the mandate (eg collecting insurance premiums);

    (3) how the mandate was obtained (eg by telephone);

    (4) the name of the relevant client; and

    (5) the date on which the mandate was obtained.

    CASS 8.3.2D If a firm receives information through a telephone call in the course
    of, or in connection with, its

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    G designated investment business that amounts to a mandate as a result of the
    firm retaining a

    recording of the call (see CASS 8.2.3 G), the requirements at CASS 8.3.2 R (1)
    apply,

    regardless of whether or not the firm intends to use the mandate in the future.
    The firm will

    meet the requirements of CASS 8.3.2 R (1) if the firm''s list of mandates is updated
    with the

    details of the mandate that the firm obtained as a result of the call.

    CASS 8.3.2E G A firm should not reproduce information meeting the conditions under
    CASS 8.2.1 R as a

    separate record (eg by including such information in its list of mandates under
    CASS 8.3.2 R

    (1)) unless the firm considers this necessary, as this creates additional risk
    of misuse. Making a

    record of the details concerning the mandate described in CASS 8.3.2C R would
    be

    appropriate.

    CASS 8.3.2F G When keeping its list of mandates under CASS 8.3.2 R (1) up to date:

    (1) a firm should create a new entry in the list each time the firm obtains a
    new mandate;

    (2) if, for an existing entry on its list, a firm obtains the same information
    meeting the

    conditions in CASS 8.2.1 R again (eg in a written confirmation following a paperless
    direct

    debit), the additional mandate is not a new mandate and the firm should not create
    another

    entry on the list; but

    (3) the firm should, for every entry on its list, identify each of the locations
    in which it has

    retained the information that meets the conditions in CASS 8.2.1 R (eg a client''s
    debit card

    details retained in a telephone recording and also the firm''s written log of
    the call, or two

    separate documents containing the same information).

    CASS 8.3.2G R Retention of records

    A firm must retain the records required under CASS 8.3.1 R in relation to a particular
    mandate

    for the following period after it ceases to have the mandate (e.g. because the
    firm has

    destroyed the relevant document, electronic record or telephone recording), as
    applicable:

    (1) subject to (2), a minimum of one year;

    (2) a minimum of five years, where the relevant mandate was held by the firm in
    the course

    of, or in connection with, its MiFID business.

    CASS 8.3.2H G Where a firm has an obligation under CASS 8.3.2G R to retain records
    after it ceases to have a

    particular mandate, it may keep the mandate on the firm''s list under CASS 8.3.2
    R (1) for the

    relevant period, but the list should be updated to reflect the fact that it ceased
    to have the

    relevant mandate at the relevant date.

    CASS 8.3.3 G A firm should distinguish between conditions placed by a client on
    the firm''s use of a mandate,

    and criteria to which transactions effected by a firm with or for a client may
    be subject.

    (1) The requirements in CASS 8.3.2 R (1) and CASS 8.3.2 R (3) apply only in respect
    of

    conditions placed around the firm''s use of a mandate itself or around the instructions

    described in CASS 8.2.1 R (4). Examples of these include conditions under which
    a

    mandate may only be used by the firm in connection with transactions up to a certain
    value,

    or under which instructions under a mandate may only be given by certain personnel
    within

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    the firm.

    (2) The requirements in CASS 8.3.2 R (1) and CASS 8.3.2 R (3) do not apply in
    respect of

    criteria which relate to the nature and circumstances of transactions effected
    by a firm with

    or for a client. Examples of those criteria include investment restrictions or
    exposure limits

    for a managed portfolio, and required or preferred execution prices or execution
    venues.

    CASS 8 Mandates www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025


    CASS

    Table of Contents

    CASS 9 Information to clients

    CASS 9.1 Application

    CASS 9.2 Prime broker''s daily report to clients

    CASS 9.3 Prime brokerage agreement disclosure annex

    CASS 9.4 Information to clients concerning custody assets and client money

    CASS 9.5 Reporting to clients on request

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CASS

    .

    .

    .

    .

    .

    CHAPTER

    CASS 9 Information to clients

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 9.1 Application

    CASS 9.1.1 R This chapter applies as follows:

    (1) CASS 9.2 and CASS 9.3 apply to a prime brokerage firm to which CASS 6 (Custody

    rules) applies;

    (2) subject to paragraphs (3) and (4), CASS 9.4 and CASS 9.5 apply to a firm to
    which

    either or both CASS 6 (Custody rules) and CASS 7 (Client money rules) applies;

    (3) CASS 9.4 and CASS 9.5 do not apply to a firm which only arranges safeguarding
    and

    administration of assets; and

    (4) for a firm to which CASS 7 (client money rules) applies as well as either
    or both of CASS

    5 (Client money: insurance distribution activity) and CASS 11 (Debt management
    client

    money chapter) apply, this chapter does not apply to client money that a firm
    holds in

    accordance with CASS 5 or CASS 11.

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 9.2 Prime broker''s daily report to clients

    CASS 9.2.1 R (1) A firm must make available to each of its clients to whom it
    provides prime brokerage

    services a statement in a durable medium:

    (a) showing the value at the close of each business day of the items in (3); and

    (b) detailing any other matters which that firm considers are necessary to ensure
    that a

    client has up-to-date and accurate information about the amount of client money
    and the

    value of safe custody assets held by that firm for it.

    (2) The statement must be made available to those clients not later than the close
    of the

    next business day to which it relates.

    (3) The statement must include:

    (a) the total value of safe custody assets and the total amount of client money
    held by

    that prime brokerage firm for a client;

    (b) the cash value of each of the following:

    (i) Cash loans made to that client and accrued interest;

    (ii) securities to be redelivered by that client under open short positions entered
    into

    on behalf of that client;

    (iii) current settlement amount to be paid by that client under any futures contracts;

    (iv) short sale cash proceeds held by the firm in respect of short positions entered

    into on behalf of that client;

    (v) cash margin held by the firm in respect of open futures contracts entered
    into on

    behalf of that client;

    (vi) mark-to-market close-out exposure of any OTC transaction entered into on
    behalf

    of that client secured by safe custody assets or client money;

    (vii) total secured obligations of that client against the prime brokerage firm;
    and

    (viii) all other safe custody assets held for that client.

    (c) total collateral held by the firm in respect of secured transactions entered
    into under a

    prime brokerage agreement, including where the firm has exercised a right of use
    in

    respect of that client''s safe custody assets;

    (d) the location of all of a client''s safe custody assets, including assets held
    with a subcustodian; and

    (e) a list of all the institutions at which the firm holds or may hold client
    money, including

    money held in client bank accounts and client transaction accounts.

    CASS 9.2.2 G Where a firm has entered into an agreement with a client under article
    91 (Reporting obligations

    for prime brokers) of the AIFMD level 2 regulation, and to the extent that the
    firm makes

    available to the client the same statements as specified by that article that
    it is required to

    provide to the relevant depositary, the FCA will treat the obligations under CASS
    9.2.1 R as

    satisfied by the firm.

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 9.3 Prime brokerage agreement disclosure annex

    CASS 9.3.1 R (1) A firm must ensure that every prime brokerage agreement that
    includes its right to use

    safe custody assets for its own account includes a disclosure annex.

    (2) A firm must ensure that the disclosure annex sets out a summary of the key
    provisions

    within the prime brokerage agreement permitting the use of safe custody assets,
    including:

    (a) the contractual limit, if any, on the safe custody assets which a prime brokerage
    firm

    is permitted to use;

    (b) all related contractual definitions upon which that limit is based;

    (c) a list of numbered references to the provisions within that prime brokerage

    agreement which permit the firm to use the safe custody assets; and

    (d) a statement of the key risks to that client''s safe custody assets if they
    are used by the

    firm, including but not limited to the risks to the safe custody assets on the
    failure of the

    firm.

    (3) A firm must ensure that it sends to the client in question an updated disclosure
    annex if

    the terms of the prime brokerage agreement are amended after completion of that

    agreement such that the original disclosure annex no longer accurately records
    the key

    provisions of the amended agreement.

    CASS 9.3.2 G (1) Principle 10 (Clients’ assets) requires a firm to arrange adequate
    protection for client''s

    assets when it is responsible for them. As part of these protections, the custody
    rules

    require a firm to take appropriate steps to protect safe custody assets for which
    it is

    responsible.

    (2) Subject to paragraph (3), a prime brokerage firm should not enter into “right
    to use

    arrangements” for a client''s safe custody assets unless:

    (a) in the case of a CASS small firm or a firm to which CASS 1A.3.1C R applies,
    the

    person in that firm to whom the responsibilities set out in CASS 1A.3.1 R or in
    CASS

    1A.3.1C R (2) respectively have been allocated; or

    (b) in the case of any other firm, the person who carries out the CASS operational

    oversight function; and

    (c) those of that firm’s managers who are responsible for those safe custody assets;

    are each satisfied that the firm has adequate systems and controls to discharge
    its

    obligations under Principle 10 which include (where applicable):

    (i) the daily reporting obligation in CASS 9.2.1 R; and

    (ii) the record-keeping obligations in CASS 6.3.6AR.

    (3) Paragraph (2) does not apply where the prime brokerage firm is also acting
    as trustee or

    depositary of an AIF which is an unauthorised AIF and exercises a right of reuse
    for a safe

    custody asset of that unauthorised AIF under FUND 3.11.24 R (Reuse of assets).

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 9.4 Information to clients concerning custody assets and client
    money

    CASS 9.4.1 G (1) Firms to which COBS 6.1 applies are reminded that, under COBS
    6.1.7R, a firm that

    holds client designated investments or client money must provide its clients with
    specific

    information about how the firm holds those client designated investments and client
    money

    and how certain arrangements might give rise to specific consequences or risks
    for those

    client designated investments and client money.

    (2) COBS 6.1 (Information about the firm and compensation information (non-MiFID
    and

    non-insurance distribution provisions)) applies to a firm in relation to its designated

    investment business, other than MiFID, equivalent third country or optional exemption

    business or insurance distribution activities, for a retail client.

    CASS 9.4.2 R A firm to which COBS 6.1 applies that holds custody assets or client
    money must, in relation to

    its business for which COBS 6.1 applies:

    (1) provide the information in COBS 6.1.7 R for any custody assets the firm may
    hold for a

    client, including any custody assets which are not designated investments; and

    (2) provide the information in COBS 6.1.7 R and in (1) to each of its clients.

    CASS 9.4.2A R (1) Firms to which COBS 6.1ZA applies are reminded of the requirements
    under article 49 of

    the MiFID Org Regulation (which are directly applicable to some firms and which
    are also

    applied to firms in other circumstances under COBS 6.1ZA.3R) to provide certain

    information to a client when the firm is holding the client’s financial instruments
    or funds (see

    COBS 6.1ZA.9EU) and the requirement under COBS 6.1ZA.10AR when a firm doing

    insurance distribution activities is holding client money and has elected to comply
    with the

    client money chapter.

    (2) COBS 6.1ZA (Information about the firm and compensation information (MiFID
    and

    insurance distribution provisions)) applies to a firm in relation to its MiFID,
    equivalent third

    country or optional exemption business or its insurance distribution activities
    for a client.

    CASS 9.4.2B R A firm to which COBS 6.1ZA applies that holds custody assets or
    client money must, in relation

    to its business for which COBS 6.1ZA applies:

    (1) provide the information referred to in paragraphs 2 to 7 of article 49 of
    the MiFID Org

    Regulation for any custody asset that the firm may hold for a client, including:

    (a) any custody asset which is a designated investment but not a financial instrument;

    and

    (b) any custody asset which is neither a designated investment nor a financial

    instrument; and

    (2) provide the information in (1) to each of its clients.

    CASS 9.4.3 G A firm should provide the information required in CASS 9.4.2 R or
    CASS 9.4.2BR (as

    applicable) to any client for whom it holds custody assets or client money, including
    a retail

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    client, a professional client and an eligible counterparty.

    CASS 9.4.4 G (1) Firms are reminded of their obligation, under COBS 4.2.1 R, to
    be fair, clear and not

    misleading in their communications with clients.

    (2) Firms are also reminded of the requirements in respect of communications made
    to retail

    clients under COBS 4.5 and clients under article 44 of the MiFID Org Regulation
    and COBS

    4.5A (as applicable).

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    Section : CASS 9.5 Reporting to clients on request

    CASS 9.5.1 G (1) Firms to which COBS 16.4 applies are reminded that, under COBS
    16.4, they are

    required to send to each of their clients at least once a year a statement in
    a durable

    medium of those designated investments and/or client money they hold for that
    client. A firm

    which manages investments may provide this statement in its periodic statement,
    as

    required under COBS 16.3.

    (2) COBS 16.4 (Statements of client designated investments or client money) applies,
    in

    accordance with COBS 16.1.2R, to a firm carrying on designated investment business
    other

    than MiFID, equivalent third country or optional exemption business.

    CASS 9.5.2 G Firms are reminded that the requirements in COBS 16.4, article 63
    of the MiFID Org Regulation

    and COBS 16A.4 only set out the minimum frequency at which firms must report to
    their clients

    on their holdings of designated investments and/or client money. Firms may choose
    to report to

    their clients more frequently.

    CASS 9.5.3 G Subject to CASS 9.5.5AR and CASS 9.5.6 R, CASS 9.5.4R, CASS 9.5.4BR
    and CASS 9.5.5 R

    require firms to comply with a client''s request for information on the custody
    assets and/or client

    money the firm holds for a client under CASS 6 and/or CASS 7, and such request
    may be

    made by a client at any time.

    CASS 9.5.4 R When a firm to which COBS 16.4 applies receives a request, made by
    a client, or on a client''s

    behalf, for a statement of the custody assets and/or client money that the firm
    holds for that

    client, the firm must provide the client with the statement requested in a durable
    medium.

    CASS 9.5.4A R (1) Firms to which COBS 16A applies are reminded of the requirements
    under article 63 of

    the MiFID Org Regulation (which are directly applicable to some firms and which
    are also

    applied to firms in other circumstances under COBS 16A.1.2R) in relation to quarterly

    statements when the firm is holding a client’s financial instruments or funds
    (see COBS

    16A.4.1EU and COBS 16A.5.1EU).

    (2) COBS 16A (Reporting information to clients (MiFID provisions) applies to a
    firm in

    relation to its MiFID, equivalent third country or optional exemption business.

    CASS 9.5.4B R When a firm to which COBS 16A applies receives a request, made by
    a client, or on a client’s

    behalf, for a statement of the custody assets that the firm holds for that client,
    it must provide

    the client with a statement in a durable medium in relation to any custody assets
    that are not

    financial instruments.

    CASS 9.5.4C G A firm to which COBS 16A applies may combine the statement required
    under CASS 9.5.4BR

    with a statement issued in response to a request made under the last sentence
    of the first subparagraph of article 63(1) of the MiFID Org Regulation.

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025

    CASS

    CASS 9.5.5 R When a firm receives a request, made by a client, or on a client''s
    behalf, for a copy of any

    statement of custody assets and/or client money previously provided to that client,
    the firm must

    provide the client with the copy of the statement requested in a durable medium
    and within five

    business days following the receipt of the request.

    CASS 9.5.5A R A firm is not required to provide a client with a statement under
    CASS 9.5.4R or CASS 9.5.4BR,

    or a copy of a statement under CASS 9.5.5R (as applicable) where the following
    conditions are

    met:

    (1) the firm provides the client with access to an online system, which qualifies
    as a durable

    medium;

    (2) up-to-date statements of the client’s custody assets and/or client money can
    be easily

    accessed by the client via the system under (1); and

    (3) the firm has evidence that the client has accessed this statement at least
    once during the

    relevant quarter.

    CASS 9.5.6 R Any charge agreed between the firm and the client for providing the
    statements in CASS

    9.5.4R, CASS 9.5.4BR or CASS 9.5.5R (as applicable) must be at a commercial cost.

    CASS 9.5.7 G Any statement provided to a client under CASS 9.5.4 R or CASS 9.5.5
    R (as applicable) may,

    although it is not required to, be in the same form as the statement a firm is
    required to provide

    to a client under COBS 16.4 or, if appropriate, COBS 16.3.

    CASS 9.5.8 G Consistent with the fair, clear and not misleading rule, a firm should
    ensure that, in any

    statements of custody assets and/or client money it provides to its clients, it
    is clear from the

    statement which assets and/or monies the firm reports as holding for the client
    are, or are not,

    protected under CASS 6 and/or CASS 7 (e.g. if the statement also includes information

    regarding assets and/or monies which are held by the firm for that client which
    are not subject

    to the custody rules and/or client money rules) .

    CASS 9.5.9 G Firms are reminded that under CASS 3.2.4 G firms that enter into
    arrangements with retail

    clients covered by CASS 3 (Collateral) should, when appropriate, identify in any
    statement of

    custody assets sent to the client under COBS 16.4 (Statements of client designated

    investments or client money), article 63 of the MiFID Org Regulation or COBS 16A.4
    (as

    applicable) or this section the details of the assets which form the basis of
    that collateral

    arrangement.

    CASS 9 Information to clients www.handbook.fca.org.uk September 2025'
  display: CASS 7A.2.7
